#빈칸

#수능

#2019 수능

#2019 수능 31번
Finkenauer and Rimé investigated the memory of the
unexpected death of Belgium’s King Baudouin in 1993 in a
large sample of Belgian citizens. The data revealed that the
news of the king’s death had been widely socially shared. By
talking about the event, people gradually constructed a social
narrative and a collective memory of the emotional event. At
the same time, they consolidated their own memory of the
personal circumstances in which the event took place, an
effect known as “flashbulb memory.” The more an event is
socially shared, the more it will be fixed in people’s minds.
Social sharing may in this way help to counteract some natural
tendency people may have. Naturally, people should be driven
to “forget” undesirable events. Thus, someone who just heard
a piece of bad news often tends initially to deny what happened.
The repetitive social sharing of the bad news contributes to
realism.

#2019 수능 32번
Minorities tend not to have much power or status and may
even be dismissed as troublemakers, extremists or simply
‘weirdos’. How, then, do they ever have any influence over the
majority? The social psychologist Serge Moscovici claims that
the answer lies in their behavioural style, i.e. the way
the minority gets its point across. The crucial factor
in the success of the suffragette movement was that its
supporters were consistent in their views, and this created a
considerable degree of social influence. Minorities that are
active and organised, who support and defend their position
consistently, can create social conflict, doubt and uncertainty
among members of the majority, and ultimately this may lead
to social change. Such change has often occurred because a
minority has converted others to its point of view. Without the
influence of minorities, we would have no innovation, no
social change. Many of what we now regard as ‘major’ social
movements (e.g. Christianity, trade unionism or feminism)
were originally due to the influence of an outspoken minority.

#2019 수능 33번
Heritage is concerned with the ways in which very selective
material artefacts, mythologies, memories and traditions
become resources for the present. The contents, interpretations
and representations of the resource are selected according to
the demands of the present; an imagined past provides
resources for a heritage that is to be passed onto an imagined
future. It follows too that the meanings and functions of
memory and tradition are defined in the present. Further,
heritage is more concerned with meanings than material
artefacts. It is the former that give value, either cultural or
financial, to the latter and explain why they have been selected
from the near infinity of the past. In turn, they may later be
discarded as the demands of present societies change, or even,
as is presently occurring in the former Eastern Europe, when
pasts have to be reinvented to reflect new presents. Thus
heritage is as much about forgetting as remembering the past.

#2019 수능 34번
The human species is unique in its ability to expand its
functionality by inventing new cultural tools. Writing, arithmetic,
science ― all are recent inventions. Our brains did not have
enough time to evolve for them, but I reason that they were made
possible because we can mobilize our old areas in novel ways.
When we learn to read, we recycle a specific region of our
visual system known as the visual word-form area, enabling us
to recognize strings of letters and connect them to language
areas. Likewise, when we learn Arabic numerals we build a
circuit to quickly convert those shapes into quantities ― a fast
connection from bilateral visual areas to the parietal quantity
area. Even an invention as elementary as finger-counting changes
our cognitive abilities dramatically. Amazonian people who have
not invented counting are unable to make exact calculations as
simple as, say, 6—2. This “cultural recycling” implies that the
functional architecture of the human brain results from a complex
mixture of biological and cultural constraints.

#2019 수능 40번
Biological organisms, including human societies both with
and without market systems, discount distant outputs over
those available at the present time based on risks associated
with an uncertain future. As the timing of inputs and outputs
varies greatly depending on the type of energy, there is a
strong case to incorporate time when assessing energy
alternatives. For example, the energy output from solar panels
or wind power engines, where most investment happens
before they begin producing, may need to be assessed
differently when compared to most fossil fuel extraction
technologies, where a large proportion of the energy output
comes much sooner, and a larger (relative) proportion of
inputs is applied during the extraction process, and not
upfront. Thus fossil fuels, particularly oil and natural gas, in
addition to having energy quality advantages (cost, storability,
transportability, etc.) over many renewable technologies, also
have a “temporal advantage” after accounting for human
behavioral preference for current consumption/return.

Due to the fact that people tend to favor more immediate
outputs, fossil fuels are more competitive than renewable
energy alternatives in regards to the distance between inputs
and outputs.

#2018 수능

#2018 수능 31번
Apocalypse Now, a film produced and directed by Francis
Ford Coppola, gained widespread popularity, and for good
reason. The film is an adaptation of Joseph Conrad’s novel
Heart of Darkness, which is set in the African Congo at the
end of the 19th century. Unlike the original novel, Apocalypse
Now is set in Vietnam and Cambodia during the Vietnam War.
The setting, time period, dialogue and other incidental details
are changed but the fundamental narrative and themes of
Apocalypse Now are the same as those of Heart of Darkness.
Both describe a physical journey, reflecting the central
character’s mental and spiritual journey, down a river to
confront the deranged Kurtz character, who represents the
worst aspects of civilisation. By giving Apocalypse Now a
setting that was contemporary at the time of its release,
audiences were able to experience and identify with its
themes more easily than they would have if the film had been
a literal adaptation of the novel.

#2018 수능 32번
How many of the lunches that you ate over the last week
can you recall? Do you remember what you ate today? I hope
so. Yesterday? I bet it takes a moment’s effort. And what
about the day before yesterday? What about a week ago? It’s
not so much that your memory of last week’s lunch has
disappeared; if provided with the right cue, like where you
ate it, or whom you ate it with, you would likely recall what
had been on your plate. Rather, it’s difficult to remember last
week’s lunch because your brain has filed it away with all
the other lunches you’ve ever eaten as just another lunch.
When we try to recall something from a category that
includes as many instances as “lunch” or “wine,” many
memories compete for our attention. The memory of last
Wednesday’s lunch isn’t necessarily gone; it’s that you lack
the right hook to pull it out of a sea of lunchtime memories. But
a wine that talks: That’s unique. It’s a memory without rivals.

#2018 수능 33번
In the less developed world, the percentage of the
population involved in agriculture is declining, but at the
same time, those remaining in agriculture are not benefiting
from technological advances. The typical scenario in the less
developed world is one in which a very few commercial
agriculturalists are technologically advanced while the vast
majority are incapable of competing. Indeed, this vast majority
have lost control over their own production because
of larger global causes. As an example, in Kenya, farmers are
actively encouraged to grow export crops such as tea and
coffee at the expense of basic food production. The result is
that a staple crop, such as maize, is not being produced in a
sufficient amount. The essential argument here is that the
capitalist mode of production is affecting peasant production
in the less developed world in such a way as to limit the
production of staple foods, thus causing a food problem.

#2018 수능 34번
Over the past 60 years, as mechanical processes have
replicated behaviors and talents we thought were unique to
humans, we’ve had to change our minds about what sets
us apart. As we invent more species of AI, we will be
forced to surrender more of what is supposedly unique
about humans. Each step of surrender ─ we are not the only
mind that can play chess, fly a plane, make music, or invent
a mathematical law ─ will be painful and sad. We’ll spend
the next three decades ─ indeed, perhaps the next century ─
in a permanent identity crisis, continually asking ourselves
what humans are good for. If we aren’t unique toolmakers,
or artists, or moral ethicists, then what, if anything, makes
us special? In the grandest irony of all, the greatest benefit
of an everyday, utilitarian AI will not be increased
productivity or an economics of abundance or a new way of
doing science ─ although all those will happen. The
greatest benefit of the arrival of artificial intelligence is that
AIs will help define humanity.

#2018 수능 40번
Time spent on on-line interaction with members of one’s
own, preselected community leaves less time available for
actual encounters with a wide variety of people. If physicists,
for example, were to concentrate on exchanging email and
electronic preprints with other physicists around the world
working in the same specialized subject area, they would
likely devote less time, and be less receptive to new ways of
looking at the world. Facilitating the voluntary construction
of highly homogeneous social networks of scientific
communication therefore allows individuals to filter the
potentially overwhelming flow of information. But the
result may be the tendency to overfilter it, thus eliminating
the diversity of the knowledge circulating and diminishing
the frequency of radically new ideas. In this regard, even a
journey through the stacks of a real library can be more
fruitful than a trip through today’s distributed virtual
archives, because it seems difficult to use the available
“search engines” to emulate efficiently the mixture of
predictable and surprising discoveries that typically result
from a physical shelf-search of an extensive library collection.

Focusing on on-line interaction with people who are
engaged in the same specialized area can limit
potential sources of information and thus make it less
probable for unexpected findings to happen.

#2018 수능 42번
In one sense, every character you create will be yourself.
You’ve never murdered, but your murderer’s rage will be
drawn from memories of your own extreme anger. Your love
scenes will contain hints of your own past kisses and sweet
moments. That scene in which your octogenarian feels
humiliated will draw on your experience of humiliation in
the eighth grade, even though the circumstances are totally
different and you’re not even consciously thinking about
your middle-school years. Our characters’ emotions, after
all, draw on our own emotions. Sometimes, however, you
will want to use your life more directly in your fiction,
dramatizing actual incidents. Charles Dickens used his
desperate experience as a child laborer in Victorian England
to write David Copperfield. Should you create a protagonist
based directly on yourself? The problem with this ─ and it
is a very large problem ─ is that almost no one can view
himself objectively on the page. As the writer, you’re too
close to your own complicated makeup. It can thus be easier
and more effective to use a situation or incident from your
life but make it happen to a character who is not you. In fact,
that’s what authors largely have done. You can still, of
course, incorporate aspects of yourself: your love of
Beethoven, your quick temper, your soccer injuries. But by
applying your own experience to a different protagonist, you
can take advantage of your insider knowledge of the
situation, and yet gain an objectivity and control that the
original intense situation, by definition, did not have.

#2017 수능

#2017 수능 31번
The creativity that children possess needs to be cultivated
throughout their development. Research suggests that
overstructuring the child’s environment may actually limit
creative and academic development. This is a central problem
with much of science instruction. The exercises or activities
are devised to eliminate different options and to focus on
predetermined results. The answers are structured to fit the
course assessments, and the wonder of science is lost along
with cognitive intrigue. We define cognitive intrigue as the
wonder that stimulates and intrinsically motivates an
individual to voluntarily engage in an activity. The loss of
cognitive intrigue may be initiated by the sole use of play
items with predetermined conclusions and reinforced by rote
instruction in school. This is exemplified by toys, games, and
lessons that are an end in and of themselves and
require little of the individual other than to master the planned
objective.

#2017 수능 32번
Temporal resolution is particularly interesting in the
context of satellite remote sensing. The temporal density of
remotely sensed imagery is large, impressive, and growing.
Satellites are collecting a great deal of imagery as you read
this sentence. However, most applications in geography and
environmental studies do not require extremely fine-grained
temporal resolution. Meteorologists may require visible,
infrared, and radar information at sub-hourly temporal
resolution; urban planners might require imagery at monthly
or annual resolution; and transportation planners may not
need any time series information at all for some applications.
Again, the temporal resolution of imagery used should
meet the requirements of your inquiry. Sometimes
researchers have to search archives of aerial photographs to
get information from that past that pre-date the collection of
satellite imagery.

#2017 수능 33번
Grief is unpleasant. Would one not then be better off
without it altogether? Why accept it even when the loss is
real? Perhaps we should say of it what Spinoza said of regret:
that whoever feels it is “twice unhappy or twice helpless.”
Laurence Thomas has suggested that the utility of “negative
sentiments” (emotions like grief, guilt, resentment, and anger,
which there is seemingly a reason to believe we might be
better off without) lies in their providing a kind of guarantee
of authenticity for such dispositional sentiments as love
and respect. No occurrent feelings of love and respect need
to be present throughout the period in which it is true that
one loves or respects. One might therefore sometimes
suspect, in the absence of the positive occurrent feelings, that
one no longer loves. At such times,
negative emotions like grief offer a kind of testimonial to the
authenticity of love or respect.

#2017 수능 34번
Over a period of time the buildings which housed social,
legal, religious, and other rituals evolved into forms that we
subsequently have come to recognize and associate with those buildings’ function.
This is a two-way process; the building provides the physical
environment and setting for a particular social ritual such as
traveling by train or going to the theater, as well as the
symbolic setting. The meaning of buildings evolves and
becomes established by experience and we in turn read our
experience into buildings. Buildings arouse an empathetic
reaction in us through these projected experiences, and the
strength of these reactions is determined by our culture, our
beliefs, and our expectations. They tell stories, for their form
and spatial organization give us hints about how they should be
used. Their physical layout encourages some uses and inhibits
others; we do not go backstage in a theater unless especially
invited. Inside a law court the precise location of those
involved in the legal process is an integral part of the design
and an essential part of ensuring that the law is upheld.

#2017 수능 40번
The impacts of tourism on the environment are evident
to scientists, but not all residents attribute environmental
damage to tourism. Residents commonly have positive
views on the economic and some sociocultural influences
of tourism on quality of life, but their reactions to
environmental impacts are mixed. Some residents feel
tourism provides more parks and recreation areas,
improves the quality of the roads and public facilities, and
does not contribute to ecological decline. Many do not
blame tourism for traffic problems, overcrowded outdoor
recreation, or the disturbance of peace and tranquility of
parks. Alternatively, some residents express concern that
tourists overcrowd the local fishing, hunting, and other
recreation areas or may cause traffic and pedestrian
congestion. Some studies suggest that variations in
residents’ feelings about tourism’s relationship to
environmental damage are related to the type of tourism,
the extent to which residents feel the natural environment
needs to be protected, and the distance residents live from
the tourist attractions.

Residents do not weigh tourism’s environmental
influences identically since they take dissimilar postures
based on factors such as the type of tourism, opinions on
the degree of protection, and their distance from an attraction.

#2017 수능 42번
Duration refers to the time that events last. If we think of
tempo as the speed of events, then duration is the speed of
the clock itself. For the physicist, the duration of a “second”
is precise and unambiguous: it is equal to 9,192,631,770
cycles of the frequency associated with the transition
between two energy levels of the isotope cesium-133. In the
realm of psychological experience, however, quantifying
units of time is a considerably clumsier operation. When
people are removed from the cues of “real” time ─ be it the
sun, bodily fatigue, or timepieces themselves ─ it doesn’t
take long before their time sense breaks down. And it is this
usually imprecise psychological clock, as opposed to the
time on one’s watch, that creates the perception of duration
that people experience.
Theoretically, a person who mentally stretches the duration
of time should experience a slower tempo. Imagine, for
example, that baseballs are pitched to two different batters.
The balls are thrown every 5 seconds for 50 seconds, so a
total of 10 balls are thrown. We now ask both batters how
much time has passed. Let’s say that batter number one (who
loves hitting) feels the duration to be 40 seconds. Batter
number two (bored by baseball) believes it to be 60 seconds.
Psychologically, then, the first person has experienced
baseballs approaching every four seconds while the second
sees it as every six seconds. The perceived tempo, in other
words, is faster for batter number one.

#2016 수능

#2016 수능 31번
When two cultures come into contact, they do not
exchange every cultural item. If that were the case, there
would be no cultural differences in the world today. Instead,
only a small number of cultural elements ever spread from
one culture to another. Which cultural item is accepted
depends largely on the item’s use and compatibility with
already existing cultural traits. For example, it is not likely
that men’s hair dyes designed to “get out the gray” will spread
into parts of rural Africa where a person’s status is elevated
with advancing years. Even when an innovation is
consistent with a society’s needs, there is still no guarantee
that it will be accepted. For example, most people in the
United States using US customary units (e.g., inch, foot, yard,
mile, etc.) have resisted adopting the metric system even
though making such a change would enable US citizens to
interface with the rest of the world more efficiently.

#2016 수능 32번
Some distinctions between good and bad are hardwired into
our biology. Infants enter the world ready to respond to pain as
bad and to sweet (up to a point) as good. In many situations,
however, the boundary between good and bad is a reference
point that changes over time and depends on the immediate
circumstances. Imagine that you are out in the country on a cold
night, inadequately dressed for the pouring rain, your clothes
soaked. A stinging cold wind completes your misery. As you
wander around, you find a large rock that provides some shelter
from the fury of the elements. The biologist Michel Cabanac
would call the experience of that moment intensely pleasurable
because it functions, as pleasure normally does, to indicate the
direction of a biologically significant improvement of circumstances.
The pleasant relief will not last very long, of course, and you
will soon be shivering behind the rock again, driven by your
renewed suffering to seek better shelter.

#2016 수능 33번
Research and development for seed improvement has long
been a public domain and government activity for the
common good. However, private capital started to flow into
seed production and took it over as a sector of the economy,
creating an artificial split between the two aspects of the
seed’s nature: its role as means of production and its role as
product. This process gained pace after the invention of
hybrid breeding of maize in the late 1920s. Today most maize
seed cultivated are hybrids. The companies that sell them are
able to keep the distinct parent lines from farmers, and the
grain that they produce is not suited for seed saving and
replanting. The combination guarantees that farmers will
have to buy more seed from the company each season. In the
1990s the extension of patent laws as the only intellectual
property rights tool into the area of seed varieties started to
create a growing market for private seed companies.

#2016 수능 34번
Long before Walt Whitman wrote Leaves of Grass, poets had
addressed themselves to fame. Horace, Petrarch, Shakespeare,
Milton, and Keats all hoped that poetic greatness would grant
them a kind of earthly immortality. Whitman held a similar
faith that for centuries the world would value his poems. But
to this ancient desire to live forever on the page, he added a
new sense of fame. Readers would not simply attend to the
poet’s work; they would be attracted to the greatness of his
personality. They would see in his poems a vibrant cultural
performance, an individual springing from the book with
tremendous charisma and appeal. Out of the political rallies
and electoral parades that marked Jacksonian America, Whitman
defined poetic fame in relation to the crowd. Other poets
might look for their inspiration from the goddess of poetry.
Whitman’s poet sought the approval of his contemporaries.
In the instability of American democracy, fame would be
dependent on celebrity, on the degree to which the people
rejoiced in the poet and his work.

#2016 수능 40번
Performance must be judged in terms of what is under
the control of the individuals being evaluated rather than
those influences on performance that are beyond their
control. There can be broad, influential factors, sometimes
of an economic nature, that hold down the performance
of everyone being judged. One example is in sales. If there
is a general downturn in the economy and products or
services are not being purchased with the same frequency
as in the previous year, sales could be down, for example,
by an average of 15%. This 15% (actually －15%) figure
would then represent “average” performance. Perhaps the
best salesperson in the year had only a 3% drop in sales
over the previous year. Thus, “good” performance in this
situation is a smaller loss compared to some average or
norm group.

In performance evaluation, we should consider contextual
factors affecting the individual’s performance rather than
rely on figures only.

#2016 수능 42번
We might describe science that has no known practical
value as basic science or basic research. Our exploration of
worlds such as Jupiter would be called basic science, and it is
easy to argue that basic science is not worth the effort and
expense because it has no known practical use. Of course, the
problem is that we have no way of knowing what knowledge
will be of use until we acquire that knowledge. In the middle
of the 19th century, Queen Victoria is supposed to have asked
physicist Michael Faraday what good his experiments with
electricity and magnetism were. He answered, “Madam, what
good is a baby?” Of course, Faraday’s experiments were the
beginning of the electronic age. Many of the practical uses
of scientific knowledge that fill our world ― transistors,
vaccines, plastics ― began as basic research. Basic scientific
research provides the raw materials that technology and
engineering use to solve problems.
Basic scientific research has yet one more important use
that is so valuable it seems an insult to refer to it as merely
functional. Science is the study of nature, and as we learn
more about how nature works, we learn more about what our
existence in this universe means for us. The seemingly
impractical knowledge we gain from space probes to other
worlds tells us about our planet and our own role in the
scheme of nature. Science tells us where we are and what we
are, and that knowledge is beyond value.

#2015 수능

#2015 수능 31번
The concept of humans doing multiple things at a time has
been studied by psychologists since the 1920s, but the term
“multitasking” didn’t exist until the 1960s. It was used to
describe computers, not people. Back then, ten megahertz was
so fast that a new word was needed to describe a computer’s
ability to quickly perform many tasks. In retrospect, they
probably made a poor choice, for the expression “multitasking”
is inherently deceptive. Multitasking is about multiple tasks
alternately sharing one resource (the CPU), but in time the
context was flipped and it became interpreted to mean multiple
tasks being done simultaneously by one resource (a person). It
was a clever turn of phrase that’s misleading, for even
computers can process only one piece of code at a time. When
they “multitask,” they switch back and forth, alternating their
attention until both tasks are done. The speed with which
computers tackle multiple tasks feeds the illusion that
everything happens at the same time, so comparing computers
to humans can be confusing.

#2015 수능 32번
My friend was disappointed that scientific progress has not
cured the world’s ills by abolishing wars and starvation; that
gross human inequality is still widespread; that happiness is
not universal. My friend made a common mistake ― a basic
misunderstanding in the nature of knowledge. Knowledge is
amoral ― not immoral but morality neutral. It can be used for
any purpose, but many people assume it will be used to further
their favorite hopes for society ― and this is the fundamental flaw.
Knowledge of the world is one thing; its uses create a separate
issue. To be disappointed that our progress in understanding
has not remedied the social ills of the world is a legitimate
view, but to confuse this with the progress of knowledge is absurd.
To argue that knowledge is not progressing because of the
African or Middle Eastern conflicts misses the point. There is
nothing inherent in knowledge that dictates any specific social
or moral application.

#2015 수능 33번
According to a renowned French scholar, the growth in the
size and complexity of human populations was the driving
force in the evolution of science. Early, small communities had
to concentrate all their physical and mental effort on survival;
their thoughts were focused on food and religion. As
communities became larger, some people had time to reflect
and debate. They found that they could understand and predict
events better if they reduced passion and prejudice, replacing
these with observation and inference. But while a large
population may have been necessary, in itself it was not
sufficient for science to germinate. Some empires were big,
but the rigid social control required to hold an empire together
was not beneficial to science, just as it was not beneficial to
reason. The early nurturing and later flowering of science
required a large and loosely structured, competitive community
to support original thought and freewheeling incentive. The rise in
commerce and the decline of authoritarian religion allowed
science to follow reason in seventeenth-century Europe.

#2015 수능 34번
New media can be defined by four characteristics
simultaneously: they are media at the turn of the 20th and 21st
centuries which are both integrated and interactive and use
digital code and hypertext as technical means. It follows that
their most common alternative names are multimedia,
interactive media and digital media. By using this definition,
it is easy to identify media as old or new. For example,
traditional television is integrated as it contains images, sound
and text, but it is not interactive or based on digital code. The
plain old telephone was interactive, but not integrated as it
only transmitted speech and sounds and it did not work with
digital code. In contrast, the new medium of interactive
television adds interactivity and digital code. Additionally,
the new generations of mobile or fixed telephony are fully
digitalized and integrated as they add text, pictures or video
and they are connected to the Internet.

#2015 수능 40번
Plato and Tolstoy both assume that it can be firmly
established that certain works have certain effects. Plato is
sure that the representation of cowardly people makes us
cowardly; the only way to prevent this effect is to suppress
such representations. Tolstoy is confident that the artist
who sincerely expresses feelings of pride will pass those
feelings on to us; we can no more escape than we could
escape an infectious disease. In fact, however, the effects
of art are neither so certain nor so direct. People vary a
great deal both in the intensity of their response to art and
in the form which that response takes. Some people may
indulge fantasies of violence by watching a film instead of
working out those fantasies in real life. Others may be
disgusted by even glamorous representations of violence.
Still others may be left unmoved, neither attracted nor
disgusted.

Although Plato and Tolstoy claim that works of art have
an avoidable impact on people’s feelings, the degrees
and forms of people’s actual responses differ greatly.

#2015 수능 42번
Increased size affects group life in a number of ways. There
is evidence that larger groups (five or six members) are more
productive than smaller groups (two or three members).
Members of larger groups tend to offer more suggestions than
members of smaller groups, and although they seem to reach
less agreement, they also show less tension. These differences
may reflect the greater need of larger groups to solve
organizational problems. Members may realize that their
behavior must become more goal-directed, since it is unlikely
that they can coordinate their actions without making a special
effort to do so. Larger groups also put more pressure on their
members to conform. In such groups, it is harder for everyone
to take part equally in discussions or to have the same amount
of influence on decisions.
There is evidence that groups with an even number of
members differ from groups with an odd number of members.
The former disagree more than the latter and suffer more
deadlocks as a result. Groups with an even number of
members may split into halves. This is impossible in groups
with an odd number of members ― one side always has a
numerical advantage. According to some researchers, the
number five has special significance. Groups of this size
usually escape the problems we have just outlined.
Moreover, they are not plagued by the fragility and tensions
found in groups of two or three. Groups of five rate high in
member satisfaction; because of the odd number of members,
deadlocks are unlikely when disagreements occur.

#2014-B 수능

#2014-B 수능 31번
Sometimes all the outcomes customers are trying to achieve
in one area have a negative effect on other outcomes. This is
very common when companies are busy listening to the ‘voice
of the customer.’ Traveling salespeople, for example, may say
they want a smaller cell phone, but they may not have thought
about how hard that tiny phone will be to use. Carpenters may
request a lightweight circular saw without thinking about the
fact that it will no longer have the power to get through some of
the more difficult jobs. When customers make requests for new
product features, they are usually focused on solving just one
problem and are not thinking of how their requested solution
will impact other product or service functions.
In this situation, customers request new features but reject the
resulting product when they realize the ramifications of their
suggestions ― the added feature turns out to be worthless
because of the problems it causes.

#2014-B 수능 32번
The success of human beings depends crucially on numbers
and connections. A few hundred people cannot sustain a
sophisticated technology. Recall that Australia was colonized
45,000 years ago by pioneers spreading east from Africa along
the shore of Asia. The vanguard of such a migration must have
been small in number and must have traveled comparatively
light. The chances are they had only a sample of the
technology available to their relatives back at the Red Sea
crossing. This may explain why Australian aboriginal
technology, although it developed and elaborated steadily over
the ensuing millennia, was lacking in so many features of the
Old World ― elastic weapons, for example, such as bows and
catapults, were unknown, as were ovens. It was not that they
were ‘primitive’ or that they had mentally regressed; it was
that they had arrived with only a subset of technologies
and did not have a dense enough population and therefore a
large enough collective brain to develop them much further.

#2014-B 수능 33번
Policymaking is seen to be more objective when experts
play a large role in the creation and implementation of the
policy, and when utilitarian rationality is the dominant value
that guides policy. Through the use of the scientific method to
determine the facts of any given policy situation, the power of
social constructions is supposedly diminished, and solutions to
social problems are discovered in an objective way. This
process creates an illusion of neutrality and implies a
transcendence of the pitfalls and inequalities commonly
associated with policymaking. From this perspective, scientists
and professionals emerge as the appropriate experts to be
consulted in policymaking, while local citizen input and
knowledge is often viewed as unnecessary. Scientific and
professional policy design does not necessarily escape the
pitfalls of degenerative politics. Scientific and professional
expertise often relies on a particular type of knowledge that is
limited to utility and rationality considerations. This approach
to policy typically does not consider values and cultural factors
that cannot be measured empirically. Scientifically designed
policies can serve interests that run counter to the public
interest. They can reinforce unequal and unjust relationships.

#2014-B 수능 34번
Like many errors and biases that seem irrational on the
surface, auditory looming turns out, on closer examination, to
be pretty smart. Animals like rhesus monkeys have evolved
the same bias. This intentional error functions as an advance
warning system, manned by the self-protection subself,
providing individuals with a margin of safety when they are
confronted with potentially dangerous approaching objects.
If you spot a rhinoceros or hear an avalanche speeding
toward you, auditory looming will motivate you to jump
out of the way now rather than wait until the last second.
The evolutionary benefits of immediately getting out of the
way of approaching dangers were so strong that natural
selection endowed us ― and other mammals ― with brains
that intentionally see and hear the world inaccurately. Although
this kind of bias might inhibit economically rational
judgment in laboratory tasks, it leads us to behave in a
deeply rational manner in the real world. Being accurate is not
always smart.

#2014-B 수능 35번
Mathematics will attract those it can attract, but it will do
nothing to overcome resistance to science. Science is universal
in principle but in practice it speaks to very few. Mathematics
may be considered a communication skill of the highest type,
frictionless so to speak; and at the opposite pole from
mathematics, the fruits of science show the practical benefits of
science without the use of words. But those fruits are
ambivalent. Science as science does not speak; ideally,
all scientific concepts are mathematized when scientists
communicate with one another, and when science displays its
products to non-scientists it need not, and indeed is not able to,
resort to salesmanship. When science speaks to others, it is no
longer science, and the scientist becomes or has to hire a
publicist who dilutes the exactness of mathematics. In doing
so, the scientist reverses his drive toward mathematical
exactness in favor of rhetorical vagueness and metaphor, thus
violating the code of intellectual conduct that defines him
as a scientist.

#2014-B 수능 36번
F. Scott Fitzgerald thought that the test of first-rate
intelligence was the ability to hold two opposed ideas in mind
at the same time and still function. The eons shaped our brains
in the opposite direction. Confirmation bias is a term for the
way the mind systematically avoids confronting contradiction.
It does this by overvaluing evidence that confirms what we
already think or feel and undervaluing or simply disregarding
evidence that refutes it. Testimony from members of the Crow
tribe about the destruction of their culture provides an extreme
and tragic example of this. A man named Plenty Coups
reported that “when the buffalo went away, the hearts of my
people fell to the ground and they could not lift them up again.
After this nothing happened.” He was not alone in describing
the depth of despair as the end of history. “Nothing happened
after that,” another Crow warrior said. “We just lived.” The
emotion was so strong that the brain rejected evidence of the
continued existence of normal, everyday life that might have
eased it.

#2014-B 수능 37번
Oil and gas resources are not likely to be impacted by
climate change because they result from a process that takes
millions of years and are geologically trapped. On the other hand,
climate change may not only force the shutting down of oiland
gas-producing areas, but increase the possibility of
exploration in areas of the Arctic through the reduction in ice
cover. Thus, while climate change may not impact these
resources, oil and gas reserves and known or potential
resources could be affected by new climate conditions, since
climate change may affect access to these resources. In
Siberia, for instance, the actual exploration challenge is the
time required to access, produce, and deliver oil under extreme
environmental conditions, where temperatures in January
range from —20℃ to —35℃. Warming may ease extreme
environmental conditions, expanding the production frontier.

#2014-B 수능 40번
Low-balling describes the technique where two
individuals arrive at an agreement and then one increases
the cost to be incurred by the other. For example, after the
consumer has agreed to purchase a car for $8,000, the
salesperson begins to add on $100 for tax and $200 for
tires. These additional costs might be thought of as a
metaphorical ‘low ball’ that the salesperson throws the
consumer. One explanation for the effectiveness of
low-balling is in terms of self-perception theory. When the
consumer agrees to purchase the product under the original
terms, that behavior might be used by the consumer to
infer his sincere interest in the product. This inferred
sincere interest in the product may enable him to endure
the increased cost. An alternative explanation is in terms
of impression management theory. If the consumer were
to withdraw from the deal after the ‘slight’ change in the
terms of agreement, he might foster the rather undesirable
impression of being an irresponsible consumer unaware of
these necessary charges.

Low-balling is effective in sales contexts because the
consumer, by not withdrawing from the deal, tends to
justify his purchase decision or tries to save face.

#2014-A 수능

#2014-A 수능 33번
In all cultures in which eye-gaze behavior has been studied,
science confirms that those who are dominant have more freedom
in using it. In essence, these individuals are
entitled to look wherever they want. However, subordinates
are more restricted in where they can look and when. Humility
dictates that in the presence of royalty, as in church, heads are
bowed. As a general rule, dominants tend to ignore
subordinates visually while subordinates tend to gaze at
dominant individuals at a distance. In other words,
higher-status individuals can be indifferent while lower-status
persons are required to be attentive with their gaze. The king
is free to look at anyone he wants, but all subjects face the
king, even as they back out of a room.

#2014-A 수능 34번
The importance of science has led people to think that
‘objectivity’ is the best way to see the world ― to see the facts
without any feelings. However, from a human point of view,
objectivity is just another attitude. It is an interpretation that
deliberately ignores our feelings. It is very useful to ensure that
scientific measurements are taken accurately and so on, but as
far as life is concerned, it is a bit like turning the color off on
your TV so that you see everything in black and white and then
saying that is more truthful. It is not more truthful; it is just a
filter that reduces the richness of life. When
you turn down the feelings, you also turn down the possibility
of enjoyment.

#2014-A 수능 35번
Sometimes all the outcomes customers are trying to achieve
in one area have a negative effect on other outcomes. This is
very common when companies are busy listening to the ‘voice
of the customer.’ Traveling salespeople, for example, may say
they want a smaller cell phone, but they may not have thought
about how hard that tiny phone will be to use. Carpenters may
request a lightweight circular saw without thinking about the
fact that it will no longer have the power to get through some of
the more difficult jobs. When customers make requests for new
product features, they are usually focused on solving just one
problem and are not thinking of how their requested solution
will impact other product or service functions.
In this situation, customers request new features but reject the
resulting product when they realize the ramifications of their
suggestions ― the added feature turns out to be worthless
because of the problems it causes.

#2014-A 수능 36번
Self-monitoring refers to how much people try to control
the way they present themselves to others. Those who have
high self-monitoring want their behavior to be socially
acceptable. They adjust themselves to any social signal that
indicates appropriate or inappropriate behavior. For example,
if they are in a meeting and see others making suggestions,
they will try to make suggestions as well. They are also good
at managing what others think about them. In contrast, those
who have low self-monitoring are not very sensitive to signals
indicating socially acceptable behavior. They are not too
concerned about behaving the right way in a specific context.
For example, if they are in a meeting with the president of an
organization, they may act bored. They are not deeply
concerned about how others see them.

#2014-A 수능 42번
It is well known that some baseball parks are better for
hitting home runs than others. It is not just the size of the
park that matters. Other park conditions such as wind and
humidity also affect whether a ball sails over the fences, and
players know this. So what happens when a player is moved
to a team whose baseball park has better conditions for home
runs than his current one ― say, 28 percent better? One
analysis found that the player hit 60 percent more home runs.
Why? The answer lies in how achievable you think the goal
is. If you think you are likely to hit more home runs, you are
more likely to swing for the fences. But if you think your
chance of hitting a home run is smaller, your brain will send
you signals to just try for a single to get on base.
In business and life, just as in baseball, our perceptions
can affect whether we swing for the fences or not. The
baseball research shows us that what matters is not the actual
distance to the fence but what our brains recognize that
distance to be. Consider your work and your current life. Do
the fences seem too far away to hit a home run? Simply
adjust the fences so that it seems easier.

#2013 수능(지문 21, 30번 미해결)

#2013 수능 23번
To say that we need to curb anger and our negative
thoughts and emotions does not mean that we should deny
our feelings. There is an important distinction to be made
between denial and restraint. The latter constitutes a
deliberate and voluntarily adopted discipline based on an
appreciation of the benefits of doing so. This is very
different from the case of someone who suppresses
emotions such as anger out of a feeling that they need to
present a facade of self-control, or out of fear of what
others may think. Such behaviour is like closing a wound
which is still infected. We are not talking about
rule-following. Where denial and suppression occur, there
comes the danger that in doing so the individual stores up
anger and resentment. The trouble here is
that at some future point they may find they cannot
contain these feelings any longer.

#2013 수능 24번
Have you ever heard anyone say of a dog, “Well, he’s
very successful and lives in a beautiful house, but he’s
not very happy”? One reason most dogs are much happier
than most people is that dogs aren’t affected by external
circumstances the way we are. I notice that even when it’s
pouring rain outside, my dogs, Blue and Celeste, are still
excited to go for a walk. As soon as I open the front door
to look outside, they’re beside me in a flash, standing
expectantly, ready for an adventure. I usually wait for a
break in the downpour, and then we all dash out together.
The fact that the ground is wet and there are mud
puddles dotting the landscape means nothing to the dogs.
While I’m carefully picking my way around the wet
spots, the dogs are joyfully splashing right through them.
They aren’t afraid to get their paws dirty.

#2013 수능 25번
In Belding’s ground squirrels, males leave home and
females mature in their natal area. This male-biased dispersal
creates an imbalance in the way males and females are
related to those individuals around them ― females find
themselves surrounded by relatives, while males are generally
in areas with complete strangers. This asymmetry translates
into females who warn close kin by emitting alarm calls,
while males generally do not emit calls since their dispersal
from their natal areas means their blood kin typically do
not benefit from such a warning. Further support for the
kinship-based alarm-calling hypothesis includes Sherman’s
finding that in the rare instances when females do move
away from their natal groups and into groups with far fewer
relatives, they emit alarm calls less frequently than do native
females.

#2013 수능 26번
By likening the eye to a camera, elementary biology
textbooks help to produce a misleading impression of
what perception entails. Only in terms of the physics of
image formation do the eye and camera have anything in
common. Both eye and camera have a lens that focuses
light rays from the outside world into an image, and both
have a means of adjusting the focus and brightness of
that image. Both eye and camera have a light-sensitive
layer onto which the image is cast (the retina and film,
respectively). However, image formation is only the first
step towards seeing. Superficial analogies between the eye and a
camera obscure the much more fundamental difference between
the two, which is that the camera merely records an
image, whereas the visual system interprets it.

#2013 수능 27번
Recent evidence suggests that the common ancestor of
Neanderthals and modern people, living about 400,000
years ago, may have already been using pretty sophisticated
language. If language is based on genes and is the key to
cultural evolution, and Neanderthals had language, then
why did the Neanderthal toolkit show so little cultural
change? Moreover, genes would undoubtedly have changed
during the human revolution after 200,000 years ago, but
more in response to new habits than as causes of them. At
an earlier date, cooking selected mutations for smaller guts
and mouths, rather than vice versa. At a later date, milk
drinking selected for mutations for retaining lactose digestion
into adulthood in people of western European and East
African descent. The cultural horse comes before the genetic cart.
The appeal to a genetic change driving evolution gets
gene-culture co-evolution backwards: it is a top-down
explanation for a bottom-up process.

#2013 수능 28번
To describe what happens to common resources as a
result of human greed, Garrett Hardin used the example
of an area of pasture on which all the cattle-owners are
permitted to graze their animals free of charge. Each
cattle-owner seeks to maximize his gain and in doing so
considers the relative advantage and disadvantage of
adding one more animal to the herd. The advantage is
that the cattle-owner receives the whole of the profit
from the sale of the additional animal. The disadvantage
is that the extra grazing contributes to the deterioration of
the pasture. However, the disadvantage is shared among
all the cattle-owners using the pasture, so the individual
owner suffers only a fraction of the disadvantage.
Consequently, the advantage is bound to exceed the
disadvantage. Thus, it is inevitable that more and more
animals will be brought onto the pasture until overgrazing
totally destroys the pasture.

#2013 수능 29번
In physics, scientists invent models, or theories, to
describe and predict the data we observe about the
universe. Newton’s theory of gravity is one example;
Einstein’s theory of gravity is another. Those theories,
though they describe the same phenomenon, constitute
very different versions of reality. Newton, for example,
imagined that masses affect each other by exerting a
force, while in Einstein’s theory the effects occur through
a bending of space and time and there is no concept of
gravity as a force. Either theory could be employed to
describe, with great accuracy, the falling of an apple, but
Newton’s would be much easier to use. On the other hand, for
the calculations necessary for the satellite-based global
positioning system (GPS) that helps you navigate while
driving, Newton’s theory would give the wrong answer,
and so Einstein’s must be used.

#2013 수능 45번
“Why, in country after country that mandated seat
belts, was it impossible to see the promised reduction in
road accident fatalities?” John Adams, professor of
geography at University College London, wrote in one
of his many essays on risk. “It appears that measures
that protect drivers from the consequences of bad
driving encourage bad driving. The principal effect of
seat belt legislation has been a shift in the burden of
risk from those already best protected in cars, to the
most vulnerable, pedestrians and cyclists, outside cars.”
Adams started to group these counterintuitive findings
under the concept of risk compensation, the idea that
humans have an inborn tolerance for risk. As safety
features are added to vehicles and roads, drivers feel
less vulnerable and tend to take more chances. The
phenomenon can be observed in all aspects of our daily
lives. Children who wear protective gear during their
games have a tendency to take more physical risks.
Hikers take more risks when they think a rescuer can
access them easily.

According to John Adams, the phenomenon that safety
measures contribute tocareless driving may be accounted
for by the notion that a greater sense of security
tempts people to take more risks.

#2013 수능 47번
What should writers do when they’re teased by
intriguing but elusive ideas, by hints of thoughts that
seem too vague to be expressed in words? Edgar Allan
Poe’s advice is simple: They should pick up their pens
(or, he might add today, power up their laptops). Poe
dismisses the argument that any ideas are so deep or
subtle that they’re “beyond the compass of words.”
“For my own part,” he said in an 1846 article in
Graham’s Magazine, “I have never had a thought which
I could not set down in words, with even more
distinctness than that with which I conceived it.” The
“mere act” of writing, Poe believed, helps writers make
their ideas not only clearer but more logical. To use his
phrase, the process of writing contributes to “the
logicalization of thought.”
Whenever he felt dissatisfied with a vague “conception
of the brain,” Poe said, “I resort forthwith to the pen,
for the purpose of obtaining, through its aid, the
necessary form, consequence and precision.”
Today’s advocates of freewriting would probably agree
with Poe on this point. Sometimes, the best way to
resolve a dilemma ― whether it’s a writing dilemma or
a thinking dilemma ― is simply to start writing.

#2012 수능

#2012 수능 25번
What you do in the 15 to 30 minutes after eating your
evening meal sends powerful signals to your metabolism.
You’ll set the stage for more vigor throughout the evening
hours along with a weight-loss benefit if you stay active
after your meal. Among many possible activities, walking
is one of the easiest ways to get some minutes of exercise
after a meal. In fact, research shows that if you walk
after a meal, you may burn 15 percent more calories than
if you walk the same time, distance, and intensity on an
empty stomach.

#2012 수능 26번
Interestingly, people are more overconfident when they
feel like they have control of the outcome ― even when
this is clearly not the case. For example, it is documented
that if people are asked to bet on whether a coin toss is
heads or tails, most bet larger amounts if the coin is yet to
be tossed. If the coin is tossed and the outcome is concealed,
people will offer lower amounts when asked for bets. People
act as if their involvement will somehow affect the outcome of the
toss. In this case, control of the outcome is clearly an illusion.
This perception occurs in investing, as well. Even without
information, people believe the stocks they own will
perform better than stocks they do not own. However,
ownership of a stock only gives the illusion of having
control of the performance of the stock.

#2012 수능 27번
The truth is that everyone has a story. Every person
we meet has a story that can, in some way, inform us
and help us as we live the story of our own lives. When
we acknowledge this truth and begin to look at others as
potential sources of valuable information, we open ourselves
up to new possibilities in our lives. In reality, the people
who are most different from us probably have the most
to teach us. The more we surround ourselves with people
who are the same as we are, who hold the same views,
and who share the same values, the greater the likelihood
that we will shrink as human beings rather than grow.

#2012 수능 28번
Although there are numerous explanations for the fall
of the Roman empire, the deeper cause lies in the declining
fertility of its soil and the decrease in agricultural yields.
Italy was densely forested at the beginning of Roman
rule. By the end of the Roman Imperium, however, Italy
had been stripped of forest cover. The timber was sold
on the open market and the soil converted to crops and
pastureland. The cleared soil was rich in minerals and
nutrients and provided substantial production yields.
Unfortunately, deforestation left the soil exposed to harsh
weather. Wind blew across the barren landscapes and
water ran down from the mountaintops and slopes, taking
the soil with them. Overgrazing of livestock resulted in
further deterioration of the soil. Consequently, Rome’s
agricultural production could not provide sufficient energy
to maintain its infrastructure and the welfare of its
citizens.

#2012 수능 29번
The identical claim, expressed in two social contexts,
may have different qualifiers. When talking among
friends, you might say, “Lucé is the world’s finest
restaurant.” When speaking to a group of French chefs,
you might find yourself saying, “Lucé is an excellent
restaurant, comparable to some of the best in France.”
Why did you say it differently? Perhaps because you
expected a different critical scrutiny in the two groups.
Maybe because your confidence in the claim was strong
enough for friends but not as strong among the most
knowledgeable. In each instance, you communicated the
extent to which you wanted to qualify your claim, to
guard yourself by restricting the extent to which you are
willing to be held accountable for the claim.

#2012 수능 30번
Often in social scientific practice, even where evidence
is used, it is not used in the correct way for adequate
scientific testing. In much of social science, evidence is
used only to affirm a particular theory ― to search for
the positive instances that uphold it. But these are easy
to find and lead to the familiar dilemma in the social
sciences where we have two conflicting theories, each of
which can claim positive empirical evidence in its support
but which come to opposite conclusions. How should we
decide between them? Here the scientific use of evidence
may help. For what is distinctive about science is the
search for negative instances ― the search for ways to
falsify a theory, rather than to confirm it. The real power
of scientific testability is negative, not positive. Testing
allows us not merely to confirm our theories but to
weed out those that do not fit the evidence.

#2012 수능 31번
The term euphemism derives from a Greek word meaning
‘to speak with good words’ and involves substituting a
more pleasant, less objectionable way of saying something
for a blunt or more direct way. Why do people use
euphemisms? They do so probably to help smooth out the
‘rough edges’ of life, to make the unbearable bearable
and the offensive inoffensive. However, euphemisms
can become dangerous when they are used to create
misperceptions of important issues. For example, a politician
may indicate that one of his statements was ‘somewhat at
variance with the truth,’ meaning that he lied. Even more
serious examples include describing rotting slums as
‘substandard housing,’ making the miserable conditions
appear reasonable and the need for action less important.

#2012 수능 45번
Mediation is a process that has much in common with
advocacy but is also crucially different. It parallels
advocacy in so far as it tends to involve a process of
negotiation, but differs in so far as mediation involves
adopting a neutral role between two opposing parties
rather than taking up the case of one party against
another. At times, particularly in very complex
situations, the processes of advocacy and mediation can
overlap, perhaps with very problematic results, as one
loses clarity over his or her role. It is therefore
important, if not essential, to maintain a clear focus in
undertaking advocacy or mediation in order to ensure
that the roles do not become blurred and therefore
potentially counterproductive. For example, a mediator
who ‘takes sides’ is likely to lose all credibility, as is
an advocate who seeks to adopt a neutral position.

Although both deal with negotiation, a mediator needs
to maintain neutrality and an advocate partiality in
order to avoid crossing over into each other’s role.

#2012 수능 50번
Since the beginning of time, the mysterious nature of
dreaming has led people to believe that dreams were
messages from the other world. Dreams have been regarded
as prophetic communications which, when properly decoded,
would enable us to foretell the future. There is, however,
absolutely no scientific evidence for this theory. It is
certainly true that individuals who are concerned about a
traumatic event, such as the threat of the loss of a loved
one who is sick, will dream about that loved one more
than would otherwise be the case. If the dreamer then calls
and finds that the loved one has died, it is understandable
for him or her to assume that the dream was a premonition
of that death. But this is a mistake. It is simply a(n)
correspondence between a situation about coincidental
which one has intense concern and the occurrence of the
event that one fears.
To prove the existence of premonitory dreams, scientific
evidence must be obtained. We would need to do studies
in which individuals are sampled in terms of their dream
life and judges are asked to make correspondences between
these dream events and events that occurred in real life. A
problem that arises here is that individuals who believe in
premonitory dreams may give one or two striking examples
of ‘hits,’ but they never tell you how many of their
premonitory dreams ‘missed.’ To do a scientific study of
dream prophecy, we would need to establish some base of
how commonly coincidental correspondences occur between
dream and waking reality. Until we have that evidence,
it is better to believe that the assumption is false.

#2011 수능

#2011 수능 24번
In a classic set of studies over a ten-year period, biologist
Gerald Wilkinson found that, when vampire bats return to
their communal nests from a successful night’s foraging, they
frequently vomit blood and share it with other nest-mates,
including even non-relatives. The reason, it turns out, is that
blood-sharing greatly improves each bat’s chances of survival.
A bat that fails to feed for two nights is likely to die.
Wilkinson showed that the blood donors are typically sharing
their surpluses and, in so doing, are saving unsuccessful
foragers that are close to starvation. So the costs are
relatively low and the benefits are relatively high. Since no
bat can be certain of success on any given night, it is likely
that the donor will itself eventually need help from some
nest-mate. In effect, the vampire bats have created a kind
of mutual insurance system.

#2011 수능 25번
One of the little understood paradoxes in communication
is that the more difficult the word, the shorter the
explanation. The more meaning you can pack into a single
word, the fewer words are needed to get the idea across. Big
words are resented by persons who don’t understand them
and, of course, very often they are used to confuse and
impress rather than clarify. But this is not the fault of
language; it is the arrogance of the individual who misuses
the tools of communication. The best reason for acquiring a
large vocabulary is that it keeps you from being long-winded. A
genuinely educated person can express himself tersely and trimly.
For example, if you don’t know, or use, the word ‘imbricate,’
you have to say to someone, ‘having the edges overlapping
in a regular arrangement like tiles on a roof, scales on a
fish, or sepals on a plant.’ More than 20 words to say what
can be said in one.

#2011 수능 26번
So far as you are wholly concentrated on bringing about
a certain result, clearly the quicker and easier it is brought
about the better. Your resolve to secure a sufficiency of
food for yourself and your family will induce you to spend
weary days in tilling the ground and tending livestock; but
if Nature provided food and meat in abundance ready for
the table, you would thank Nature for sparing you much
labor and consider yourself so much the better off. An
executed purpose, in short, is a transaction in which the time
and energy spent on the execution are balanced against the
resulting assets, and the ideal case is one in which
the former approximates to zero and the latter to infinity.
Purpose, then, justifies the
efforts it exacts only conditionally, by their fruits.

#2011 수능 27번
Psychologist Solomon Asch wanted to discover whether
people’s tendency to agree with their peers was stronger
than their tendency toward independent thought and rational
judgment. Asch assembled groups of twelve university
students and announced that they were taking part in an
experiment on visual perception. He showed them three line
segments, and asked each one in turn which line was the
longest. It was an easy task and the correct answer was
obvious. However, Asch had secretly instructed all but the
last person in each group, who was the real subject of the
experiment, to say that the medium-length line was the
longest. As it turned out, over 70 percent of the real subjects
caved in to group pressure and said that the medium-length
line was the longest.

#2011 수능 28번
Journeys are the midwives of thought. Few places are
more conducive to internal conversations than a moving plane,
ship, or train. There is an almost peculiar correlation between
what is in front of our eyes and the thoughts we are able to
have in our heads: large thoughts at times requiring large
views, new thoughts new places. Introspective reflections
which are liable to stall are helped along by the flow of the
landscape.
The mind may be reluctant to think properly when thinking
is all it is supposed to do. The task can be as paralyzing as
having to tell a joke or mimic an accent on demand. Thinking
improves when parts of the mind are given other tasks, are
charged with listening to music or following a line of trees.

#2011 수능 29번
It is a fundamental mistake to imagine that when we see
the non-value in a value or the untruth in a truth, the value
or the truth ceases to exist. It has only become relative.
Everything human is relative, because everything rests on
an inner polarity; for everything is a phenomenon of energy.
Energy necessarily depends on a pre-existing polarity, without
which there could be no energy. There must always be high
and low, hot and cold, etc., so that the equilibrating
process ― which is energy ― can take place. Therefore the
tendency to deny all previous values in favor of their
opposites is just as much of an exaggeration as the earlier
onesidedness. And in so far as it is a question of rejecting
universally accepted and indubitable values, the result is a
fatal loss.

#2011 수능 33번
No matter how good your product is, remember that
perfection of an existing product is not necessarily the best
investment one can make. For example, the Erie Canal, which
took four years to build, was regarded as the height of
efficiency in its day. What its builders had not considered
was that the advent of the railroad would assure the canal’s
instant downfall. By the time the canal was finished, the
railroad had been established as the fittest technology for
transportation. Likewise, when the fuel cell becomes the
automotive engine of choice, the car companies focusing on
increasing the efficiency of the internal combustion engine
may find themselves left behind. Is it time to keep making
what you are making? Or is it time to create a new niche?
Innovation requires noticing signals outside the company
itself: signals in the community, the environment, and the
world at large.

#2011 수능 45번
Unlike the modern society, the primitive society has
less specialized knowledge to transmit, and since its way
of life is enacted before the eyes of all, it has no need
to create a separate institution of education such as the
school. Instead, the child acquires the heritage of his
culture by observing and imitating adults in such activities
as rituals, hunts, festivals, cultivation, and harvesting.
As a result, there is little or none of that alienation of
young from old so marked in modern industrial societies.
A further reason for this alienation in modern societies
is that in his conception of reality the modern adult owes
less to his direct experience and more to the experience
of his culture than does primitive man. Clearly, his debt
to culture will vary with the nature of his education.
Hence, the contemporary child must travel much further
than the offspring of primitive man to acquire the world
view of his elders. He is, therefore, that much more
removed from the adults of his society.

Unlike the primitive child who learns from his immediate
surroundings, the modern child learns in educational
institutions, which results in alienation from his elders.

#2011 수능 47번
Many people believe that it is critical to share similar, if
not identical, beliefs and values with someone with whom
they have a relationship. While this may seem preferable, it
is far from mandatory. Individuals from extremely diverse
backgrounds have learned to overlook their differences and
live harmonious, loving lives together. I’ve seen people
from opposite ends of the spectrum economically and
politically that ended up in happy, lasting marriages. I’ve
seen couples from different ethnic groups merge into
harmonious relationships, and I’ve seen people from
different religions come together for a strong, lasting bond.
Furthermore, many good friends have little in common
except a warm loving feeling of respect and rapport.
That’s the only essential thing.
People who enjoy the best relationships with others, who
live life with the least frustration regarding their differences,
have learned that differences are to be expected, a fact of
life. This understanding must go beyond a mere intellectual
‘I know we’re all different.’ You must truly own this idea
and incorporate it into your daily life.
The way I see it, we have only two realistic choices.
We can resist the principle of separate realities and
remain frustrated and angry over the fact that no one
seems to conform to our way of thinking, or we can
strive to understand what in Eastern philosophy is called
‘the way of things.’ Separate realities is the way things
really are. Everyone is unique and has different gifts to
offer. When we look for these gifts we will surely find
them ― and in doing so, we will open the door to a world
of personal growth.

#2010 수능

#2010 수능 24번
In this modern world, people are not used to living with
discomfort. We expect immediate results and satisfaction.
We want answers faster than they can be delivered. There
is twenty-four-hour repair and round-the-clock shopping.
If we are hungry, there is always food available, from
microwave dinners to all-night grocery stores and
restaurants. People no longer know how to wait, or even
what waiting means. It is nice to have what you want when
you want it, but the ability to delay satisfaction is important.
Patience is clearly an important virtue, yet
so many people stand in front of their microwaves thinking
“Hurry up!”

#2010 수능 25번
The goal of medicine as it is currently practiced is to
develop procedures and drugs that work equally well on
all patients, regardless of gender, age, or genetics. It
derives from the prevalent belief that all of us are similar
bio-mechanical units that rolled off the same assembly line
― a most imperfect conception of human beings that limits
conventional medicine’s effectiveness. The doctor of the future,
however, needs to practice medicine in fundamentally
different ways. One of the most important shifts will be an
increased recognition of patient individuality, a concept
now largely ignored. Instead of treating different patients
that display similar symptoms with the same drugs,
doctors should identify root causes of disease to come up
with a personalized treatment.

#2010 수능 26번
For the most part, we like things that are familiar to us.
To prove the point to yourself, try a little experiment. Get
the negative of an old photograph that shows a front view
of your face and have it developed into a pair of pictures ―
one that shows you as you actually look and one that
shows a reverse image so that the right and left sides of
your face are interchanged. Now decide which version of
your face you like better and ask a good friend to make
the choice, too. If you are like most people, you should
notice something odd: Your friend will prefer the true
print, but you will prefer the reverse image. Why? Because
you both will be responding favorably to the more familiar
face ― your friend to the one the world sees and you to the
reversed one you find in the mirror every day.

#2010 수능 27번
The human auditory system has its
own version of perceptual completion.
A psychologist named Richard Warren demonstrated this
particularly well. He recorded a sentence and cut out a
piece of the sentence from the recording tape. He replaced
the missing piece with a burst of static of the same
duration. Nearly everyone who heard the altered recording
could report that they heard both a sentence and static. But
a majority of people could not tell where the static was!
The auditory system had filled in the missing speech
information, so that the sentence seemed uninterrupted. Most
people reported that there was static and that it existed
apart from the spoken sentence. The static and the sentence
formed separate perceptual streams due to differences in the
quality of sound that caused them to group separately.

#2010 수능 28번
Not all authors trusted that the theater audience would
automatically understand their plays in the intended
manner. Thus, they repeatedly attempted to make it clear to
their public that visiting the theater was not merely for the
purpose of entertainment, but rather to draw lessons from
the play offered onstage. It was, therefore, important for
the viewer to create a distance from the actions on the stage
so as to facilitate interpretation of the content.
This idea was developed by
Bertolt Brecht with his ‘epic theater,’ which used alienation
as a strategy to prevent the identification of the public with
the figures of the drama. Through scattered narration and
commentary throughout the play, for example, the viewers
are invited to take a step back from the performance. In
this way, they are given hints to better understand the play
while the conclusion is left open so as to leave them to
draw their own conclusions.

#2010 수능 45번
Many years ago, psychologists performed an
experiment in which they put a number of people in a
room, alone except for a ring toss set. It was one of those
children’s toys with a short wooden post held upright on
the floor and a bunch of round rings. The subjects were
left alone to amuse themselves as best they could. As
expected, with time to kill, they began trying to toss the
rings around the post. What the psychologists discovered
was that most of the people moved far enough away from
the post so that tossing the rings around it was
challenging but not so difficult as to be totally frustrating.
In other words, they deliberately positioned themselves
between frustration on the one hand and boredom on the
other. The process of alternately producing and relieving
tension was what made the activity stimulating.

Subjects tended to make a ring toss activity stimulating
by producing just enough tension through varying the
distance to the post so as to balance frustration and
boredom.

#2010 수능 47번
On the wall of our dining room was a framed quotation:
“Let me live in a house by the side of the road and be a
friend to man.” It inspired in me countless childhood
daydreams about meeting new people from exotic places.
I was a child who desperately wanted to connect with
others. We did live ‘by the side of the road’ ― on Route 9
between Keene and Portsmouth ― but in a place so
remote it was extremely difficult to be a ‘friend to man.’
One day when our family drove into town, I focused
intently on the big, paper, grocery store signs advertising the
same type of produce that we grew: ‘carrots, 50 cents a
bunch,’ ‘tomatoes, 99 cents a pound.’ Meanwhile, I thought
of how the type of ‘imperfect’ produce we ate for dinner,
just as healthy as that sold at the store, was often tossed
on the compost heap or left in the ground.
The unattractive produce such as crooked carrots and
odd-looking tomatoes was not valuable to the grocery
store, where only ‘perfect’ produce was sold. But I knew
they would have value to people who would chop them
into salads or soups, can them, or use them to make pies,
because that is what our family did with them. They were
fresh and clean and came straight from the good earth.
Why couldn’t others also benefit from that value? I could
save people the trouble of going into the store by making
my produce accessible at the side of the road, and that
would provide value, too. Surely I could convince people
to pay half of what the grocery store charged and to feel
lucky about the bargain. Suddenly, I saw a connection
between those bumpy vegetables on our table and the
quotation on the wall; I found a way to satisfy my longing
for new friends. These homely fruits and vegetables
would become my golden apples.

#2010 수능 49번
A friend of mine and his wife were in Hawaii, standing
on a beach, watching a beautiful sunset ― hardly able to
believe how magnificent the sight was. A woman
approached them and overheard my friend’s wife say,
“I can’t believe how beautiful this is.” While walking away
from the spectacular display, the woman said, “You
should have seen it in Tahiti.”
When your attention is not on the present moment but
on something else, you will tend to compare even good experiences with others, as the Tahiti traveler did,
or you will wonder about future
experiences instead of enjoying the present one, and regret
past experiences because they are already over. But as you
learn to bring your attention back to the here and now,
life will come alive again, providing the enjoyment and
satisfaction it was meant to. Thus, when you live in the
present moment, one of the nice things that happens to you
is that ordinary, everyday life takes on a new significance.
Taking walks, watching a sunset, gardening, reading a
book, all begin to feel special. When your attention is
brought back to the here and now, you engage in life rather
than think about life.

#2009 수능

#2009 수능 24번
While the fine art object is valued because it is
unique, it is also valued because it can be reproduced
for popular consumption. For example, Van Gogh’s paintings
have been reproduced endlessly on posters, postcards,
coffee mugs, and T-shirts. Ordinary consumers can own a
copy of the highly valued originals. Therefore, the value of
the original results not only from its uniqueness but from
its being the source from which reproductions are made.
The manufacturers who produce art reproductions and the
consumers who purchase and display them give value to
the work of art by making it available to many people as
an item of popular culture.

#2009 수능 25번
There are some people who believe that no one should
be trusted. They usually feel this way because their
behavior compels others to lie to them. In other words,
they make it difficult for others to tell them the truth
because they respond rudely or emotionally to people who
tell the truth. If others see how angry, hurt, or hateful you
become when they tell you the truth, they will avoid telling
it to you at all costs. If you are known as someone who is
easily offended, you will never know what others are really
thinking or feeling because they will distort the truth
to escape from your negative reaction. If you demand that
children tell you the truth and then punish them because it
is not very satisfying, you teach them to lie to you to
protect themselves.

#2009 수능 26번
One of the main principles I follow when I draw outside
is not to select a subject that is too difficult or odd.
I try to stay away
from houses or barns that have unusual angles of the roof,
or objects that look incorrect in size, perspective, or design.
If the subject is confusing when you look at it, it will be
more confusing when you attempt to draw it. I know a
beautiful barn where the corners are not at right angles. No
matter how many times I have drawn it, the perspective does
not look right. If I were to make an accurate drawing of this
barn and put it in a show, I’m sure I would get all kinds of
criticism for my poor perspective. I would not be there to
tell my critics that the barn is actually constructed this way.
So, I stay away from subjects that do not look right to me.

#2009 수능 27번
When faced with things that are too big to sense, we
comprehend them by adding knowledge to the experience.
The first appearance of a shining star in a darkening
evening sky can take you out into the universe if you
combine what you see with the twin facts that the star is
merely one of the closest of the galaxy’s 200 billion stars
and that its light began traveling decades ago. The smell of
gasoline going into a car’s tank during a refueling stop,
when combined with the fact that each day nearly a billion
gallons of crude oil are refined and used in the United
States, can allow our imagination to spread outward into the
vast global network of energy trade and politics.

#2009 수능 31번
Sheets of paper exist almost entirely for the purpose of
carrying information, so we tend to think of them as
neutral objects. We rarely interpret marks on paper as
references to the paper itself. However, when we see the
text, characters, and images on artifacts that serve other
purposes, we generally interpret these marks as labels that
do refer to their carriers. Natural objects do not come with
labels, of course, but these days, most physical artifacts
do. That is, their designers have chosen to shift part of
the burden of communication from the form and materials
of the artifact itself to lightweight surface symbols. So, for
example, a designer of door handles might not worry about
communicating their functions through their shapes, but
might simply mark them ‘push’ and ‘pull.

#2009 수능 45번
Everywhere in the world, the issue of how to manage
urban growth poses the highest stakes, complex policy
decisions, and strongly heated conflicts in the public
area. The contrast between Western Europe and America
is particularly sharp. In Western Europe, steep gasoline
taxes, investment policies favoring built-up areas over
undeveloped greenfields, continuous investment in public
transportation, and other policies have produced relatively
compact cities. Cities in Western Europe tend to be
economically healthy compared with their suburbs. By
contrast, in the United States, cheap gas, massive
highway investment, policies that favor construction on
the edges of cities, and heavy reliance on property taxes
to fund public schools have encouraged much more
car-reliant and spread-out urban areas, where eight in ten
Americans now live.

Different public policies resulted in relatively centralized
cities in Western Europe but resulted in spread-out urban
areas in the United States.

#2009 수능 50번
Some scientists have shown the practical power of
looking at the world through ‘could-be’ eyes. When a
group of students were shown an unfamiliar rubbery
object and told, “This could be a dog’s chewy toy,”
they were later able to see that it might also be of use
as an eraser when they made some pencil mistakes. In
contrast, students who were told that it was a dog’s
chewy toy did not find its alternative use.
Another group of students watched a video about
physics after being told, “This presents only one of
several outlooks on physics. Please feel free to use any
additional methods you want to assist you in solving the
problems.” On tests of factual comprehension, these
students performed no differently from students who had
watched the video with a different introduction: “This
presents the outlook on physics. Please use the method
you see in the video in solving the problems.” But
when they were faced with questions that asked them to
use the information more creatively, the ‘could-be’
students performed much better than the others. Just a
simple change of language seemed to invite the
students to process and store information in a much
more flexible format, and thus be able to look at it and
make use of it in different ways.

#2008 수능

#2008 수능 24번
A clean sheet of paper is lying in front of you, and you
have to fill it up. Suddenly, your mind may seem as blank
as the paper. What can you do to set your pen in motion?
The answer is simple: Don’t be caught in the perfection
trap. That is, if you can convince yourself that the first
draft isn’t your best writing and can be made more
effective with additional thought and some revision, then it
will be easier to get started. When starting, don’t worry
about what the reader will think about what you have
written. Make writing as easy for you as you can by not
being concerned with how good the first draft is. There
will be time for revising and polishing any ideas you want
to pursue later.

#2008 수능 25번
When people began to bind books with pages that could
be turned rather than unrolled like papyrus, the process of
locating information changed. Now the reader could easily
move backward in the text to find a previously read
passage or browse between widely separated sections of the
same work. With one technological change, cross-referencing
became possible, while the physical space needed to house
a collection of books was sharply reduced. Page numbers
became a possibility, as did indexes; tables of contents
became workable references.

#2008 수능 26번
What is the most prevalent and perhaps most important
prefix of our times? The answer should be multi, which means
‘more than one.’ Our modern jobs are increasingly requiring
multi-tasking. Our communities are getting multi-cultural. Our
entertainment is multi-media. While detailed knowledge of a
single area once guaranteed success, today the top rewards
go to those who can operate with equal confidence in
different realms. Let us call these people boundary crossers.
They develop expertise in multiple areas, they speak
different languages, and they find joy in the rich variety
of human experience. They live multi-lives because that is more
interesting and, nowadays, more effective.

#2008 수능 27번
Night diving is obviously less simple than diving during
the day, but when properly organized, it is relatively
straightforward. A powerful flashlight will easily light your
way and the creatures around you, revealing marine life in
its true colors. However, if you cover up your flashlight,
you will be surprised at how much light there is underwater.
Many creatures use phosphorescence at night, and as you
move through the water, you will cause plankton to release tiny
pulses of light, leaving beautiful glowing wakes trailing behind you.

#2008 수능 31번
One key social competence is how well or poorly
people express their own feelings. Paul Ekman uses the
term ‘display rules’ for the social agreement about which
feelings can be properly shown when. Cultures sometimes
vary tremendously in this regard. For example, Ekman
and his colleagues in an Asian country studied the facial
reactions of students to a horrific film about a teenage
Aboriginal ritual ceremony. When the students watched
the film with an authority figure present, their faces
showed only the slightest hints of reaction. However,
when they thought they were alone (though they were
being taped by a secret camera) their faces twisted into
vivid mixes of uncomfortable feelings.

#2008 수능 45번
With the rise of the social sciences, and especially the
anthropology of the 1930s and thereafter, words like
‘savage’ and ‘primitive’ began to disappear from the
vocabulary of cultural studies, along with the notion that
the people who had once borne these labels represented
a biologically less evolved form of humanity. Medical
science could find no difference in the brains of the
former primitives to account for their different behavior;
colonists necessarily observed that yesterday’s ‘savage’
might be today’s shopkeeper, soldier, or servant. As
humanity began to look more like a family of potential
equals, Westerners had to accept that the behavior
found in native cultures was not the distinctive feature
of savage ‘otherness’ but the expression of a capacity
that may exist, for better or for worse, in all of us.

Westerners came to admit that their view toward the
distinctive behavior found in native cultures was biased.

#2008 수능 50번
In ordinary life, you can be very comfortable
with modern technology. Just as people search for books in
bookstores, you can find and select what you want with a
computer. You have already seen how much modern
technology has changed the world. You can talk to each
other in real time, looking at each other on a palm-sized
phone. In the near future, I believe that most people will
wear user-friendly computer equipment making their daily
lives even more convenient. This would give us the chance
to find information quickly and communicate with others
no matter where we are or what we are doing.

The latest devices are fun to use for many
tasks like browsing cyber space, but it is important to keep
your distance from them as well. The constant noises of
electronic devices like computers, mobile phones, fax
machines, stereos, and home appliances will drown out the
sounds of the birds singing in the morning, the wind
blowing through the trees, or a pencil drawing on rough
paper. Modern technology is addictive, so be sure to plan
days away from its electromagnetic fields. Go out into
nature and leave your mobile phone behind. Or just turn
everything off and enjoy the peace and quiet.

#2007 수능

#2007 수능 24번
Walking down the street, you may not even notice the
trees, but, according to a new study, they do a lot more
than give shade. Environmental scientists chose two Chicago
public housing projects, both of which had some buildings
with lots of trees nearby, and some with practically none.
According to the study, violence and property crimes were
nearly twice as high in sections of the buildings where
vegetation was low, compared with the sections where
vegetation was high. Why? One explanation: Greenery creates
a natural gathering space for neighbors and, ultimately,
stronger bias in the community. This can also create
an atmosphere where children are better supervised, and
buildings better watched.

#2007 수능 25번
People tend to stick to their first impressions, even if
they are wrong. Suppose you mention the name of your
new neighbor to a friend. “Oh, I know him,” your friend
replies. “He seems nice at first, but it’s all an act.” Perhaps
this evaluation is groundless. The neighbor may have
changed since your friend knew him, or perhaps your
friend’s judgment is simply unfair. Whether the judgment is
accurate or not, once you accept it, it will probably
influence the way you respond to the neighbor. Even if this
neighbor were a saint, you would be likely to interpret his
behavior in ways that fit your expectation.

#2007 수능 26번
A common mistake in talking to celebrities is to assume
that they don’t know much about anything else except their
occupations. In fact, the movie business and the athletic
world are full of intelligent, educated, and informed men and
women who are interested and involved in a wide variety of
activities and causes. Yet they are asked only about acting or
sports. If you happen to know about the celebrity’s
‘extracurricular’ interest, you might find he or she will speak
to you about it much more freely than about his or her
professional life. For example, ask Paul Newman, the
famous actor, about his charity work with kids.

#2007 수능 27번
Upon entering a record store, one encounters a wide
variety of genres from easy listening to jazz and classical
music. Jazz and classical music have a number of things in
common. However, they also have a number of differences.
Before sound recording, classical music was passed down
through written scores, whereas early jazz mainly relied on
live performance. The composers are in control in classical
music; they write the musical notes along with detailed
instructions. In jazz, on the contrary, the performers often
improvise their own melodies. In sum, classical music and
jazz both aim to provide a depth of expression and detail,
but they achieve their goal through different approaches.

#2007 수능 34번
Design and styling cannot be fully understood outside of
their social, economic, political, cultural, and technological
contexts. For example, the cycles of Western economies
during the 20th century had a significant impact on the
prevalence of objects that emphasized design over styling
and the other way round. While design and styling are
interrelated, they are completely distinct fields. Styling is
concerned with surface treatment and appearance, the
expressive qualities of a product. Design, on the other hand, is
primarily concerned with problem solving, the function of
a product. It generally seeks simplification and essentiality.

#2007 수능 45번
People who run sports camps think of the children
first. They do their best to create enjoyable and protective
environments in which the children feel comfortable and
safe. Unfortunately, some sports coaches in the camps
occasionally become over-enthusiastic in their desire to
help the children excel. As a result, they put pressure
on them to perform at high levels, win at all costs, and
keep playing, even when they get hurt. This ‘no pain,
no gain’ approach is extremely stressful, and leads to
unnecessary injuries. Parents should therefore take care
when they send their children to a sports camp, and
should talk with the sports coaches to see if they will
respect the children’s wishes.

In choosing the most suitable sports camp for
their children, parents should make sure that the coaches
have caring attitudes to children.

#2006 수능(스캔)

#2005 수능

#2005 수능 26번
Since it manufactured its first car in 1955, Korea has
grown to be the sixth largest automobile producer in the
world. It is expected to be among the world s top four
auto-making countries by 2010 after the U.S., Japan, and
Germany, owing to its competitiveness in small car
manufacturing, skilled human workforce, and leading
information technology. With an expected production of
6.5 million units in 2010, Korea will hold 10 percent of
the global auto market.

#2005 수능 27번
Mathematics definitely influenced Renaissance art.
Renaissance art was different from the art in the Middle
Ages in many ways. Prior to the Renaissance, obj ects in
paintings were flat and symbolic rather than real in
appearance. Artists during the Renaissance reformed
painting. They wanted obj ects in paintings to be
represented with accuracy. Mathematics was used to
portray the essential form of obj ects in perspective, as
they appeared to the human eye. Renaissance artists
achieved perspective using geometry, which resulted in a
naturalistic, precise, three-dimensional representation of
the real world. The application of mathematics to art,
particularly in paintings, was one of the primary
characteristics of Renaissance art.

#2005 수능 28번
The number of foreigners interested in the Korean
language has increased dramatically over the past few
years because of the success of Korean firms overseas
and growing interest in Korean culture. For example,
many Chinese students have become interested in Korean
as they plan to work for Korean firms, which offer
better opportunities and pay. The total number of foreign
students attending Korean language programs has
increased to more than 30,000 in Seoul alone this year
from about 4,700 at the end of last year. People speaking
Korean have long been limited mostly to those from the
peninsula. It is no wonder few people ever imagined that
the country s language might one day become popular in the
international community.

#2005 수능 29번
A long time ago, a dissatisfied horse asked the gods
for longer, thinner legs, a neck like a swan, and a saddle
that would grow upon him. Right away, the merciful
gods changed him into a creature having all the new
features. But although they had looked attractive
separately, the entire assembly shocked him, for he found
that he had been changed into an ugly camel. There
now, said the gods, all your wishes are granted, and
you will now live as you ve wished all your life.
Remember! Not all change is good. You should be satisfied
with what you have.

#2005 수능 36번
You may have had this experience. A person calls you
on the telephone. Apparently assuming you will recognize
her voice, she does not provide any verbal content which
would help you identify her. For example, you pick up
the phone and say, Hello, and the voice on the other
end says, Hi, how are you doing? At this point you
realize you don t know who it is! So you try to extend
the conversation without admitting your ignorance, hoping
some verbal clues will be given or that you ll eventually
recognize the caller s voice. As a result, you say
something like, "Fine. What have you been up to?"

In the beginning of telephone conversations,
voice as well as verbal clues plays important
roles in identifying callers.

#2005 수능 37번
The adult forgets the troubles of his youth. Comparing
the remembered carefree past with his immediate
problems, the mature man thinks that troubles belong only
to the present. The twelve-year-old, the adult thinks, does
not worry about salary or professional advancement.
When the roof leaks, only the parent worries about what
contractor to employ or about how he will repair it
himself. To the adult, then, childhood is a time of
freedom. The child, however, wishes always to be a man.
He finds freedom in the future. To him, adulthood is a
time of wealth, and his father or mother never needs to
worry about saving to buy a bicycle.

Happiness is too seldom found in the present; it is
remembered as a thing of the past or looked forward to as a part
of the future.

#2005 수능 48번
Perhaps the greatest thing about being a devoted
operagoer is that there is so much room for growth.
Although you have heard an opera once, you can still hear
it five or twenty times more. I have heard at least twenty
performances of my favorite operas, and I would happily
hear them twenty more times. With each rehearing, you
refine what you know. The better you know an
opera, the more you will be challenged by the ideas of
new singers, conductors, directors, and designers.
Your first experience with Rigoletto and Tosca is only
your introduction to those masterpieces. Each time you
hear a different singer in any of the key roles, you are
hearing a new interpretation. Even the same singer will
vary on two different occasions. Artists grow and change
in their approach to a character based on their own life
experiences and their moods. For example, I saw a
famous soprano from Eastern Europe sing Tosca twice
within ten months. The first time was a good, honest
performance that pleased the audience. The second was
impressive. Between the performances, the singer s
husband had suddenly died. The love scenes in the second
performance seemed much more moving, and her
response to the death of her lover was undeniably
charming.

#2004 수능

#2004 수능 22번
Teens surround themselves with imaginary audiences.
They imagine others are as interested in them as they
are in themselves. Believing that everyone is watching
them, teenagers are extremely self-conscious. A young
boy, for example, may believe that he is unattractive
because of his nose. Nothing can convince him that
other people are paying no attention to his nose at all.
Also, when chatting with friends, some teenage girls are
too expressive, talking and laughing loudly, playing to
their unreal audiences. They gradually realize, however,
that others are not really interested in them. Teenagers
behavior changes when they realize others are too busy
with their own lives to be watching them.

#2004 수능 23번
Professional athletes do not agree on what their roles should be.
Some star players believe that their role is to be a great
player, not a role model for young people. They insist,
We re not paid to be role models. They strongly
believe that what they do in their private lives is their
own business. On the contrary, other star players
disagree. They maintain that sports stars are role models
for people even though they may not want to be. They
say, We do not choose to be role models. We are
chosen. Our choice is whether to be good role models or
bad ones.

#2004 수능 24번
Some Korean artists suggest that the process of making
hanj i, hand-made Korean paper, reflects human life. In
fact, you might say that people s day-to-day existence is
shown in this paper-making process. The process starts
when the branches of a tree are cut off. The branches then
go through a complex process to become strong and
flexible paper. They are steamed, boiled, and then washed
many times to remove any impure materials. They are also
beaten for several hours. The more they are beaten, the
stronger they actually become. This is similar to people
getting wiser and more disciplined by overcoming the
difficulties and hardships they encounter day after day.

#2004 수능 25번
Different groups develop ideas in different ways. In
successful groups, individuals are encouraged to produce
imaginative and original ideas and share them with others.
In unsuccessful groups, individual members are not
encouraged to do so. Instead, they are always asked to do
groupthink. In the beginning, there are no differences in
the abilities and qualities among the members of these two
kinds of groups. However, in the end, the groups which
encourage individual members to think creatively will prosper,
whereas those which do not will fail. Therefore, group
leaders must learn this lesson and put it into practice in
order to achieve productive and positive results.

#2004 수능 26번
Many difficulties and much stress today come from
our thinking that there is not enough time. Time itself
remains unchanged in the sense that it carries on in the
same way as it has for millions of years. We need to
see that it is circumstances that are different and that
our increased workloads put too much pressure upon us.
However, most of us try to adjust our attitudes and
behaviors to a rapid pace of living and working. The
secret lies not in finding smart ways to do more, but in
how we manage the relationship between the things we
have to do and the time available to do them in.

#2004 수능 33번
Many people went outside around August 27 this year to
observe the close encounter between Earth and Mars. On
August 27, when Mars was closer to Earth than ever in human
history, the one-way travel time of light was just 3
minutes and 6 seconds. Thus, if you had turned a light
toward Mars that day, it would have reached Mars in 186 seconds.
Mars was so bright that even the lights of the city didn't
get in the way. If you missed this astronomical show,
you re really out of luck. Mars will not be this close again
until the year 2287.

#2004 수능 46번
In making a successful school, we must consider the
relationships among the people involved in the school
community. Teachers need to know their students well in
order to be able to teach them effectively. In addition,
teachers must maintain a good relationship with the
parents, who are also an important part of the total
community.
In a community built on trust and openness, where
teachers, students, and parents show respect for each
other, students feel secure and can develop the
self-confidence which makes learning and personal
growth possible. When students are drawn into meaningful
relationships with their teachers and other adults, they are
better able to see them as real people. This affects their
whole attitude toward school and learning.
In such an environment, teachers feel valued and
supported. Parents feel included. As a result, they are
more likely to contribute to the improvement of the
school and the learning of the students. All members
of the school community feel as though they belong
and can make a positive contribution to the school.

#2004 수능 48번
Infrasound is a low-pitched sound, whose frequency is far
below the range of human ears. Scientists, however, have
been able to discover the existence of infrasound by using
special technologies. These new technologies have revealed
that many things can produce infrasound, from earthquakes
and thunderstorms to trains and underground explosions, thus
making possible the warning of earthquakes and the
monitoring of underground nuclear-explosion tests.
These new technologies have another benefit for biologists
by allowing them to gain access to the unknown world of
communication between animals. For centuries, biologists
believed giraffes were the silent giants of Africa. In recent
years, however, biologists have been able to listen more
carefully by means of these technologies and have realized
that giraffes may talk, though not in a way that we can hear.
Communication through infrasound is not limited to
giraffes. Over the last few decades, biologists have found
that whales, elephants, and some other animals also use this
extremely low-pitched sound to communicate. This
infrasound, as a means of communication, has special merit:
It can travel a greater distance than higher-pitched noise.
Such long-distance communication is a must for animals
such as giraffes or elephants that roam over wide areas.

Some animals communicate with each other using
infrasound that travels farther than higher-pitched
sounds.

#2020 6월

#2020 6월 31번
Some people have defined wildlife damage management as
the science and management of overabundant species, but this
definition is too narrow. All wildlife species act in ways that
harm human interests. Thus, all species cause wildlife damage,
not just overabundant ones. One interesting example of this
involves endangered peregrine falcons in California, which
prey on another endangered species, the California least tern.
Certainly, we would not consider peregrine falcons as being
overabundant, but we wish that they would not feed on an
endangered species. In this case, one of the negative values
associated with a peregrine falcon population is that its
predation reduces the population of another endangered
species. The goal of wildlife damage management in this case
would be to stop the falcons from eating the terns without
harming the falcons.

#2020 6월 32번
Through recent decades academic archaeologists have been
urged to conduct their research and excavations according to
hypothesis-testing procedures. It has been argued that we should
construct our general theories, deduce testable propositions and
prove or disprove them against the sampled data. In fact, the
application of this ‘scientific method’ often ran into difficulties.
The data have a tendency to lead to unexpected questions,
problems and issues. Thus, archaeologists claiming to follow
hypothesis-testing procedures found themselves having to create
a fiction. In practice, their work and theoretical conclusions
partly developed from the data which they had discovered.
In other words, they already knew the data when they decided
upon an interpretation. But in presenting their work they rewrote
the script, placing the theory first and claiming to have tested it
against data which they discovered, as in an experiment under
laboratory conditions.

#2020 6월 33번
Digital technology accelerates dematerialization by
hastening the migration from products to services. The liquid
nature of services means they don’t have to be bound to
materials. But dematerialization is not just about digital goods.
The reason even solid physical goods ― like a soda can ― can
deliver more benefits while inhabiting less material is because
their heavy atoms are substituted by weightless bits. The
tangible is replaced by intangibles ― intangibles like better
design, innovative processes, smart chips, and eventually online
connectivity ― that do the work that more aluminum atoms
used to do. Soft things, like intelligence, are thus embedded into
hard things, like aluminum, that make hard things behave more
like software. Material goods infused with bits increasingly act
as if they were intangible services. Nouns morph to verbs.
Hardware behaves like software. In Silicon Valley they say it
like this: “Software eats everything.”

#2020 6월 34번
Not all Golden Rules are alike; two kinds emerged over
time. The negative version instructs restraint; the positive
encourages intervention. One sets a baseline of at least not
causing harm; the other points toward aspirational or idealized
beneficent behavior. While examples of these rules abound, too
many to list exhaustively, let these versions suffice for our
purpose here: “What is hateful to you do not do to another” and
“Love another as yourself.” Both versions insist on caring for
others, whether through acts of omission, such as not injuring, or
through acts of commission, by actively intervening. Yet while
these Golden Rules encourage an agent to care for an other,
they do not require abandoning self-concern altogether.
The purposeful displacement of concern away from the ego
nonetheless remains partly self-referential. Both the negative
and the positive versions invoke the ego as the fundamental
measure against which behaviors are to be evaluated.

#2020 6월 40번
After the United Nations environmental conference in
Rio de Janeiro in 1992 made the term “sustainability”
widely known around the world, the word became a
popular buzzword by those who wanted to be seen as
pro-environmental but who did not really intend to change
their behavior. It became a public relations term, an
attempt to be seen as abreast with the latest thinking of
what we must do to save our planet from widespread harm.
But then, in a decade or so, some governments, industries,
educational institutions, and organizations started to use
the term in a serious manner. In the United States a number
of large corporations appointed a vice president for
sustainability. Not only were these officials interested in
how their companies could profit by producing “green”
products, but they were often given the task of making the
company more efficient by reducing wastes and pollution
and by reducing its carbon emissions.

While the term “sustainability,” in the initial phase, was
popular among those who pretended to be eco-conscious,
it later came to be used by those who would actualize
their pro-environmental thoughts.

#2019 6월

#2019 6월 31번
Although prices in most retail outlets are set by the retailer,
this does not mean that these prices do not
adjust to market forces over time.
On any particular day we find that all products have a specific
price ticket on them. However, this price may be different from
day to day or week to week. The price that the farmer gets from
the wholesaler is much more flexible from day to day than the
price that the retailer charges consumers. If, for example, bad
weather leads to a poor potato crop, then the price that
supermarkets have to pay to their wholesalers for potatoes will
go up and this will be reflected in the prices they mark on
potatoes in their stores. Thus, these prices do reflect the
interaction of demand and supply in the wider marketplace for
potatoes. Although they do not change in the supermarket from
hour to hour to reflect local variations in demand and supply,
they do change over time to reflect the underlying conditions
of the overall production of and demand for the goods in
question.

#2019 6월 32번
An individual characteristic that moderates the relationship
with behavior is self-efficacy, or a judgment of one’s capability
to accomplish a certain level of performance. People who have
a high sense of self-efficacy tend to pursue challenging goals
that may be outside the reach of the average person. People
with a strong sense of self-efficacy, therefore, may be more
willing to step outside the culturally prescribed behaviors to
attempt tasks or goals for which success is viewed as improbable
by the majority of social actors in a setting. For these individuals,
culture will have little or no impact on behavior. For
example, Australians tend to endorse the “Tall Poppy Syndrome.”
This saying suggests that any “poppy” that outgrows the others
in a field will get “cut down;” in other words, any overachiever
will eventually fail. Interviews and observations suggest that it
is the high self-efficacy Australians who step outside this culturally
prescribed behavior to actually achieve beyond average.

#2019 6월 33번
Theorists of the novel commonly define the genre as a
biographical form that came to prominence in the late eighteenth
and nineteenth centuries to establish the individual character
as a replacement for traditional sources of cultural authority.
The novel, Georg Lukács argues, “seeks, by giving form, to
uncover and construct the concealed totality of life” in the
interiorized life story of its heroes. The typical plot of the novel
is the protagonist’s quest for authority within, therefore, when
that authority can no longer be discovered outside. By this
accounting, there are no objective goals in novels, only the
subjective goal of seeking the law that is necessarily created by
the individual. The distinctions between crime and heroism,
therefore, or between madness and wisdom, become purely
subjective ones in a novel, judged by the quality or complexity
of the individual’s consciousness.

#2019 6월 34번
Rules can be thought of as formal types of game cues.
They tell us the structure of the test, that is, what should be
accomplished and how we should accomplish it. In this sense,
rules create a problem that is artificial yet intelligible. Only
within the rules of the game of, say, basketball or baseball do
the activities of jump shooting and fielding ground balls make
sense and take on value. It is precisely the artificiality created
by the rules, the distinctive problem to be solved, that gives
sport its special meaning. That is why getting a basketball
through a hoop while not using a ladder or pitching a baseball
across home plate while standing a certain distance away
becomes an important human project. It appears that respecting
the rules not only preserves sport but also makes room for the
creation of excellence and the emergence of meaning. Engaging
in acts that would be considered inconsequential in ordinary
life also liberates us a bit, making it possible to explore our
capabilities in a protected environment.

#2019 6월 40번
In some subject areas, topics build on one another in a
hierarchical fashion, so that a learner must almost certainly
master one topic before moving to the next. For example,
an elementary school student should probably master
principles of addition before moving to multiplication,
because multiplication is an extension of addition. Similarly,
a medical student must have expertise in human anatomy
before studying surgical techniques: It’s difficult to perform
an appendectomy if you can’t find the appendix. Vertical
transfer refers to such situations: A learner acquires new
knowledge or skills by building on more basic information
and procedures. In other cases, knowledge of one topic
may affect learning a second topic even though the first
isn’t a necessary condition for the second. Knowledge of
French isn’t essential for learning Spanish, yet knowing
French can help with Spanish because many words are
similar in the two languages. When knowledge of the first
topic is helpful but not essential to learning the second
one, lateral transfer is occurring.

In vertical transfer, lower level knowledge is essential
before one proceeds to a higher level; however, in the case
of lateral transfer, prior knowledge can be helpful,
but it is not required.

#2018 6월

#2018 6월 31번
Interest in extremely long periods of time sets geology and
astronomy apart from other sciences. Geologists think in
terms of billions of years for the age of Earth and its oldest
rocks ― numbers that, like the national debt, are not easily
comprehended. Nevertheless, the time scales of geological activity
are important for environmental geologists because they
provide a way to measure human impacts on the natural
world. For example, we would like to know the rate of natural
soil formation from solid rock to determine whether topsoil
erosion from agriculture is too great. Likewise, understanding
how climate has changed over millions of years is vital to
properly assess current global warming trends. Clues to past
environmental change are well preserved in many different
kinds of rocks.

#2018 6월 32번
Politics cannot be suppressed, whichever policy process is
employed and however sensitive and respectful of differences
it might be. In other words, there is no end to politics. It is
wrong to think that proper institutions, knowledge, methods
of consultation, or participatory mechanisms can make
disagreement go away. Theories of all sorts promote the view
that there are ways by which disagreement can be processed
or managed so as to make it disappear. The assumption
behind those theories is that disagreement is wrong and
consensus is the desirable state of things. In fact, consensus
rarely comes without some forms of subtle coercion and the
absence of fear in expressing a disagreement is a source of
genuine freedom. Debates cause disagreements to evolve,
often for the better, but a positively evolving debate does not
have to equal a reduction in disagreement. The suppression of
disagreement should never be made into a goal in political
deliberation. A defense is required against any suggestion that
political disagreement is not the normal state of things.

#2018 6월 33번
To make plans for the future, the brain must have an ability
to take certain elements of prior experiences and reconfigure
them in a way that does not copy any actual past experience or
present reality exactly. To accomplish that, the organism must
go beyond the mere ability to form internal representations,
the models of the world outside. It must acquire the ability to
manipulate and transform these models. We can argue that
tool-making, one of the fundamental distinguishing features of
primate cognition, depends on this ability, since a tool does
not exist in a ready-made form in the natural environment and
has to be imagined in order to be made. The neural machinery
for creating and holding ‘images of the future’ was a
necessary prerequisite for tool-making, and thus for launching
human civilization.

#2018 6월 34번
Since life began in the oceans, most life, including freshwater
life, has a chemical composition more like the ocean than fresh
water. It appears that most freshwater life did not originate in fresh
water, but is secondarily adapted, having passed from ocean to
land and then back again to fresh water. As improbable as this
may seem, the bodily fluids of aquatic animals show a strong
similarity to oceans, and indeed, most studies of ion balance in
freshwater physiology document the complex regulatory
mechanisms by which fish, amphibians and invertebrates
attempt to maintain an inner ocean in spite of surrounding fresh
water. It is these sorts of unexpected complexities and apparent
contradictions that make ecology so interesting. The idea of a
fish in a freshwater lake struggling to accumulate salts inside
its body to mimic the ocean reminds one of the other great
contradiction of the biosphere: plants are bathed in an
atmosphere composed of roughly three-quarters nitrogen, yet
their growth is frequently restricted by lack of nitrogen.

#2018 6월 40번
When considered in terms of evolutionary success, many
of the seemingly irrational choices that people make do not
seem so foolish after all. Most animals, including our
ancestors and modern-day capuchin monkeys, lived very
close to the margin of survival. Paleontologists who study
early human civilizations have uncovered evidence that our
ancestors faced frequent periods of drought and freezing.
When you are living on the verge of starvation, a slight
downturn in your food reserves makes a lot more difference
than a slight upturn. Anthropologists who study people still
living in hunter-gatherer societies have discovered that they
regularly make choices designed to produce not the best
opportunity for obtaining a hyperabundant supply of food but,
instead, the least danger of ending up with an insufficient
supply. In other words, people everywhere have a strong
motivation to avoid falling below the level that will feed
themselves and their families. If our ancestors hadn’t
agonized over losses and instead had taken too many chances
in going after the big gains, they’d have been more likely to
lose out and never become anyone’s ancestor.

Our ancestors gave priority to securing minimum
resources rather than pursuing maximum gains, and that
was the rational choice for human survival from an
evolutionary perspective.

#2018 6월 42번
According to many sociologists, the study of what our
society calls ‘art’ can only really progress if we drop the
highly specific and ideologically loaded terminology of ‘art’,
‘artworks’ and ‘artists’, and replace these with the more
neutral and less historically specific terms ‘cultural forms’,
‘cultural products’ and ‘cultural producers’. These cultural
products ― be they paintings, sculptures, forms of music or
whatever ― should be regarded as being made by certain
types of cultural producer, and as being used by particular
groups of people in particular ways in specific social
contexts. By using the more neutral term ‘cultural products’
for particular objects, and ‘cultural producers’ for the people
who make those objects, the sociologist seeks to break with a
view that she/he sees as having dominated the study of
cultural forms for too long, namely trying to understand
everything in terms of the category ‘art’. This is a category
that is too limited and context-specific to encompass all the
different cultural products that people in different societies
make and use. It is a term that is also too loaded to take at face
value and to use naively in study of our own society. Since it
is in the interests of certain social groups to define some
things as ‘art’ and others as not, the very term ‘art’ itself
cannot be uncritically used by the sociologist who wishes to
understand how and why such labelling processes occur.
Quite simply, then, in order to study cultural matters, many
sociologists believe one has to reject the terms ‘art’,
‘artwork’ and ‘artist’ as the basis for our analysis. Instead,
these terms become important objects of analysis themselves.

#2017 6월

#2017 6월 28번(정답 4번 미해결)
If an animal is innately programmed for some type of
behaviour, then there are likely to be biological clues. It is
no accident that fish have bodies which are streamlined and
smooth, with fins and a powerful tail. Their bodies are
structurally adapted for moving fast through the water.
Similarly, if you found a dead bird or mosquito, you could
guess by looking at its wings that flying was its normal
mode of transport. However, we must not be over-optimistic.
Biological clues are not essential. The extent to which they are
④ finding varies from animal to animal and from activity to
activity. For example, it is impossible to guess from their
bodies that birds make nests, and, sometimes, animals behave
in a way quite contrary to what might be expected from
their physical form: ghost spiders have tremendously long
legs, yet they weave webs out of very short threads. To a
human observer, their legs seem a great hindrance as they spin
and move about the web.

#2017 6월 29번
In 2001, researchers at Wayne State University asked a
group of college volunteers to exercise for twenty minutes at a
self-selected pace on each of three machines: a
treadmill, a stationary bike, and a stair climber. Measurements
of heart rate, oxygen consumption, and perceived effort were
taken throughout all three workouts. The researchers expected
to find that the subjects unconsciously targeted the same
relative physiological intensity in each activity. Perhaps they
would automatically exercise at 65 percent
of their maximum heart rate regardless of which machine they
were using. Or maybe they would instinctively settle into
rhythm at 70 percent of their maximum rate of oxygen
consumption in all three workouts. But that’s not what
happened. There was, in fact, no consistency
in measurements of heart rate and oxygen consumption across
the three disciplines. Instead, the subjects were found to have
chosen the same level of perceived effort on the treadmill, the
bike, and the stair climber.

#2017 6월 30번(정답 5번 미해결)
In the summer of 1972, the actor Anthony Hopkins was
signed to play a leading role in a film based on George
Feifer’s novel The Girl from Petrovka. That is why he
traveled to London to buy a copy of the book. Unfortunately,
none of the main London bookstores had a copy. Then, on his
way home, waiting for an underground train at Leicester
Square tube station, he saw a discarded book lying on the seat
next to him. It was a copy of The Girl from Petrovka. As if
that was not coincidence enough, more was to follow. Later,
when he had a chance to meet the author, Hopkins told him
about this strange occurrence. Feifer was interested. He said to
him that in November 1971 he had lent a friend a copy of
the book—a unique copy in which he had made notes on
turning the British English into American English for the
publication of an American version—but his friend had lost
the copy in London. A quick check of the copy Hopkins had
found showed that it was the very same copy that ⑤ his friend
had mislaid.

#2017 6월 31번
Once a hand or gripper has been directed to an object by
reaching, it can be grasped. Grasping requires that fingers hold
an object securely. A secure grip is one in which the object
won’t slip or move, especially when displaced by an external
force. Your grasp on a hammer, for example, would not be
secure if knocking against something caused you to drop it.
One precondition of a firm grasp is that the forces applied by
the fingers balance each other so as not to disturb the object’s
position. The characteristics of an object such as its geometric
configuration and mass distribution may demand that some
fingers apply greater force than others to maintain stability.
The grasp and support forces must also match overall object
mass and fragility. An egg requires a more delicate touch than
a rock.

#2017 6월 32번
What story could be harsher than that of the Great Auk, the
large black-and-white seabird that in northern oceans took the
ecological place of a penguin? Its tale rises and falls like a
Greek tragedy, with island populations savagely destroyed by
humans until almost all were gone. Then the very last colony
found safety on a special island, one protected from the
destruction of humankind by vicious and unpredictable ocean
currents. These waters presented no problem to perfectly
adapted seagoing birds, but they prevented humans from
making any kind of safe landing. After enjoying a few years
of comparative safety, disaster of a different kind struck the
Great Auk. Volcanic activity caused the island refuge to sink
completely beneath the waves, and surviving individuals were
forced to find shelter elsewhere. The new island home they
chose lacked the benefits of the old in one
terrible way. Humans could access it with comparative ease,
and they did! Within just a few years the last of this
once-plentiful species was entirely eliminated.

#2017 6월 33번
It is not hard to see that a strong economy, where
opportunities are plentiful and jobs go begging,
helps break down social barriers. Biased employers
may still dislike hiring members of one group or another, but
when nobody else is available, discrimination most often
gives way to the basic need to get the work done. The same
goes for employees with prejudices about whom they do and
do not like working alongside. In the American construction
boom of the late 1990s, for example, even the carpenters’
union—long known as a “traditional bastion of white men, a
world where a coveted union card was handed down from
father to son”—began openly encouraging women, blacks,
and Hispanics to join its internship program. At least in the
workplace, jobs chasing people obviously does more to
promote a fluid society than people chasing jobs.

#2017 6월 34번
One remarkable aspect of aboriginal culture is the concept
of “totemism,” where the tribal member at birth assumes the
soul and identity of a part of nature. This view of the earth and
its riches as an intrinsic part of oneself clearly rules out
mistreatment of the environment because this would only
constitute a destruction of self. Totems are more than objects.
They include spiritual rituals, oral histories, and the
organization of ceremonial lodges where records of the past
travel routes of the soul can be exchanged with others and
converted to mythology. The primary motivation is the
preservation of tribal myths and a consolidation and sharing of
every individual’s origins in nature. The aborigines see
their relationship to the environment as a single harmonious
continuum,
through a hierarchy of totems that connect to their ancestral
origins, a cosmology that places them at one with the earth, and
behavior patterns that respect ecological balance.

#2017 6월 30번
Lawyers and scientists use argument to mean a summary
of evidence and principles leading to a conclusion;
however, a scientific argument is different from a legal
argument. A prosecuting attorney constructs an argument
to persuade the judge or a jury that the accused is guilty; a
defense attorney in the same trial constructs an argument
to persuade the same judge or jury toward the opposite
conclusion. Neither prosecutor nor defender is obliged to
consider anything that weakens their respective cases. On
the contrary, scientists construct arguments because they
want to test their own ideas and give an accurate
explanation of some aspect of nature. Scientists can
include any evidence or hypothesis that supports their
claim, but they must observe one fundamental rule of
professional science. They must include all of the known
evidence and all of the hypotheses previously proposed.
Unlike lawyers, scientists must explicitly account for the
possibility that they might be wrong.

Unlike lawyers, who utilize information selectively to
support their arguments, scientists must include all
information even if some of it is unlikely to strengthen
their arguments.

#2017 6월 42번
The idea of protecting intellectual activity and creation has
deep roots. The ancient Greeks used an awards system to
recognize design achievements, which performed some of
the same functions as the modern patent system. Their
pottery, sculptures, and other manufactured goods had
symbols on them to note the tradesmen who created them,
which are the predecessors of modern trademarks. Similar
marks and symbols functioning as trademarks have been
found on Chinese pottery, possibly dating as far back as
2698 BCE, and in many other ancient societies, including the
Egyptians, the Assyrians, and the Vedic civilization.
The concept of intellectual property continued to develop
during the Roman period. The Roman Empire had an
incredible variety of trademarks. Roman potters alone used
approximately 6,000 trademarks. Additionally, Roman
authors had a sense that their intellectual creations were
outdated, as they complained about the exploitation of
those creations. Their sense of injustice was probably
heightened by the fact that there were laws and traditions in
place that supported their belief that only they could exploit
their creations. Roman authors could, in fact, make money
from the copying and publishing of their works because the
value of their intellectual creations was recognized.

#2016 6월

#2016 6월 31번
In an increasingly globalized world, literature in
translation has an especially important role. Increasingly,
writers, readers, and publishers are turning to literature as
a bridge between cultures, particularly Western and Arab
societies. This growing interest is, in turn, driving a
boom in translation. However, not surprisingly perhaps,
most translations are from English into other languages,
not from another language, such as Arabic, into English.
Hence, the huge American market is seen as driving the
imbalance. Bookstores in the United States, for example,
rarely stock more than Nobel Prize winner Naguib
Mahfouz’s Cairo Trilogy, a masterful, realistic account of
life in Cairo and of a merchant family in the mid-20th
century. Western readers likely know little of Mahfouz’s
more experimental work, his political and religious
allegories, or his historical dramas. The result is a kind
of one-way mirror between America and the rest of the
world.

#2016 6월 32번
We tend to assume that the way to get more time is
to speed up. But speeding up can actually slow us down.
Anyone who has ever rushed out of the house only to
realize that their keys and wallet are sitting on the
kitchen table knows this only too well. And it’s not just our
efficiency that is reduced. The quality of the experience
suffers too, as we become less aware or ‘mindful.’ Have
you ever eaten an entire meal without tasting any of it?
Hurrying up doesn’t just give us less time, it can also
steal the pleasure and benefit from the time that we do
have. For many of us, hurrying is a way of life. Some
of us enjoy the thrill that it gives us while others are
driven crazy by the constant pressure and feel that their
lives are speeding up to an unacceptable degree. Either
way, there are almost certainly areas of our life that
could be enhanced by a little go-slow behavior.

#2016 6월 33번
The audience receives a sound signal entirely through
the vibrations generated in the air, whereas in a singer
some of the auditory stimulus is conducted to the ear
through the singer’s own bones. Since these two ways of
transferring sound have quite different relative efficiencies
at various frequencies, the overall quality of the sound
will be quite different. You have probably experienced this
when you have listened to your own voice, as on tape or
through a public address system. It is easy to blame the
‘sound of a stranger’ on ‘poor electronics,’ but this is
only partly justified. The major effect comes from the fact
that you hear yourself differently from the way others hear
you. This is one of the main reasons why even the most
accomplished singers have to listen to the opinion of
coaches and voice teachers as to ‘how they sound,’ whereas
no concert violinist would have to do such a thing. To the
violinist playing sounds almost exactly the same as it does
to someone else standing nearby.

#2016 6월 34번
Problems can be distinguished according to whether
they are reasonable or unreasonable. Reasonable problems
are of the kind that can be solved in a step-by-step
manner. A crossword puzzle is of this nature. Given a
sufficient vocabulary, the empty spaces can be filled in
one by one. Unreasonable problems, in contrast, cannot be
treated this way because the task contains some ‘trick’ or
‘catch’ that must be understood before someone can
arrive at a solution. This feature frustrates any step-by-step
process that proceeds without the realization that “things
aren’t what they seem.” Hence, successful problem
solving in these cases requires that the person acquire an
insight into the nature of the trick. Riddles provide
commonplace instances of such insight problems, such as
the classic riddle that the Sphinx posed to Oedipus.

#2016 6월 40번
There are two types of managers in business
organizations: functional managers and project managers.
Both types of managers have different roles and
qualities. Functional managers head one of a firm’s
departments such as marketing or engineering, and they
are specialists in the area they manage. They are skilled
at breaking the components of a system into smaller
elements, knowing something of the details of each
operation for which they are responsible. On the other
hand, project managers begin their career as specialists
in some field. When promoted to the position of project
manager, they must transform from technical caterpillar
to generalist butterfly. They oversee many functional
areas, each with its own specialists. Therefore, what is
required is an ability to put many pieces of a task
together to form a coherent whole. Thus, to understand
a frog, for example, functional managers cut it open to
examine it, but project managers watch it swim with
other frogs and consider the environment.

In business organizations, compared with the functional
managers who generally analyze what forms a system,
project managers focus on cimbining all of its elements.

#2016 6월 42번
It isn’t going to be easy making changes to the food
your children eat, and even the most careful, patient
parents will probably find that the little ones will resist
at some point and to some degree. The problem is that
many of us were forced to eat in a healthy way as
children: we learned the hard way. And the temptation
to continue with these parental habits with our own
children is strong.
If you were made to sit at the table until you had
cleaned your plate, you are not alone: most of the adult
population have suffered this at some point ― at school
if not at home. Forcing your children to eat, especially
if they don’t like what is on the plate, is completely
counterproductive. “Sit there until you finish” may be
how we learned, and may also be the only way you feel
able to achieve your goal, but think about it: the
experience of eating a pile of unwanted cabbage until
they feel sick is hardly going to make children jump for
joy the next time it is served.
This strict approach is very old-fashioned, and you
may win the battle but you definitely won’t win the
war. Delaying puddings used to be thought of as a good
idea too, but guess what? That doesn’t work either. “No
pudding until you have finished your main course” was
the standard line when most parents of today were
young and is still commonly used, but it only makes
sweet things seem more desirable.

#2015 6월

#2015 6월 30번
The true champion recognizes that excellence often flows
most smoothly from simplicity, a fact that can get lost in
these high-tech days. I used to train with a world-class
runner who was constantly hooking himself up to pulse
meters and pace keepers. He spent hours collecting data that
he thought would help him improve. In fact, a good 25
percent of his athletic time was devoted to externals other
than working out. Sports became so complex for him that he
forgot how to enjoy himself. Contrast his approach with that
of the late Abebe Bikila, the Ethiopian who won the 1960
Olympic Marathon running barefoot. High-tech clothing and
digital watches were not part of his world. Abebe Bikila
simply ran. Many times in running, and in other areas of
life, less is more.

#2015 6월 31번
The origins of contemporary Western thought can be
traced back to the golden age of ancient Greece, when Greek
thinkers laid the foundations for modern Western politics,
philosophy, science, and law. Their novel approach was to
pursue rational inquiry through adversarial discussion: The
best way to evaluate one set of ideas, they decided, was
by testing it against another set of ideas. In the
political sphere, the result was democracy, in which
supporters of rival policies vied for rhetorical supremacy; in
philosophy, it led to reasoned arguments and dialogues about
the nature of the world; in science, it prompted the
construction of competing theories to try to explain natural
phenomena; in the field of law, the result was the adversarial
legal system. This approach is the foundation for the modern
Western way of life, in which politics, commerce, science, and
law are all rooted in orderly competition.

#2015 6월 32번
I would like to compare the shift from analog to
digital film-making to the shift from fresco and tempera
to oil painting in the early Renaissance. A painter making
a fresco has limited time before the paint dries, and once
it has dried, no further changes to the image are possible.
Similarly, a traditional filmmaker has limited means of
modifying images once they are recorded on film.
Medieval tempera painting can be compared to the
practice of special effects during the analog period of
cinema. A painter working with tempera could modify
and rework the image, but the process was painstaking
and slow. The switch to oils greatly liberated painters by
allowing them to quickly create much larger compositions
as well as to modify them as long as necessary. Similarly,
by allowing a filmmaker to treat a film image as an
oil painting digital technology redefines what can be done with
cinema.

#2015 6월 33번
When there is a discrepancy between the verbal message
and the nonverbal message, the latter typically weighs more
in forming a judgment. For example, a friend might react
to a plan for dinner with a comment like “that’s good,” but
with little vocal enthusiasm and a muted facial expression.
In spite of the verbal comment, the lack of expressive
enthusiasm suggests that the plan isn’t viewed very
positively. In such a case, the purpose of the positive
comment might be to avoid a disagreement and support the
friend, but the lack of a positive expression unintentionally
leaks a more candid, negative reaction to the plan. Of
course, the muted expressive display might also be strategic
and intentional. That is, the nonverbal message is
deliberate, but designed to let the partner know one’s candid
reaction indirectly. It is then the partner’s responsibility to
interpret the nonverbal message and make some adjustment
in the plan.

#2015 6월 40번
An ant turns right, left, and moves ahead over a sandy
hill. How can we explain the complexity of the path it
chose? We can think up a sophisticated program in the
ant’s brain, but it does not work. What we have
overlooked is the ant’s environment. The ant may be
following a simple rule: get out of the sun and back to the
nest. Complex behavior does not imply complex mental
strategies. The same holds for humans. The apparent
complexity of a man’s behavior over time is largely a
reflection of the complexity of the environment in which
he finds himself. People adapt to their environments much
as gelatin does; if you wish to know what form it will
have when it solidifies, study the shape of the mold that
holds the gelatin. To understand behavior, one has to look
at both the mind and the environment.

Although we tend to associate complex behavior with
complex mental operations, environmental factors need to be
considered as well for a better understanding of such
behavior.

#2015 6월 42번
When someone asks us, “How does that work?” or
“Why does that happen?” we tend to answer the question
directly if we know the answer. After all, it is efficient.
Another person asks a question; we provide the answer to
the question. It is usually a win-win. The problem with
this is that the direct approach can have an unintended
consequence: the loss of confidence. Although the
question wanted for an explanation, what the asker
received was a statement of fact. Why does oil float on
top of water in a glass? Relative density. What causes
climate change? Increased CO2 in the atmosphere. Why
does the ocean have tides? The moon. Giving direct,
accurate, and factual answers may seem to solve the
problem from the perspective of the answerer. But in
reality, it can shut the asker down. A statement of fact
with no other context puts the burden on the asker to take
the next step. If the asker isn’t familiar with relative
density or CO2, he or she is likely to move on rather than
ask a follow-up question or probe for related ideas. Any
hope of becoming a customer of that idea is lost. This is
a failure in the form of a lost opportunity. Although direct
answers are often needed and well-placed, they do not
work universally. A skilled explainer learns to see the
intent behind the question and formulate an answer that
focuses on understanding instead of efficiency.

#2014-B 6월

#2014-B 6월 31번
Appearance creates the first impression customers have of
food, and first impressions are important. No matter how
appealing the taste, an unattractive appearance is hard to
overlook. As humans, we do “eat with our eyes” because our
sense of sight is more highly developed than the other senses.
The sense of sight is so highly developed in humans that
messages received from other senses are often ignored if they
conflict with what is seen. Yellow candy is expected to be
lemon-flavored, and if it is grape-flavored, many people
cannot correctly identify the flavor. Strawberry
ice cream tinted with red food coloring seems to have a
stronger strawberry flavor than one that has no added food
coloring, even when there is no real difference.

#2014-B 6월 32번
The Rust Belt is notorious for its poor air quality. For
decades, coal plants, steel production, and auto emissions
have pumped particulates like sulfate into the atmosphere over
the eastern U.S. Especially before air quality laws began
appearing in the 1970s, particulate pollution was behind acid
rain, respiratory disease, and ozone depletion. But a new study
from Harvard University suggests that the Rust Belt’s thick
particulate fog may have helped slow down the effects of
climate change, particularly when it was thickest. Throughout
the 20th century, global temperatures have gone up by just
under one degree Celsius. But in the U.S., eastern and central
states haven’t seen the same rise. In fact, temperatures there
actually decreased over the same period. The reason seems to
be particulate pollution. Instead of trapping warm air in the
atmosphere like carbon dioxide, fine particles like sulfate
reflect the sun’s light and heat. They may even group with
watery cloud droplets, which do the same thing. The effect
is a net cooling across entire regions.

#2014-B 6월 33번
Suppose a survivor from an airplane crash with severe
injuries struggles for days through the jungle but dies just
before reaching a village. It is tempting to think “if only he had
managed to walk to the village, he would have been rescued.”
But suppose you must try to console the victim’s relatives.
What might you say? Or suppose you wish to defend the
rescue team who got as far as the village but no further.
Your motivation to console or defend may influence the
alternative you imagine. You may decide to emphasize the
severity of the victim’s injuries and suggest “even if he had
managed to walk to the village, he still would have died.”
Sometimes thoughts about what might have been change an
antecedent event (the victim walked to the village) but leave
the outcome unchanged (he still died). “Even if...”
conditionals have been called “semifactual” because they
combine a counterfactual antecedent and a factual consequence.
Imagined semifactual alternatives are intriguing because,
unlike other thoughts about what might have been, they
suggest that the outcome is inevitable.

#2014-B 6월 34번
The so-called Mozart effect ― listening to Mozart will
make your child smarter ― is a good example of
a scientific finding being distorted by the media
through hype not warranted by the research. It all started when
researchers reported that after exposure to a selection of
Mozart’s music, college students showed an increase in spatial
reasoning for about 10 minutes on tasks like putting together
pieces of a jigsaw puzzle. Note first that the research was done
on college students, not infants, and that the effect was very
brief. In addition, no one’s been able to replicate the research.
The increase in spatial reasoning, it turns out, can be generated
by any auditory stimulation (e.g., listening to a short story or
other types of music) that keeps people alert while being tested.
However, none of this has stopped eager parents ― spurred on
by fantastic claims from unethical companies ― from
purchasing Mozart CDs for their babies.

#2014-B 6월 35번
As the structures of our world and the conditions of
certainty have yielded to an avalanche of change, the
extent of our longing for stable, definitive leadership
has been exceeded only by the impossibility of finding it. The
fault lies not with leadership but rather with ourselves and our
expectations. In the old days, leaders were supposed to
make sense of chaos, to make certainty out of doubt, and
to create positive action plans for the resolution of
paradoxes. Good leaders straightened things out. Should
chaos rear its ugly head, the leader was expected to restore
normality immediately. But chaos is now considered
normal, paradoxes cannot be resolved, and certainty is
possible only to the level of high probability. Leadership
that attempts to deliver in terms of fixing any of these can
only fail. And that is exactly what is happening.

#2014-B 6월 36번
When a company comes out with a new product, its
competitors typically go on the defensive, doing whatever
they can to reduce the odds that the offering will eat
into their sales. Responses might include increasing marketing
efforts, offering discounts to channel partners, and even
lobbying for regulations that would hinder the rival’s
expansion. In many cases, though, such actions are misguided.
Although the conventional wisdom that a rival’s launch will
hurt profits is often correct, my research shows that
companies sometimes see profits increase after a rival’s
launch. The underlying mechanism is pretty simple: When a
company comes out with a new product, it often raises the
prices of its existing products. This might be designed to
make the new product look cheaper and thus more
attractive by comparison. As that company adjusts its pricing,
its competitors can do the same without risking customer
defections over price.

#2014-B 6월 37번
All human societies have economic systems within which
goods and services are produced, distributed, and consumed.
In one sense, the economic aspect of culture is simply the sum
of the choices people make regarding these areas of their
lives. These choices critically determine much of people’s
lives. For example, choosing to become a farmer rather
than an insurance broker may determine where you live, who
you are likely to meet, the sorts of behaviors you will expect
in your spouse and offspring, and so on. However, such
choices are not unlimited; rather, they are limited by our
cultures, traditions, and technologies. Furthermore, our
environments set the boundaries within which choices about
the production, distribution, and consumption of goods and
services are made. To the extent that economic systems are
part of culture, people in different cultures have different sorts
of economic behavior.

#2014-B 6월 40번
A narrative is not a myth the first time it is told, but only a
story or an account. What makes a story a myth is the fact
that it is received by a given society and that a given society
participates in its transmission. Obviously, it is difficult to
determine just when any story becomes a myth, but it is
clear that a narrative is not a myth when it is first told. The
intentions of the first narrator and the last narrator can be
the same, but this still does not give any special status to the
creator of a myth. It is far more important to realize that the
intentions of a given society in transmitting a narrative may
have nothing to do with the purposes of its author. Thus we
can never identify any individual creator of a myth. So long
as myth is a collective narrative by definition, the only
relevant consideration are the mentality and purposes of the
society for which the myth is a myth.

Given the collective nature of a myth, a narrative becomes
a myth only when a given society accepts and transmits it,
regardless of the intentions of its author.

#2014-B 6월 42번
Carrying capacity is the number of individuals that the
local resources can sustain. Individuals in a population that
has exceeded the carrying capacity of its habitat may have
poor health and suffer from malnutrition because of the
compromised living conditions. When this happens, the
weakest individuals may die, or the population as a whole
may become more vulnerable to further environmental stress
or disease. Sometimes a large number of individuals in a
population die as a result of overshooting the carrying
capacity of their habitat. This is known as a die-off.
Certain animals and plants have a built-in sense of
carrying capacity, so that instead of overshooting and having
a die-off, they remain within the limits of their habitat’s
ability to support them. Lake trout, for instance, stop
breeding as prolifically when the population density
increases too dramatically. Although this is the result of
individual responses to chemical signals from other trout
rather than a thought-out response on the part of the trout,
the result is that population numbers may remain steady
for extended periods. The trout will produce more offspring
and mature to a reproductive size at a faster rate when
populations are threatened, such as when aggressive fishing
takes place. When space and food are scarce, such as when a
lot of fish are living together in a small pond, the trout
remain smaller and reproduce more slowly. Experiments
have shown that no matter what number of lake trout a pond
is stocked with in the beginning, the population will increase
until it reaches a particular density, then level off at about the
same number.

#2014-A 6월

#2014-A 6월 34번
It is known that people are extremely limited in the amount
of information that they can process at any given time. A
common metaphor in early theories of attention is the concept
of a bottleneck. This metaphor is especially appealing because
it matches our understanding about attention. The narrow neck
of a bottle restricts the flow into or out of the bottle. This kind
of flow in the narrow passageway is similar to the way people
process information. In other words, this bottleneck limits the
quantity of information to which we can pay attention.
Thus, when one message is currently flowing through a
bottleneck, the other messages must be left behind.

#2014-A 6월 35번
Many people have pointed out that personal responsibility
can often be lost in groups. Consider how often
you’ve passed someone who is pulled over on the side of the
road with car trouble. It is easy to justify your failure to help by
telling yourself someone else will stop. Corporations add
another layer of complication to the story of reduced personal
responsibility in group settings because corporations are set up
to assign legal responsibility to the corporation itself instead of
to its members. There are other complex organizations in
which the individual members are often not sure of their impact
or power to bring about change. In this kind of culture,
“someone else will do it” is a common excuse.

#2014-A 6월 36번
Appearance creates the first impression customers have of
food, and first impressions are important. No matter how
appealing the taste, an unattractive appearance is hard to
overlook. As humans, we do “eat with our eyes” because our
sense of sight is more highly developed than the other senses.
The sense of sight is so highly developed in humans that
messages received from other senses are often ignored if they
conflict with what is seen. Yellow candy is expected to be
lemon-flavored, and if it is grape-flavored, many people
cannot correctly identify the flavor. Strawberry
ice cream tinted with red food coloring seems to have a
stronger strawberry flavor than one that has no added food
coloring, even when there is no real difference.

#2014-A 6월 37번
When plants were first grouped together, it was merely for
convenience. Even today, plants may be categorized together
in unnatural groupings in order to make them easier to
identify. For example, some wildflower books arrange
together all white-flowered species or all yellow-flowered
species. However, such groupings do not reflect natural
relationships and make it difficult to recognize family
characteristics. We don’t infer that all persons with red hair
are more closely related to each other than they are to those
with dark hair; likewise, all long-haired dogs are not more
closely related to each other than they are to short-haired
dogs. Modern botanists, therefore, try to group plants
according to their natural relationships.

#2014-A 6월 42번
Because the Internet is free space where anybody can post
anything, it can be full of all sorts of useless data. As a
result, organized knowledge could easily get corrupted or
lost in a sea of junk data. For books, there are various filters
that help readers distinguish between reliable and unreliable
information. On the Internet, the relation between the
producer and the consumer of information tends to be direct,
so nothing protects the consumer from polluted information.
There are, of course, advantages to the free exchange of
information, and I do believe any producers of data
should have the freedom to make them available online.
However, I am also convinced that users should be
protected from corrupt knowledge by intermediary services.
There need to be some forms of guides and filters provided
by responsible individuals and organizations. Otherwise, we
may no longer be able to distinguish between the intellectual
space of information and a polluted environment of
meaningless data. Thus, reliable intermediary services will
be needed in the future.

#2013 6월

#2013 6월 24번
The sun is slowly getting brighter as its core contracts and
heats up. In a billion years it will be about 10 percent brighter
than today, heating the planet to an uncomfortable degree.
Water evaporating from the oceans may set off a runaway
greenhouse effect that turns Earth into a damp version of
Venus, wrapped permanently in a thick, white blanket of cloud.
Or the transformation may take some time and be more gentle,
with an increasingly hot and cloudy atmosphere able to shelter
microbial life for some time. Either way, water will escape into
the stratosphere and be broken down by UV light into oxygen
and hydrogen. Oxygen will be left in the stratosphere ―
perhaps misleading aliens into thinking the planet is still
inhabited ― while the hydrogen is light enough to escape into
space. So our water will gradually leak away.

#2013 6월 25번
Imagine a child playing on the beach below a cliff. He finds
a cave, and full of excitement, goes in. Suddenly fear seizes
him. In the deep dark of the cave, he cannot see the way ahead.
What is frightening him is the sense of the unknown stretching
into the black distance. Worries can be like this. Our anxiety
is not about something specific, but more of a sense that
unknown and uncertain possibilities may be out of sight far
ahead. We can stop these worries from growing. A powerful
torch or flashlight could have shown the child the limits of
the cave. We can place limits on our worries by
asking: “What is the worst that can happen?” More often than
not, the worst that we fear is much less terrible than our vague,
unarticulated fear. Once we know the worst, we can face it
directly and work out more sensibly what to do.

#2013 6월 26번
People have found many ways to reduce stress or control
their responses to it. Possibilities include special breathing
routines, exercise, meditation, and distraction, as well as
trying to deal with the problem that caused the stress.
Social support is one of the most powerful methods of
coping with stress, and researchers have demonstrated its
effectiveness by brain measurements as well as people’s
self-reports. In one study, happily married women were
given moderately painful shocks to their ankles. On various
trials, they held the hand of their husband, a man they did
not know, or no one. Holding the husband’s hand reduced
the response in several brain areas. Holding the hand of an
unknown man reduced the response a little, on the average,
but not as much as holding the husband’s hand. In short, as
expected, brain responses correspond to people’s self-reports
that social support from a loved one helps reduce stress.

#2013 6월 27번
Lifeline infrastructures are vital systems that support a
nation’s economy and quality of life. Modern economies
rely on the ability to move goods, people, and information
safely and reliably. Adding to their importance is that
many of the lifeline systems serve vital roles in disaster
recovery. Consequently, it is of the utmost importance to
government, business, and the public at large that the
flow of services provided by a nation’s infrastructure
continues unimpeded in the face of a broad range of
natural and technological hazards. The linkage between
systems and services is critical to any discussion of
infrastructure. Although it is the performance of the
hardware (i.e., the highways, pipes, and transmission lines)
that is of immediate concern following an earthquake, it
is actually the loss of services that these systems provide
that is the real loss to the public. Therefore, a high
priority in protecting these systems from hazards is
ensuring the continuity, or at least the rapid restoration,
of service.

#2013 6월 28번
Essentially the same structural forms of politics can
nevertheless take on very different “flavors.” For example,
a dictatorship can, in theory, be brutal or benevolent;
anarchy can, in theory, consist of “mutual aid” or a “war
of all against all” that proceeds in the absence of any rule
of law whatsoever; democracies can and typically are
distinguished in terms of the extent to which they are
socially oriented as opposed to individualistically oriented.
Thus, whatever our answer to the “What is the best
structural form of politics?” question, we still want to know
what “flavor” this structural form of politics ought to have
since . Indeed, political structure, by itself, does not determine
political content this is precisely
why we vote within a democratic structure: to
determine the “flavor” we want that democratic structure to
have.

#2013 6월 29번
The greatest errors in judging a person are made by his
parents; this is a fact, but how is one to explain it? Do the
parents have too much experience of the child, and can they
no longer compose it into a unity? We notice that travelers
in a strange land grasp correctly the common, distinctive
traits of a people only in the first period of their stay; the
more they get to know a people, the more they forget
how to see what is typical and distinctive about it. As soon
as they see up close, they stop being farsighted. Might
parents judge their children wrongly because they have
never stood far enough off from them? A quite different
explanation would be the following: people tend to stop
thinking about things that are closest to them, and simply
accept them. When parents are required to judge their
children, it is perhaps their customary thoughtlessness that
makes them judge so mistakenly.

#2013 6월 30번
Persuasion is the strategic use of language to move an
audience. It works by appealing to our emotion as well as
by appealing to our reason. Therefore, sometimes you
may try to appeal to an emotion in your audience by
imitating it: hysteria by being hysterical, anger by raging.
Also, you may try to re-create the circumstances
which excited in you the emotions that you want to excite in
your audience. However, the best measure is to appear calm,
detached, thoroughly in control of your feelings, while
you are controlling your narrative for your own purposes.
Even your choice of words should be selective; you must pay
attention to their nuances. If you address a labor union,
for example, it will make a great difference whether you
refer to the members as workers, comrades, or just people.

#2013 6월 45번
All art is creation, regardless of how closely the
imitation approximates the original. Even the most
rigorous attempt to create an absolute likeness is
ultimately selective. Doing a portrait, for example, the
artist may ask the subject to look serious, not smile ―
selecting a certain aspect of the person. We know Mona
Lisa Giaconda, the subject of the most famous portrait
in the world, through her mysterious smile; but we will
never know what the entire person was like. The
treasure of art, however, is that its reality lives forever.
The final product is really an addition to reality, not
simply a way of totally reproducing it. The artist always
contributes something new, something that never was
put together in precisely that way before. Leonardo’s
Mona Lisa is not Mona Lisa. The latter has long since
gone to her reward; the former will never die.

Every work of art, no matter how precisely it imitates
the original, is not a mere reproduction, but a unique
creation that exists on its own and never perishes.

#2013 6월 50번
All his life, Chris Greicius dreamed of becoming a
police officer. But there was a major obstacle standing
in his way. He had leukemia and was not expected to
make it to adulthood. When he was seven years old,
Chris’s disease got worse. That’s when a family friend,
Tommy Austin, arranged for Chris to come as close as
he could to living his dream. He called
Officer Ron Cox and arranged for Chris to spend a day
with some police officers.
When the day arrived, Chris was welcomed by three
squad cars and a police motorcycle ridden by Officer
Frank Shankwitz. Then, he was treated to a ride in a
police helicopter. The officers finished the day by
swearing Chris in as the first ― and only ― honorary
state trooper. The next day, Cox presented Chris with an
official Arizona Highway Patrol uniform. With a smile
that lit up the room, he accepted it.
Two days later, Chris died in the hospital, his uniform
close at hand. Shankwitz was very sad, but grateful that
he had helped Chris. He also realized that there were
many other children like Chris. That prompted Shankwitz
to co-found the Make-A-Wish Foundation. It has now
become the largest wish-granting organization in the world,
enlarging the experiences of more than eighty thousand
children.

#2012 6월

#2012 6월 24번
The wrapping of Christmas presents, William Waits notes,
is a fairly recent phenomenon in American life. It arose at the
turn of the 20th century, during a period when hand-made
presents were giving way to machine-made, store-bought
ones. For both givers and manufacturers, this shift presented a
problem, for the machine-made items, precisely because they
were convenient, represented less of the giver’s personal
attention than the hand-made items had done; thus they were
symbolically less intimate. To disguise this loss of symbolic
value, and to invest the manufactured items with a personal
touch, retailers encouraged shoppers to have their purchases
gift-wrapped. Gift-wrapping, in Waits’s acute term, became a
‘decontaminating mechanism’ that removed the presents from
the ‘normal flow of bought-and-sold goods’ and made them,
for a single ceremonial moment, emblems of intimacy rather
than commerce.

#2012 6월 25번
Some people tend to be late as a general rule, whether they
are busy or not. To stop being late, all one has to do is change
the motivation by deciding that in all circumstances being
on time is going to have first priority over any other
consideration. Presto! You will never have to run for a plane
or miss an appointment again. As a lifelong latecomer, that is
how I cured myself. Having made the decision that promptness
was now of major importance, I found that answers came
automatically to such questions as “Can I squeeze in one more
errand before the dentist?” or “Do I have to leave for the
airport now?” The answers are always no, and yes. Choosing
to be on time will make your life enormously easier, and that
of your family, friends, and colleagues as well.

#2012 6월 26번
The hazards of migration range from storms to starvation,
but they are outweighed by the advantages to be found in the
temporary superabundance of food in the summer home. The
process of evolution ensures that a species migrates only if it
pays it to do so. Birds of the same species may be migratory
in one area, but sedentary elsewhere. Most song thrushes
migrate from northern Scotland; but in the south of England,
the balance of advantage against disadvantage is so delicate
that while some migrate to Spain and Portugal, the majority
normally stay in England over winter. Moreover,
England’s winters have been getting warmer since the late
1980’s and if the trend continues it is likely that our song
thrushes will become increasingly sedentary.

#2012 6월 27번
Some people believe that giving to charity is some kind
of instinct, developed because it benefits our species in some
way. At first, this seems like a strange idea: Darwin’s theories
of evolution presume that individuals should act to preserve
their own interests, not those of the species as a whole. But
the British evolutionary biologist Richard Dawkins believes
that natural selection has given us the ability to feel pity for
someone who is suffering. When humans lived in small
clan-based groups, a person in need would be a relative or
someone who could pay you back a good turn later, so taking
pity on others could benefit you in the long run. Modern
societies are much less close-knit and when we see a heartfelt
appeal for charity, chances are we may never even meet the
person who is suffering ― but the emotion of pity is still in
our genes.

#2012 6월 28번
Essentially, your reputation is your most valuable asset ―
so guard it well. But do not be terribly demoralized if you make
some mistakes along the way. With time it is possible to repair
a stained reputation. Every experience you have with someone
else is like a drop of water falling into a pool. As your
experiences with that person grow, the drops accumulate and
the pool deepens. Positive interactions are clear drops of water
and negative interactions are red drops of water. But they
are not equal. That is, a number of clear drops can dilute one red
drop, and that number differs for different people. Those who
are very forgiving only need a few positive experiences ― clear drops
― to dilute a bad experience, while those who are less
forgiving need a lot more to wash away the red.

#2012 6월 29번
When you are picking out products in the grocery store,
searching for the best possible strawberry jam, you are trying
to maximize your own enjoyment. You are the only person
that matters; it is your sense of pleasure that you are trying to
please. In this case, selfishness is the ideal strategy. You
should listen to those cells in the brain that tell you what you
really want. However, when you are making a moral decision,
this egocentric strategy backfires. Moral decisions require taking
other people into account. You cannot act like a greedy brute
or let your anger get out of control. Doing the right thing
means thinking about everybody else, using the emotional
brain to mirror the emotions of strangers. Selfishness needs to
be balanced by some selflessness.

#2012 6월 30번
We tend to consider ourselves as rational decision makers,
logically evaluating the costs and benefits of each alternative
we encounter. However, we are much more primitive than
most assume. A team of economists looked at how consumers
reacted to various pitches by banks to take out a loan. A
purely rational view would have predicted that interest rates
would be the only factor that had an impact. But the scientists
varied more than just the interest rate; they also tested how
persuasive other approaches might be. For instance, some
letters offered a chance to win a cell phone in a lottery if the
customer came in to inquire about a loan. They found that
such an offer increased loan inquiries by as much as dropping
the interest rate five points. For a $50,000 loan, this meant
some customers were in essence willing to pay $16,000 more
in interest to receive a $100 cell phone.

#2012 6월 45번
Behavioral evidence for separate types of taste receptors
comes from studies of the following type: Soak your tongue
for 15 seconds in a sour solution, such as unsweetened
lemon juice. Then try tasting some other sour solution, such
as dilute vinegar. You will find that the second solution
tastes less sour than usual. Depending on the concentrations
of the lemon juice and vinegar, the second solution may not
taste sour at all. This phenomenon, called adaptation,
reflects the fatigue of receptors sensitive to sour tastes.
Now try tasting something salty, sweet, or bitter. These
substances taste about the same as usual. In short, you
experience little cross-adaptation ― reduced response to
one taste after exposure to another. Evidently, the sour
receptors are different from the other taste receptors.
Similarly, you can show that salt receptors are different
from the others and so forth.

The fact that the intensity of a taste is decreased after trying
the same taste, but not after trying a different taste, serves
as evidence for the existence of distinct receptors for
different tastes.

#2012 6월 50번
I observe the moon wherever I go. What phase is it in, I
wonder? When will it reach the full moon phase? Now
imagine what happened to me recently when I was teaching
in Australia, 12,000 miles from my hometown in North
America. Shortly after my arrival, seeing that the skies were
cloudy, I checked the newspaper for a weather report.
Typically, the weather page also gives times for sunrise and
sunset as well as moonrise and moonset.
Picture my surprise when I discovered that the illustrations
in the newspaper were, by my experience, wrong. The
waxing moon appeared to be illuminated on the left side
rather than the right side as I had always known it to be. “I
must call the newspaper,” I thought. But I continued to study
the images in the newspaper and then consulted a globe.
When I imagined myself standing on a spot in the southern
hemisphere, the answer came to me. Here, indeed, south of
the equator, the waxing moon appears to be on the left. Try
this in your imagination, and you will see it, too.
The point is that often we do not see things as they are.
Instead, we see things as we are. That is why it is necessary
in science to have many people making many observations
of the same phenomenon. I am sure that to people in
Australia, the moon in North America would seem strange as well.

#2011 6월

#2011 6월 23번
The ultimate power is the power to get people to do as
you wish. When you can do this without having to force
people or hurt them, when they willingly grant you what you
desire, then your power is untouchable. The best way to
achieve this position is to create a relationship of dependence.
The master requires your services; he is weak, or unable to
function without you; you have involved yourself in his work
so deeply that doing away with you would bring him great
difficulty, or at least would mean valuable time lost in
training another to replace you. Once such a relationship is
established, you have the upper hand to make the master do
as you wish. It is the classic case of the servant of the king
who actually controls the king.

#2011 6월 24번
If you were a butterfly, would you be attracted to a more
colorful flower or a less colorful one? Most of you would
probably prefer the more colorful option. The same is true
for pollinators such as bees and butterflies. For years,
biologists have known that flowers use striking colors,
scents, elaborately shaped petals, and nectar to attract
pollinators. Recent studies, however, reveal another powerful
tool of attraction used by flowers: moving in the wind.
Scientists have discovered that mobile flowers are visited
more often by pollinating insects than their more static
counterparts. It is almost as if the flowers are waving to the
insects, saying, “Welcome. Come here and have a drink.”
Along with this interesting finding, scientists have also
concluded that, due to their greater range of motion, flowers
with long, thin stalks attract more insects.

#2011 6월 25번
A brilliant friend of mine once told me, “When you
suddenly see a problem, something happens that you have the
answer―before you are able to put it into words. It is all
done subconsciously. This has happened many times to me.”
This feeling of knowing without being able to say how one knows is
common. The French philosopher and mathematician Blaise
Pascal is famous for saying, “The heart has its reasons
that reason cannot know.” The great nineteenth-century
mathematician Carl Friedrich Gauss also admitted that
intuition often led him to ideas he could not immediately
prove. He said, “I have had my results for a long time; but
I do not yet know how I am to arrive at them.” Fittingly so,
sometimes true genius simply cannot be put into words.

#2011 6월 26번
Researchers have come to understand how the African village
weaverbird prevents itself from being taken advantage of by
cuckoos―it is all down to the speckles on the eggs. David Lahti
and his colleagues have described how village weaverbirds lay
eggs which all show a very similar pattern of speckles, suggesting
that if a cuckoo laid an egg in the nest, the weaverbird will
be able to spot the foreign egg almost immediately. But when
the researchers studied two colonies of the birds that had been
introduced more than 200 years ago to two islands without any
cuckoos, they found that those birds’ eggs no longer exhibited
the same speckle patterns. In a neat demonstration of the power
of evolution, these results show how, in the absence of pressure
from parasitic cuckoos, the appearance of the eggs has altered
because having a similar pattern is no longer so much of an advantage.

#2011 6월 27번
Why don’t we think differently more often? The reason is
that we do not need to be creative for most of what we do.
For example, we do not need to be creative when we are
driving on the freeway, or riding in an elevator, or waiting in
line at a grocery store. We are creatures of habit when it
comes to the business of living. For most of our activities,
these routines are indispensable. Without them, our lives
would be in chaos, and we would not get much accomplished.
If you got up this morning and started contemplating the
shape of your toothbrush or questioning the meaning of toast,
you probably would not make it to work.

#2011 6월 28번
In Chinese food, the idea is that it should be boiling hot,
because that is crucial to its flavor, embodied in the phrase
wok hei, which means the ‘breath’ or essence of the
combination of tastes added by a hot wok. In 2005 Belgian
researchers at Leuven University confirmed just how the
link between temperature and taste works. They identified
microscopic channels in our taste buds, which seem to
respond differently at different temperatures. Apparently, the
higher the temperature, the more intense the flavor. This is
why ice cream does not taste that sweet straight from the fridge,
which is why ice cream makers add stacks of sugar―as you
can tell all too clearly when ice cream melts. In a similar
way, some bitter tastes, like tea, taste better when hot
because they are more intense.

#2011 6월 29번
Unlike the novel, short story, or play, film is not handy to
study; it cannot be effectively frozen on the printed page.
The novel and short story are relatively easy to study because
they are written to be read. The stage play is slightly more
difficult to study because it is written to be performed. But
plays are printed, and because they rely heavily on the
spoken word, imaginative readers can create at least a pale
imitation of the experience they might have watching a
performance on stage. This cannot be said of the screenplay,
for a film depends greatly on visual and other nonverbal
elements that are not easily expressed in writing. The
screenplay requires so much filling in by our imagination that
we cannot really approximate the experience of a film by
reading a screenplay, and reading a screenplay is worthwhile
only if we have already seen the film. Thus, most screenplays
are published not to be read but rather to be remembered.

#2011 6월 45번
If someone were to say “Life is a cup of coffee,” it is
unlikely that you would have heard this expression
before. But its novelty forces you to think about its
meaning. The vehicle used, a cup of coffee, is a common
object of everyday life and therefore easily perceivable as
a source for thinking about that life. The metaphor
compels you to start thinking of life in terms of the
kinds of physical, social, and other attributes that are
associated with a cup of coffee. For this metaphor to
gain currency, however, it must capture the fancy of
many other people for a period of time. Then and only
then will its novelty have become worn out and will it
become the basis for a new conceptual metaphor: life is
a drinking substance. After that, expressions such as
“life is a cup of tea, life is a bottle of beer, life is a glass
of milk,” will become similarly understandable as
offering different perspectives on life.

A new metaphor initially makes people reflect on its
meaning; if it loses its novelty later by gaining popularity,
it will give birth to similar types of metaphorical expressions.

#2011 6월 49번
Serafina Vinon, a seventy-six-year-old woman from the
Italian Alps, still gets up at five in the morning to milk her
cows. Afterward she cooks a huge breakfast, cleans the
house, and depending on the weather and time of year,
either takes the herd to the meadow, tends the orchard, or
cards some wool. In summer she spends weeks on the high
pastures cutting hay and then carries huge piles of it on her
head the several miles down to the barn. She could reach
the barn in half the time if she took a direct route, but she
prefers following invisible winding trails to save the slopes
from erosion.
When Serafina was asked what she enjoys doing most in
life, she had no trouble answering: milking the cows, taking
them to the pasture, tending the orchard, carding wool. In
effect what she enjoys most is what she has been doing for
a living all along. In her own words, “It gives me a great
satisfaction to be outdoors, to talk with people, and to be
with my animals. I talk to everybody―plants, birds, flowers,
and animals. Everything in nature keeps you company; you
see nature progress every day.”
When she was asked what she would do if she had all
the time and money in the world, Serafina laughed―and
repeated the same list of activities. It is not that Serafina is
ignorant of the alternatives offered by urban life. She
watches television occasionally and reads newsmagazines.
But their more fashionable and modern way of life does
not attract Serafina; she is content with the role she
plays in the universe.

#2010 6월

#2010 6월 23번
We push down our feelings because most of us have
been brought up to believe that there are feelings which are
unacceptable. Some of us learned that all emotions are
unacceptable, while others learned that specific emotions
such as anger or crying are unacceptable. In fact, there is
absolutely nothing wrong with any kind of feeling. When
someone tells you not to feel sad or angry, he or she is
asking the impossible. You can deny the feelings you are
having but you cannot stop them from coming. All that
feelings need, in order to pass, is to be acknowledged and
accepted. Just saying to yourself, or someone else, ‘I feel
angry’ (or sad, or frightened) is a great start. Let yourself
respect the feelings, good or bad.

#2010 6월 24번
Human beings direct their activities toward the
satisfaction of physical wants and general well-being.
They avoid, whenever possible, situations that may bring
about physical deprivation, including pain, hunger, and a
need for sleep. Much contemporary advertising promises
these satisfactions, whether from headache remedies,
fancy foods, or form-fitting mattresses. An individual
can suffer any of these deprivations temporarily, however,
and he may knowingly enter into situations which will
deprive him for a time if he believes that there will be
mate satisfaction. The willingness of astronauts to
undergo periods of intense training is at least partially
explainable in terms of the great rest that they know will
come at the end of their missions.

#2010 6월 25번
No matter how we shake or tap the bottle of ketchup,
some of it refuses to come out. In some cases, up to 20
percent of the product is left in the packaging when it
is thrown out. This is not only annoying for consumers
but also poses difficulties when recycling: The leftovers
first have to be removed from the packaging, which is
expensive, time-consuming, and uses a great deal of
water. A German project by the Fraunhofer Institutes,
together with Munich University of Technology and
various industrial partners, will put an end to this dilemma.
Researchers are applying thin films, no more than 20
nanometers thick, to the inside surface of packaging in
order to reduce leftover traces.

#2010 6월 26번
When we have made an error, as for example in
adding up a column of figures, we have a tendency to
repeat it again and again. This phenomenon is known as
the persistent error. The same thing happens when we try
to solve a problem; each time our thoughts take a certain
course, that course is more likely to be followed the next
time. The reason that we keep making the same error
repeatedly is that associations form between the ideas in
the chain of thoughts and become firmer each time they
are used, until finally the connections are so well
established that the chain is very difficult to break.
Thus, once we have adopted an unprofitable line of
thought, it is harder to adopt a profitable line.

#2010 6월 27번
About three percent of the weight of sea water is accounted
for by salt. The salt content of the ocean is being continually
added to by runoff from the land, but it is not increasing. Yet
salt cannot leave the sea by evaporation because the water
vapor leaves it behind. So for many years it was a mystery as
to why the sea should have so little salt in it, given the rate of
runoff, and particularly if the world was supposed to be
hundreds of millions of years old. The riddle was not solved
until the 1970s, when the deep ocean openings were
discovered. Sea water is swallowed up by these cracks in the
ocean bed; when it reemerges, millions of years later, as steam
from volcanoes, the salt has been filtered out of it on its
passage through the rocks.

#2010 6월 31번
Early photography continued the trend toward the
imprisonment of the subject and the object of representation.
During photography’s first decades, exposure times were
quite long. For instance, the daguerreotype process required
exposures of four to seven minutes in the sun and from
twelve to sixty minutes indoors. Early photographs
represented the world as stable, eternal, and unshakable.
And when photography ventured to represent living
things, they had to be immobilized. Thus, portrait
studios universally employed various holding devices to
assure the steadiness of the sitter throughout the lengthy
time of exposure. The devices firmly held the person in
place. In other words, a person who wanted to see his own
image became a voluntary prisoner of the machine.

#2010 6월 45번
The introduction of the player piano in the United States
at the turn of the 20th century had been accompanied
by fairly critical comments. Player pianos produced
music mechanically through a set of instructions stored
on a music roll. Although proponents of the player piano
such as piano manufacturers and publishers of sheet
music thought that it would lead to ‘an almost universal
music education,’ many music teachers, musicians, and
composers opposed it. Opponents claimed that one could
copy sound, but not interpretation, and that mechanical
instruments reduced the expression of music to
mathematical systems. For this reason, they believed that
mechanized music lessened the ideal of beauty by
‘producing the same after same, with no soul, no joy, no
passion,’ and that the introduction of the player piano
would lead to the disappearance of amateur players.

While some believed that the player piano would
provide a universal music education, others criticized its
mechanized music from an artistic viewpoint.

#2009 6월

#2009 6월 24번
Magicians are honest deceivers. To investigate the secret
used by magicians to fool their audiences, Jastrow worked
with two great illusionists. He invited these performers to
his laboratory and had them participate in a range of tests
measuring their speed of movement and accuracy of finger
motion. But Jastrow’s results revealed little out of the
ordinary. He demonstrated magic has little to do with fast
movements. Instead, magicians use a range of psychological
weapons to fool their audiences. The technique of
suggestion, which captures people’s minds, plays a key
role in the process. In the same way that people can be
made to believe that they once went on a non-existent trip
in a hot-air balloon, so magicians have to be able to
manipulate people’s perception of performance.

#2009 6월 25번
In traditional societies, high status may have been
extremely hard to acquire, but it was also comfortingly
hard to lose. It was as difficult to stop being a lord as,
more darkly, it was to cease being a servant. What
mattered was one’s identity at birth, rather than anything
one might achieve in one’s lifetime through the exercise
of one’s abilities. The great aspiration of modern
societies, however, has been to reverse this equation―to
strip away both inherited privilege and inherited
under-privilege in order to make rank dependent on
individual achievement. Status in the current society
rarely depends on an unchangeable identity handed down
through the generations.

#2009 6월 26번
I enjoy shopping at FW Whole Foods nearly as much as
I enjoy browsing a good bookstore. It’s the inspiring
expressions that elevate the food into a more exciting
experience, one with artistic, emotional, and even political
dimensions. On a recent visit I filled my shopping cart
with eggs “from cage-free vegetarian hens,” milk from
cows that live “free from unnecessary fear,” and tomatoes
from HSR Farm, “one of the early pioneers of the organic
movement.” In this regard, shopping at FW Whole Foods
is a literary experience. Indeed, every time I shop in FW
Whole Foods, I think that this is a place where the skills
of a literary critic might come in handy―perhaps also a
journalist’s.

#2009 6월 27번
Kate and her classmate, Jamie, were the youngest of the
winning teams in the Stop Racism National Video
Competition in 1998. Their submission depicted children
playing at a nursery accompanied by messages such as
“Everyone is the same; all these babies are beautiful.”
Kate says the point of their video was to show that human
beings are not genetically coded with racist attitudes.
“Children pick up racist ideas from their surroundings as
they grow up,” she explains. And she
adds, “The children at the nursery don’t say, ‘I am not
playing with you since you’re black,’ because they don’t
really know about racism.” According to Kate, education
begins with the younger generation. And if they grow up
experiencing all sorts of cultures, they have less bias.

#2009 6월 31번
We’re always seeking the next opportunity for something
big. If you talk to a cab driver in Manhattan, you’re likely to
find that he’s going to school to get a better job. Likewise,
if you meet a waitress in Southern California, she’s likely
to tell you that she has an audition for a movie next week.
The cab driver might never get out of his cab and the
waitress might be serving food for the next twenty years, but
the sense that they’re moving toward something more
glamorous is very important to them personally. On the other hand,
those who fail to act, who accept the limitations of their
work without complaining, are likely to feel miserable
about their lives. The hopelessness of their jobs has done
critical damage to their identities.

#2009 6월 45번
Charles Wilson was asked how his experience as
president of a large company could apply to the
presidents of small companies. Wilson answered that
when he was just a boy he worked for a dairy filling
milk bottles. The bottles were all different sizes.
Working in the dairy he learned that no matter what
s ize the bottle was, the cream, the best part of milk,
always came to the top. You can learn the same
lesson. It doesn’t matter what size company you work
for; you can always be the cream. To become the
cream, continue to learn throughout your life, be open
to new ideas and be aware of what is going on in the
world which will affect you. You will rise to the top.

Inspired by Charles Wilson’s experience, the author says
that regardless of the size of the company, anyone
can be the best by improving himself / herself.

#2009 6월 50번
If you don’t have time to walk your child to school
every day, maybe your child could join a walking bus.
This is a s et-up by which a group of children are walked
to school by adult volunteers along a set route. Like a
normal bus, the walking bus follows a timetable, so
children can be picked up at scheduled times along the
way. The volunteers take turns supervising the “bus.”
This is attractive because the car stays at home, which
reduces traffic outside the school. Also, children
are getting exercise in the morning and it’s said that if
children exercise before class their brains are more ready
to learn.

It is better if children can visit their friends in the
village by themselves. Otherwise, you have to walk or
drive to drop them off and pick them up, wasting
valuable time. We do have to drive them to activities and
classes though. For example, my daughter, Katie, has a
dance class and my son, Peter, has football, both in
neighboring villages. What I try to do is to arrange rides
for my kids with other parents. However, I think some
people are a bit shy about saying, “I could take them
this week, if you could do it next week,” but I don’t
mind asking and people are pleased when I do. It’s not
just that it saves fuel, time, and money, but it helps to
decrease the amount of traffic in the villages,
which is also good for the environment.

#2008 6월

#2008 6월 24번
Whether you are vacationing in Europe, spending the
winter in Florida, or just visiting a friend’s house for the
weekend, a successful trip depends on good packing.
Nothing is more frustrating than arriving at your destination
only to realize that you have left behind your toothbrush,
pajamas, important medication, or travel documents.
Successful packing requires you to remember everything
that you normally need in daily life, as well as any special
items you will need at your destination. Unfortunately,
most of us pack at the last minute, and this kind of stress
can interfere with our memories, increasing the chances of
our forgetting something we might need.

#2008 6월 25번
The distinctive property of cultural behavior, as
ethologists use the term, is the way it is passed on from
one generation to the next. Instead of being inherited by
the process of Mendelian genetics, it is ‘inherited’ by
imitation. An animal acquires a behavior pattern by
imitating it from another. Thus, for a species to acquire a
culture, its members should be able not only to learn and
memorize but also to meet other members of its own
species sufficiently often. Cultural behavior is, therefore,
most likely to be found in species that form social groups.

#2008 6월 26번
How can I learn to be a manager? A familiar answer to
this question is to say that managers learn from experience.
But can experience alone be the best way to be a
manager? Several writers have expressed their doubts on
this matter. Oscar Wilde noted that ‘experience is the name
everyone gives to their mistakes.’ And the historian Froude
wrote that ‘experience teaches slowly and at the cost of
mistakes.’ Experience is an essential way of learning to
improve but is an imperfect instrument. We also need
guidance from a good manager who will help us to learn
from mistakes and make better use of them in the future.

#2008 6월 27번
Even a relatively small increase in independence in daily lives
can make people much happier and lengthen their lives.
This was evident when doctors in retirement villages in the
United States encouraged residents to decide the details of
their daily lives themselves. They were no longer simply
presented with their meals, but could choose from a menu.
While previously the caretakers watered the plants, the
elderly took over this responsibility for themselves. These
small changes worked miracles. The senior citizens became
ill less frequently, and in interviews expressed greater
happiness. Most striking of all, the annual death rate was
reduced by half.

#2008 6월 30번
At certain times in history, cultures have taken it for
granted that a person was not fully human unless he or
she learned to master thoughts and feelings. In ancient
Sparta, in Republican Rome, and among the British upper
classes of the Victorian era, For example, people were
held responsible for keeping control of their emotions.
Anyone who lost his or her temper too easily was
deprived of the right to be accepted as a member of the
community. In other historical periods such as the one in
which we are now living, however, the ability to
control oneself is not always highly respected. People
who attempt it are often thought to be odd.

#2008 6월 45번
While we’re walking or traveling, we normally spend
less than a second looking at everyday objects that we
encounter. The days pass by us without our really being
aware of them. Scientists have discovered that the
average time we spend looking at things has been
s teadily decreasing during the last 50 years. In their
s tudy, they also discovered that this decrease leads to a
lack of interest and enjoyment in life. Just try looking
at objects for at least five seconds. Good opportunities
for this exercise come when you’re walking or looking
out of a car or train window. You’ll find that five
s econds is long enough to help you appreciate things
from a new point of view.

Spending more time observing things around us will
allow us to enjoy them from a fresh perspective.

#2008 6월 50번
[Person A] Can you imagine what the world today
would be like if Leonardo da Vinci had become a
farmer or Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart a banker? What
would the world be like without art? To protect and
promote culture, governments have a responsibility as
representatives of society to support the arts. Cultural
property is not always in fashion, but remains important.
Who, if not the government, would house these treasures
for future generations? Without governmental aid to the
arts, there would be a great deal of culture lost because
of a lack of funding to either promote their creation or
protect them for future generations.

[Person B] The importance of art is determined by the
people who value it, not by governments acting as its
protectors. Culture should not be shaped by governments,
but grow naturally from a society of people. When
artists show that they are truly gifted, their genius will
be recognized and rewarded. If not, it simply has no
value in society. It would be absurd to sugges t that the
government support great plumbers, dentists, or bankers.
So, it is also absurd to suggest that governments decide
what art is and attempt to preserve items they regard as
representative of our lives.

#2007 6월

#2007 6월 24번
People seem to be more motivated by the thought of
losing something than by the thought of gaining something
of equal value. According to some researchers, college students
experienced much stronger emotions when asked to imagine
losses as opposed to gains in their romantic relationships or
in their grade point averages. Especially, under conditions
of risk and uncertainty, the threat of potential loss plays a
critical role in human decision-making. In this vein,
physicians’ advice to smokers, describing the number of
years to be gained if they do quit, might be somewhat
ineffective as compared with advice describing the
number of years of life to be lost if they do not quit.

#2007 6월 25번
I was using a microcassette recorder to study for a final
examination. As I was listening to my own reading of a
stack of notes, I heard myself reacting to the words. It was
actually kind of funny. This gave me the idea of recording
myself when I was angry, upset or depressed, then listening
to it later. When I was feeling somewhat miserable and
sad, I started taping myself. The next day, when I was
feeling alright again, I played it back. It was a real
eye-opener! It really gave me an opportunity to see myself
from a different perspective. I learned that self-change is
difficult without some kind of feedback.

#2007 6월 26번
Young writers visiting the National Library are brought
to a special section where the rough drafts of famous
authors are kept. This practice has quite an impact on
those writers who previously thought that the works of
geniuses arrived complete in a single stroke of inspiration.
Here, young writers can examine how often a successful
author starts with an apparently random series of ideas.
Later, many of these ideas are not included in the final
design, but they were essential to the process of developing
a new concept. That is, the early drafts are not discarded
like mistakes, but are viewed as the initial steps in
unfolding the idea.

#2007 6월 27번
Stephanie Scott’s pit bull, Reilly Roo, is friendly and
affectionate, even with strangers. “There’s nothing about her
that makes her different from any other dog,” says Stephanie.
She and others say that a few irresponsible owners give pit
bulls a bad name by raising them to fight. They point to a
government study which says that laws banning specific
dog breeds do not work because any type of dog can be trained to
attack. Some pit bull lovers argue that other dog breeds are just
as, if not more, dangerous. “I tell people who come to my
house, ‘Don’t worry about my pit bulls; worry about my
toy poodle. She will bite you,’ ” says Devi Barry, a
Michigan resident.

#2007 6월 30번
The Douglas Academy has continued to develop.
After three years of continuing academic achievements,
we successfully introduced Chinese, Spanish and French
into the curriculum, along with other new courses, to
keep the academy vital and to meet better the students’
needs in this age of globalization. We also recruited
outside supporters who gave financial and other types of
aid to help us carry out these new programs. We want
students to spend most of their time in the academy,
since many students do not have quiet places to study,
ready access to tutors, or recreation areas in which to
play sports or to take part in other activities.

The Douglas Academy has developed a practical curriculum for
students, and hopes to make the academy central to students’ lives.

#2007 6월 44번
In the 17th century, Londoners of every sort enjoyed
the theater, except some strict people who thought it
wasted time that should have been spent working. The
audience―noblemen, merchants, craftsmen and idlers―
all went through the same doors together. The richer ones
sat in the galleries, and everyone else stood in the yard:
shopkeepers with their families, young trainees, soldiers,
seamen, apple sellers and laborers of all kinds. Gentlewomen
always had a man with them to show that they were
respectable. Even for ordinary women, it was not acceptable
to go alone unless they were selling something.

#2007 6월 49번
Cold and exhausted, I went to a small restaurant just
beside the station, the only one which opened at night.
It only had four tables and several benches. A woman
who was both the waitress and the cook took care of
three big pots. Flames were dancing under them, now
blue and then red, comforting my body and soul. In one
pot, chicken soup was bubbling and steaming. Large
pieces of pepper were floating on the surface. I had
intended to get something hot to drink to warm myself,
but now I hesitated. I could not decide whether I
should buy a bowl of chicken soup since I cannot stand
strong pepper.
The woman kindly asked me to taste the chicken
soup first and then make the decision. Her voice was a
little bit rough, reminding me of my mother. Because of
her kindness, I ordered one bowl. The woman stirred
the soup and scooped up lots of meat for me. I sat
in a corner sipping the soup slowly, casually listening to
country fellows’ chatting, which was like flowing water.
Here it was simple. Here it was warm. I wished the
night would have been longer so that I could stay here
longer. I did not care about the restaurant’s smallness. I
did not care about its lack of cleanliness. I just wanted
to enjoy its quietness and the warmth. I was just afraid
of returning to the cruel world, full of suffering and struggling.

#2006 6월(스캔)

#2005 6월

#2005 6월 21번
In everyday language, we talk of “my place,” “our
home,” and “our neighborhood.” This is because we think
of our home as our own private territory. People need a
place of their own, where they can get away from others
and feel a sense of being in charge. Even within families,
we attach ourselves to our own territories. For example,
the kitchen tends to “belong” to the one who prepares the
meals. We like to have our own workrooms and our own
bedrooms, or at least our own side of the bed! People personalize
their territories to emphasize where one ends
and another begins.

#2005 6월 22번
The great fault in John’s character was a strong dislike
of all kinds of domestic duty. This was not from a lack of
diligence or perseverance. He would carry a shotgun on
his shoulder for hours to shoot a few squirrels or wild
pigeons, and he was always first to appear at local events.
The women of the village used to count on him to run
their errands, and he would never refuse to help a
neighbor, even in the roughest work. As for taking care of
his own family and keeping his farm in order, however,
he found these tasks impossible. In a word, John was
ready to attend to anybody’s business but his own.

#2005 6월 23번
Thanks to the printing press, the display of royal power
could now be depicted in printed pictures, which were
sold cheaply and in large quantities. Crowning ceremonies,
court celebrations, and parades for military victories could
now all be seen by common people who had never been
to the capital. The state’s power was thus brought closer
to the people. Even the king himself could now be seen
by them as he was represented visibly, too. The pictures
showed people what their ruler looked like. Not
surprisingly, kings ensured that they presented themselves
as impressively as possible, with all the glory of their
dignity and power.

#2005 6월 24번
Whether it is a business-to-business transaction or a retail
sale, e-commerce shifts the balance of power in favor of
the customer. This happens because the Web reduces distances.
Instead of spending hours driving around comparison
shopping, a Web shopper can quickly gather information
about products and sellers almost anywhere. Businesses have
found that the real distance between producers and
consumers has disappeared. In this new economic situation,
the buyer is king. If one seller cannot deliver a superior
product at a competitive price in real time, another seller
will. The realization that any business can directly reach a
final consumer is changing the relationships among
producers, wholesalers, distributors, retailers, and consumers.

#2005 6월 29번
Many public figures have hired speech writers for
political or business purposes. You may have heard
such well-known phrases as “Read my lips” or “A
kinder, gentler nation.” A female professional speech
writer is credited with creating these phrases, capturing
abstract ideas and putting them into practical language.
The very existence of speech writers like her causes
many politicians or business people to think that if
they just hire a good speech writer, they will become
memorable speech makers overnight. Unfortunately, that
assumption is wrong. In reality, speech writers cannot
make their clients great, or even good, speakers.

#2005 6월 38번
Dear Editor:
I read with interest the proposal to add four floors to
the downtown public library building at a cost of $5.3
million. I am extremely concerned, however, that no
plans have been made to improve user access.
Despite this, please be informed that you are very
much in my thoughts during this time of difficulty.
At present there are only a handful of street parking
spaces near the library, but you would be lucky to find
one free. I wonder how many policy-makers have driven
around and around searching for a parking place. How
many have walked five or six blocks carrying a
back-breaking load of books? It is utterly useless to
spend $5.3 million on a facility that only a few will
have access to.

#2005 6월 43번
The picture storybook is an invitation to begin reading.
It is a primary source of involvement, offering a way
for the young child to approach a book, to visualize a
story, and to revis it the story. The tellers of these tales
create stories that can be easily remembered and appeal
to young children by means of text and illustrations.
Thes e mutually supporting elements are often seen as
separate aspects, each telling the tale in its own way.
This has given rise to the name “twice-told tales.”
However, for the young child, there is no
separation of text and pictures, which are as
interdependent as the lyrics and melody that make up
a song. Children, unlike adults, view both as vital to
the meaning of the s tory. When a child is undecided
about whether she likes the illustrations or the text
better, therefore, we can be s ure that a good match
has been achieved. The bes t picture books thus
contain words and pictures which complement each
other and are dependent upon each other to the point
that one would be ineffective without the other.

#2004 6월

#2004 6월 21번
We are trained to control bad feelings such as anger
or sorrow in public and to think before we act on them.
That doesn’t necessarily mean we should make this kind
of control a habit in our personal lives. My advice?
Unexpressed feelings are harmful. If you’re not alone,
simply postpone them for a few moments. Then go
somewhere private and do whatever the feeling seems to
want you to do. Cry, tremble, or shake your fists. In
short expressing feelings, is good for your mental health.

#2004 6월 22번
Your blood should normally contain a certain amount
of water and salt. This is also true of the tissues. Now,
suppose this balance is upset for some reason such as a
long hike. Then, your blood draws water from the
tissues of your body in order to keep its balance
constant. As the water is being removed from the
tissues, it registers in your brain. The brain sends a
signal to the throat, making it contract. This contraction
makes you feel thirsty.

#2004 6월 23번
Archibald Spooner was well known in England for his
slips of the tongue. He was a teacher at Oxford
University and a clergyman as well. Dr. Spooner suffered
from nervousness and poor eyesight. This may have made
it difficult for him to see words correctly and to repeat
them accurately. One time he told a student that he had
“hissed the mystery lectures” when he meant to say
“missed the history lectures.” He told another student that
the young man had “tasted a worm.” He meant to say that
the student had “wasted a term.” Today, this particular
type of pronunciation error is often called a “Spoonerism.”

#2004 6월 24번
The last time I went out for breakfast, I had to choose
among ten types of pancakes, six varieties of juice, and
four kinds of potatoes. To my surprise, my wife and
children love all this. They love going into an ice cream
shop and being able to choose among seventy-five flavors
of ice cream and seventy-five flavors of topping to put
on them. For my part, I increasingly find that I miss
simplicity. Faced with a glass case filled with eighteen
types of coffee, I just wish for a nice cup of tea. I’m
afraid I am the only person in the house who feels that
way.

#2004 6월 25번
Some history researchers suggest Marco Polo never actually visited
China. Why do they say that? First, they ask why
he didn’t write about the Great Wall. It’s hard to miss!
Then, they point out he also failed to mention Chinese
tea-drinking ceremonies, a very important part of life
there. Moreover, no Chinese sources of the period
mention Marco Polo, although they mention other
foreigners. Finally, some say he never traveled much
farther than Turkey. Travelers who tried to follow his
route always became los t at this point. Perhaps he copied
details from guidebooks on China.

#2004 6월 26번
Glittering gems called diamonds are among the most
precious of human possessions. Through the ages, they
have been a lasting evidence of wealth. Lands may lose
their soil, buildings may be destroyed, stocks and bonds
may become worthless, but the value of diamonds
remains relatively unchanged. In addition, the diamond is
the hardest substance ever known. Because of this, it is of
great value for practical use. In fact, about three-fourths of
the total annual supply of diamonds is used in factories
and machine shops.

#2004 6월 27번
Reporter : Where did you get ideas for your fantasy movies?
Mr. Ray: Well, I had all the fears that a lot of kids
have. I was frightened of the dark, of the
wind in the trees. I imagined horrible
monsters living in my bed. Even Snow
White gave me a nightmare. But as I grew
older, this kind of fear gradually changed to
fascination. This fascination gave me
inspiration for my movies.
Reporter : How did you get interested in making movies?
Mr. Ray: My father had a movie camera. He would
take pictures of my family. At twelve, I
borrowed my father’s camera and started
making movies: writing scripts for my family
and filming family events. That’s how I
started my first movie. You know what?
Actually, I didn’t ever give that camera back
to my father.

#2004 6월 29번
Driving home with my family one day, I noticed smoke
① risen from the roof of an apartment building. My father
and I raced to the nearest fire station, where we told the
fire chief and then escorted the fire engines to the
apartment. Getting no response to their knocks, two
firemen immediately began smashing down the door
with axes. I’m not sure who was more surprised when
they rushed through the apartment, the firemen or the three
men who were barbecuing on the balcony.

#2004 6월 38번
The Celtic New Year was November 1. The night
before was considered a special night when ghosts
and witches roamed the earth. Ghosts and witches are
still associated with Halloween. On the night before
the Celtic New Year, people went from hous e to
house begging for food. They wore masks so that the
spirits returning from the dead would not recognize
them. Today children still wear masks and
trick-or-treat from door to door on Halloween. The
Celts also carried lanterns to frighten away the spirits.
They carved the lanterns from vegetables like
potatoes. Now pumpkins hold lighted candles on
Halloween.

Many Halloween customs come from the ancient practices of the
Celtic people.

#2019 9월

#2019 9월 29번(정답 5번 미해결)
Not all organisms are able to find sufficient food to survive,
so starvation is a kind of disvalue often found in nature. It
also is part of the process of selection by which biological
evolution functions. Starvation helps filter out those less fit to
survive, those less resourceful in finding food for themselves
and their young. In some circumstances, it may pave the way
for genetic variants to take hold in the population of a species
and eventually allow the emergence of a new species in place of
the old one. Thus starvation is a disvalue that can help make
possible the good of greater diversity. Starvation can be of
practical or instrumental value, even as it is an intrinsic
disvalue. ⑤ What some organisms must starve in nature is
deeply regrettable and sad. The statement remains implacably
true, even though starvation also may sometimes subserve ends
that are good.

#2019 9월 30번
For every toxic substance, process, or product in use today,
there is a safer alternative ― either already in existence, or
waiting to be discovered through the application of human
intellect, ingenuity, and effort. In almost every case, the safer
alternative is available at a comparable cost.
Industry may reject these facts and complain about the high
cost of acting, but history sets the record straight. The
chemical industry denied that there were practical alternatives
to ozone-depleting chemicals, predicting not
only economic disaster but numerous deaths because food and
vaccines would spoil without refrigeration. They were wrong.
The motor vehicle industry initially denied that cars caused air
pollution, then claimed that no technology existed to reduce
pollution from vehicles, and later argued that installing devices
to reduce air pollution would make cars extremely expensive.
They were wrong every time. The pesticide industry argues that
synthetic pesticides are absolutely necessary
to grow food. Thousands of organic farmers are proving
them wrong.

#2019 9월 31번
Among the most fascinating natural temperature-regulating
behaviors are those of social insects such as bees and ants.
These insects are able to maintain a nearly constant temperature
in their hives or mounds throughout the year. The constancy of
these microclimates depends not just on the location and
insulation of the habitat, but on the activity of the insects in
the colony. When the surrounding temperature increases, the activity
in the hive decreases, which decreases the amount of heat
generated by insect metabolism. In fact, many animals decrease
their activity in the heat and increase it in the cold, and people
who are allowed to choose levels of physical activity in hot or
cold environments adjust their workload precisely to body
temperature. This behavior serves to avoid both hypothermia
and hyperthermia.

#2019 9월 32번
Although most people, including Europe’s Muslims, have
numerous identities, few of these are politically salient at any
moment. It is only when a political issue affects the welfare of
those in a particular group that identity assumes importance.
For instance, when issues arise that touch on women’s rights,
women start to think of gender as their principal identity.
Whether such women are American or Iranian or whether they
are Catholic or Protestant matters less than the fact that they
are women. Similarly, when famine and civil war threaten
people in sub-Saharan Africa, many African-Americans are
reminded of their kinship with the continent in which their
ancestors originated centuries earlier, and they lobby their
leaders to provide humanitarian relief. In other words, each issue
calls forth somewhat different identities that help explain the
political preferences people have regarding those issues.

#2019 9월 33번
Food unites as well as distinguishes eaters because what
and how one eats forms much of one’s emotional tie to a
group identity, be it a nation or an ethnicity. The famous
twentieth-century Chinese poet and scholar Lin Yutang
remarks, “Our love for fatherland is largely a matter of
recollection of the keen sensual pleasure of our childhood. The
loyalty to Uncle Sam is the loyalty to American doughnuts,
and the loyalty to the Vaterland is the loyalty to Pfannkuchen
and Stollen.” Such keen connection between food and national
or ethnic identification clearly indicates the truth that cuisine
and table narrative occupy a significant place in the training
grounds of a community and its civilization, and thus, eating,
cooking, and talking about one’s cuisine are vital to
one’s unique personality and taste. In other words, the destiny
of a community depends on how well it nourishes its members.

#2019 9월 34번
Modern psychological theory states that the process of
understanding is a matter of construction, not reproduction, which
means that the process of understanding takes the form of the
interpretation of data coming from the outside and generated by
our mind. For example, the perception of a moving object as a
car is based on an interpretation of incoming data within the
framework of our knowledge of the world. While the interpretation
of simple objects is usually an uncontrolled process, the
interpretation of more complex phenomena, such as interpersonal
situations, usually requires active attention and thought.
Psychological studies indicate that it is knowledge possessed
by the individual that determines which stimuli become the
focus of that individual’s attention, what significance he or she
assigns to these stimuli, and how they are combined into a larger
whole. This subjective world, interpreted in a particular way,
is for us the “objective” world; we cannot know any world
other than the one we know as a result of our own interpretations.

#2019 9월 40번
Perceptions of forest use and the value of forests as
standing timber vary considerably from indigenous peoples
to national governments and Western scientists. These
differences in attitudes and values lie at the root of
conflicting management strategies and stimulate protest
groups such as the Chipko movement. For example, the
cultivators of the Himalayas and Karakoram view forests as
essentially a convertible resource. That is, under increasing
population pressure and growing demands for cultivable
land, the conversion of forest into cultivated terraces means
a much higher productivity can be extracted from the same
area. Compensation in the form of planting on terrace edges
occurs to make up for the clearance. This contrasts with the
national view of the value of forests as a renewable
resource, with the need or desire to keep a forest cover over
the land for soil conservation, and with a global view of
protection for biodiversity and climate change purposes,
irrespective of the local people’s needs.

For indigenous peoples forests serve as a source of
transformable resources, while national and global perspectives
prioritize the preservation of forests, despite the local needs.

#2019 9월 42번(정답 3번 (c) 미해결)
As a couple start to form a relationship, they can be seen to
develop a set of constructs about their own relationship and,
in particular, how it is similar or different to their parents’
relationship. The couple’s initial disclosures involve them
forming constructs about how much similarity there is
between them and each other’s families. What each of them
will remember is selective and coloured by their family’s
constructs system. In turn it is likely that as they tell each
other their already edited stories, there is a second process of
editing whereby what they both hear from each other is again
interpreted within their respective family of origin’s
construct systems. The two sets of memories ― the person
talking about his or her family and the partner’s edited
version of this story ― go into the ‘cooking-pot’ of the
couple’s new construct system. Subsequently, one partner
may (c) randomly recall a part of the other’s story as a tactic
in negotiations: for example, Harry may say to Doris that she
is being ‘bossy ― just like her mother’. Since this is probably
based on what Doris has told Harry, this is likely to be a very
powerful tactic. She may protest or attempt to rewrite this
version of her story, thereby possibly adding further material
that Harry could use in this way. These exchanges of stories
need not always be employed in such malevolent ways.
These reconstructed memories can become very powerful, to
a point where each partner may become confused even about
the simple factual details of what actually did happen in
their past.

#2018 9월

#2018 9월 31번
One unspoken truth about creativity ― it isn’t about wild
talent so much as it is about productivity. To find a few
ideas that work, you need to try a lot that don’t. It’s a pure
numbers game. Geniuses don’t necessarily have a higher
success rate than other creators; they simply do more ― and
they do a range of different things. They have more successes
and more failures. That goes for teams and companies too.
It’s impossible to generate a lot of good ideas without also
generating a lot of bad ideas. The thing about creativity is that
at the outset, you can’t tell which ideas will succeed and
which will fail. So the only thing you can do is try to fail
faster so that you can move onto the next idea.

#2018 9월 32번
Let me spend a moment on the idea of adjusting to another
person’s mental orientation. What I mean is this. At any moment,
a person has a particular take on what is happening. The
person notices this rather than that, and she has feelings and
makes judgements about one rather than another aspect of
events. If she is hungry, for example, she may notice that a
shop is selling groceries; her friend may notice only that it sells
newspapers. If she is short of money, she may resent that the
fruit is overpriced; meanwhile her friend may feel tempted by
some juicy peaches. In one sense the two friends are
experiencing the same shop and its contents, but they are
having quite different experiences of that shop. A more
extreme case arises when one person comprehends things in a
peculiar and individual way, for instance, in mistaking the shop
for a cinema.

#2018 9월 33번
Externalization is the foundation from which many
narrative conversations are built. This requires a particular
shift in the use of language. Often externalizing conversations
involve tracing the influence of the problem in a child’s life
over time and how the problem has disempowered the child
by limiting his ability to see things in a different light. The
counsellor helps the child to change by deconstructing old
stories and reconstructing preferred stories about himself and
his life. To help the child to develop a new story, the
counsellor and child search for times when the problem has
not influenced the child or the child’s life and focus on the
different ways the child thought, felt and behaved. These
exceptions to the problem story help the
child create a new and preferred story. As a new and preferred
story begins to emerge, it is important to assist the child to
hold on to, or stay connected to, the new story.

#2018 9월 34번
The narratives that people create to understand their
landscapes come to be viewed as marketable entities and a
source of income for residents. Landscapes with a strong
place identity have an advantage in marketing to tourists, as it
is relatively easy to compartmentalize and market their
narratives. Such places may have disadvantages as well,
however. If place identity is tied to a particular industry, local
residents may feel strongly attached to the definitions of place
that stem from involvement in that industry, and they may
resist losing that identity in favor of one based
on a tourism industry. People rooted in landscape may feel
strong connections to other community members and may
resent the invasion of outsiders who they believe are different
and challenge their common identity. Finally, local residents
may feel that this process reduces their identities to mere
commercial transactions, and they may believe they sacrifice
what is unique and special about their place.

#2018 9월 40번
The weakness of local networks lies in their
self-containment, for they lack input as well as outreach. In
a classic study of urban politics, Herbert Gans found that
neighborhoods with the highest levels of solidarity often
were unable to block unfavorable policies and programs for
lack of ties to possible allies elsewhere in the city. It was for
this reason that Gans referred to them as “urban villagers.”
As the opposite of local networks, cosmopolitan networks
offer little solidarity and have little capacity to comfort and
sustain members. But members benefit from a constant
flow of new information and from the great reach of their
influence, even if it tends to be somewhat lacking in
strength. Local networks tend to be small. In contrast,
cosmopolitan networks can be huge. Thus, while the
“urban villagers” lacked ties even to their local city
government, cosmopolitan network ties often lead into the
White House.

Unlike the “urban villagers,” whose loose ties to the
outside restrict them within their boundaries, cosmopolitan
networks profit from exposure to new information
and a more extensive range of relationships.

#2018 9월 42번
An ecosystem that is altered or damaged in some way will
be out of balance with the biome for that area. For example,
if the local biome is forest, but the trees have been removed
from one area, then the ecosystem is out of balance. The
natural tendency is for plant species to move into that area,
bringing the ecosystem back towards the biome state. The
spread of a species into a new area is called colonisation. It
can happen naturally only if there are ecologically healthy
ecosystems nearby to provide plant seeds. Once the
vegetation has started to recover, insects, birds and other
animals will travel into the newly regenerated area.
These processes of ecological colonisation can be
supported by environmental management. For example,
we are currently seeing important changes in the way
agriculture is carried out in Britain. Rather than just
maximising food production, farming is becoming more
environmentally friendly, with the support of financial
subsidies. This new approach increases biological diversity
by conserving hedges and the wildflowers, insects, birds and
other animals that live on the land. A proportion of
agricultural land is left completely uncultivated so that
species can gradually colonise it. This provides a habitat for
a wider range of species. Leaving some farmland as
set-aside is also a way to decrease overall production when
that is economically desirable. Note that set-aside land is
more permanent than fallow land, which is usually left for
only a year. Colonisation is a slow process, taking place over
years or even decades.

#2017 9월

#2017 9월 31번
A sleeping mother has the ability to identify the particular
cry of her own baby. This is one of the bonding factors that
has been forgotten because of the way in which we live today.
Typically, there is now only one newborn baby in any family
house or apartment, so there is no way to test this ability. In
an ancient tribe, however, living in small huts in a tiny village
settlement, a mother would have been able to hear any of the
babies crying in the night. If she woke up every time one of
them screamed for food, she might get no sleep at all. During
the course of evolution she became programmed to awake
only at the sound of her own particular baby. This sensitivity
is still there to this day, even though it is seldom used.

#2017 9월 32번
When people try to control situations that are essentially
uncontrollable, they are inclined to experience high levels of
stress. Thus, suggesting that they need to take active control is
bad advice in those situations. What they need to do is to accept
that some things are beyond their control. Similarly, teaching
people to accept a situation that could readily be changed could
be bad advice; sometimes the only way to get what you want is
to take active control. Research has shown that when people who
feel helpless fail to take control, they experience negative
emotional states such as anxiety and depression. Like stress,
these negative emotions can damage the immune response. We
can see from this that health is not linearly related to control.
For optimum health, people should be encouraged to take control to
a point but to recognize when further control is impossible.

#2017 9월 33번
A good deal of the information stored in working memory is
encoded in an auditory form, especially when the information is
language based. For example, in an early study by Conrad, adults
were shown six-letter sequences, with letters being presented
visually, one at a time, at intervals of three-fourths of a second.
As soon as the last letter of a sequence had been presented,
participants in the study wrote down all six of the letters they had
seen, guessing at any letters they couldn’t easily recall. When
people recalled letters incorrectly, the letters they said they had
seen were more likely to resemble the actual stimuli in terms
of how the letters sounded than how they looked.
For example, the letter F was “remembered” as the auditorially
similar letter S 131 times but as the visually similar letter P only
14 times. Similarly, the letter V was remembered as B 56 times
but as X only 5 times.

#2017 9월 34번
Even if it is correct to say that we express and represent
our thoughts in language, it may be a big mistake to suppose
that there are structural similarities between what is doing the
representing and what is represented. Robert Stalnaker, in his
book Inquiry, suggests an analogy with the representation of
numbers: The number 9 can be represented as ‘12—3’ but it
does not follow that 12, 3, or subtraction are constituents of
the number 9. We could compare a thought and its verbal
expression with toothpaste and its ‘expression’ from a tube.
That the result of expressing toothpaste is a long, thin,
cylinder does not entail that toothpaste itself is long, thin, or
cylindrical. Similarly, a thought might get expressed out loud
in a statement with a particular linguistic structure. It does not
follow that the thought itself has such a structure.
Suppose, for example, that I look at a fruit bowl, and think
that there is an apple and an orange in that bowl. The objects
in front of my eyes include some pieces of fruit and a bowl,
but no object corresponding to the word ‘and’ exists either in
the world or in my visual image.

#2017 9월 40번
In science one experiment, whether it succeeds or fails, is
logically followed by another in a theoretically infinite
progression. According to the underlying myth of modern
science, this progression is always replacing the smaller
knowledge of the past with the larger knowledge of the
present, which will be replaced by the yet larger knowledge
of the future. In the arts, by contrast, no limitless sequence of
works is ever implied or looked for. No work of art is
necessarily followed by a second work that is necessarily
better. Given the methodologies of science, the law of gravity
and the genome were bound to be discovered by somebody;
the identity of the discoverer is incidental to the fact. But it
appears that in the arts there are no second chances. We must
assume that we had one chance each for The Divine Comedy
and King Lear. If Dante and Shakespeare had died before
they wrote those works, nobody ever would have written them.

While scientific knowledge is believed to progress through
successive experiments, an artistic work tends to be
unique to its creator with no limitless sequence implied.

#2017 9월 42번
Three composers attended a show at the Café Concert des
Ambassadeurs. There they heard performances of a song written
by one of them and a sketch written by the other two. After the
performance, the three refused to pay their bill, telling the owner
of the café: ‘You use the products of our labour without paying
us for it. So there’s no reason why we should pay for your
service’. The case went to court, and the composers won on
appeal. The decision extended an existing law on theatrical
performances to all musical works and all public performance
of those works. This decision created a new category of legal
right ― the performing right ― and with it a new economic
relationship between music user and copyright owner.
As a result of the decision, these composers and others
including music publishers founded a society to enforce and
administer their performing rights. In doing so, they
established the principle and practice of the collective
administration of rights, based on the fact that ― with the
possible exception of opera performances ― it was
impossible for a single composer or publisher to monitor
every use of his or her work by singers, bands, promoters or,
in the twentieth century, broadcasters. Accordingly, the new
society was entrusted with the task of monitoring music use,
issuing licences to music users, negotiating fees, collecting
fees and finally distributing the money raised to the
composers and songwriters whose works were adding value
to other people’s businesses.

#2016 9월

#2016 9월 31번
Early human societies were nomadic, based on hunting and
gathering, and, in a shifting pattern of life in search of new
sources of food, qualities such as lightness, portability, and
adaptability were dominant criteria. With the evolution of more
settled rural societies based on agriculture, other characteristics,
other traditions of form appropriate to the new patterns of life,
rapidly emerged. It must be emphasized, however, that tradition
was not static, but constantly subject to minute variations
appropriate to people and their circumstances. Although
traditional forms reflected the experience of social groups,
specific manifestations could be adapted in various minute and
subtle ways to suit individual users’ needs. A chair could keep
its basic, accepted characteristics while still being closely
shaped in detail to the physique and proportions of a specific
person. This basic principle of customization allowed a
constant stream of incremental modifications to be introduced,
which, if demonstrated by experience to be advantageous, could
be integrated back into the mainstream of tradition.

#2016 9월 32번
Investigators as a personality type place a high value on
science, process, and learning. They excel at research, using
logic and the information gained through their senses to
conquer complex problems. Nothing thrills them more than a
“big find.” Intellectual, introspective, and exceedingly
detail-oriented, investigators are happiest when they’re using
their brain power to pursue what they deem as a worthy
outcome. They prefer to march to their own beat, and they
dislike overly structured environments that necessitate a set
response to challenges. Investigators are not interested in
leadership, and developing the interpersonal skills necessary
to fuel collaboration is a hurdle for many of them. They may
feel insecure in their ability to “keep up” in their fields and
can react badly when forced to put more important work on
hold to complete a task that doesn’t intrigue them.

#2016 9월 33번
It is easy to find examples of correlations which are far
more systematic than could occur by chance and yet which it
would be absurd to treat as evidence of a direct causal link. For
instance, there is a high degree of correlation between shoe
size and vocabulary size: people with larger shoe sizes tend to
have much larger vocabularies than people with smaller shoe
sizes. But having larger feet does not cause anyone to gain a
larger vocabulary; nor does having a large vocabulary cause
your feet to grow. The obvious explanation of the correlation
is that children tend to have much smaller feet than adults, and,
because children acquire their vocabularies gradually as they
grow older, it is hardly surprising that, on average, people with
smaller feet have smaller vocabularies. In other words, foot
size and vocabulary size can be explained in terms of
features of the process of human development from infancy
to adulthood: a cause which both observed phenomena have in
common.

#2016 9월 34번
Feedback is usually most effective when you offer it at the
earliest opportunity, particularly if your objective is to teach
someone a skill. For example, if you are teaching your
friend how to make your famous egg rolls, you provide a
step-by-step commentary as you watch your pupil. If he makes
a mistake, you don’t wait until the egg rolls are finished to tell
him that he left out the cabbage. He needs immediate feedback
to finish the rest of the sequence successfully. Sometimes,
however, if a person is already sensitive and upset about
something, delaying feedback can be wise. Use your critical
thinking skills to analyze when feedback will do the most
good. Rather than automatically offering immediate correction,
use the just-in-time approach and provide feedback just before
the person might make another mistake.

#2016 9월 40번
Certain species are more crucial to the maintenance of
their ecosystem than others. Such species, called keystone
species, are vital in determining the nature and structure of
the entire ecosystem. The fact that other species depend on
or are greatly affected by the keystone species is revealed
when the keystone species is removed. It is in this sense
that we should draw attention to fig trees. Different species
of fig trees may be keystone species in tropical rain
forests. Although figs collectively produce a continuous
crop of fruits, fruit-eating monkeys, birds, bats, and other
vertebrates of the forest do not normally consume large
quantities of figs in their diets. During the time of year
when other fruits are less plentiful, however, fig trees
become important in sustaining fruit-eating vertebrates.
Should the fig trees disappear, most of the fruit-eating
vertebrates would be eliminated. Protecting fig trees in
such tropical rainforest ecosystems is an important
conservation goal because it increases the likelihood that
monkeys, birds, bats, and other vertebrates will survive.

As a keystone species in tropical rain forests, fig trees
support fruit-eating animals’ survival when other fruits are
insufficien, and thus preserve their ecosystem.

#2016 9월 42번
True understanding inevitably requires a knowledge of
context. The proper way of understanding a beast in a zoo is
a telling example. At the zoo, visitors may witness a great
beast pacing behind the bars of its cage. They may observe
and admire the creature, its amazing bone structure, and its
magnificent coat. However, no matter how long visitors
spend in front of that cage, they will never truly understand
the beast. True understanding can only come from seeing the
creature in its natural surroundings and, in turn, the ways in
which its presence affects its environment.
What is true of the mysterious beast in the zoo is also true
of science. To fully understand science, it must be
considered within the society in which it functions. Science
is not conducted in a vacuum. It is embedded within a
social fabric, and just as a flesh-and-blood beast influences
and is influenced by its environment, so too do science and
society mutually influence one another. Society, through
ethical and economic constraints, exerts a powerful influence
on what science accomplishes. At the same time, the results
of science have profound, and sometimes unexpected,
impacts on every human being on earth. Therefore, to make
sense of science-related issues, it is critical to recognize the
bidirectional relationship between science and society.

#2015 9월

#2015 9월 31번
Not all interesting discoveries have an obvious
application. If you believe you have something, but
you’re not sure what exactly it’s going to be good for,
don’t give up. Many innovations languished in labs for
years until they were matched to a product. Teflon, an
extremely slippery synthetic substance employed as a
coating on cooking utensils, was invented in 1938, but it
didn’t coat its first pan till 1954. The Post-it note was
built on the back of some not-very-good glue. Its
inventor believed it might have value, but it took him
five years to find a potentially profitable use for it. HP
had a breakthrough with a super-accurate thermometer
that was created in the HP Labs. Despite its accuracy,
there was no clear use for the device until it was used to
measure fluctuations in ocean temperature.

#2015 9월 32번
Empathy is a character trait that we value in ourselves
and in our friends, colleagues, and the professionals who
serve us. The know-how to be empathetic is central to
practical wisdom: unless we can understand how others
think and feel, it’s difficult to know the right thing to do.
But empathy has its dark side: too much understanding and
sensitivity, too much seeing things from the other’s
perspective, can cloud judgment and paralyze choice.
Edmund Pellegrino, a scholar of bioethics, explains it like
this: “If a physician identifies too closely as co-sufferer
with the patient, she loses the objectivity essential to the
most precise assessment of what is wrong, of what can be
done, and of what should be done to meet those needs.
Excessive co-suffering also impedes and may even
paralyze the physician into a state of inaction.”

#2015 9월 33번
Bees have their choice of flora according to color.
Lord Avenbury once made an experiment to see if the
color of flowers attracted bees. Placing honey on slips of
paper of different shades, he found that the insects which
visited them seemed to have a marked preference for
blue, after which came white, yellow, red, green and
orange. This finding should be considered for our
beekeeping planning. If pollination is the prime
consideration of taming bees and if the crop is identified,
the color of other floras nearby should be considered while
planning. Let us consider beekeeping near a mustard field. Mustard
gives tiny yellow flowers full of nectar and pollen. For
better yield of mustard seeds, pollination is necessary.
But if there is plenty of blue-colored wild flora nearby,
bees may prefer the blue flowers to mustard. Although
we shall get honey and other products, the objective for
pollination of mustard may be defeated.

#2015 9월 34번
In the mid-1900s, John Kenneth Galbraith shocked the
field of economics when he insisted that consumers do
not merely participate in the marketplace, they are also
the product of the systematic deployment of power
throughout society. Within this deployment of power,
commercial media ensures that consumers adopt values
and beliefs that match the general requirements of the
economy. The individual’s participation in mass behavior
patterns is not a spontaneous reaction to random forces
Consumers engage in shared patterns of consumption
because they live within an economic system that
operates as a belief system. It exercises considerable
control over the meaning and value of things. When the
economy functions as a belief system, it establishes
severe limits on a consumer’s free choice. As consumers,
our choices are not entirely our own. Our beliefs, values,
thoughts, and emotions are highly conditioned to match
the needs of the marketplace.

#2015 9월 40번
Experts have found that reading classical texts benefits
the mind by catching the reader’s attention and triggering
moments of self-reflection. The brain activity of volunteers
was monitored as they read classical works. These same
texts were then “translated” into more straightforward,
modern language and again the readers’ brains were
monitored as they read the words. Scans showed that the
more challenging prose and poetry set off far more
electrical activity in the brain than the more pedestrian
versions. Scientists were able to study the brain activity as
it responded to each word and record how it lit up as the
readers encountered unusual words, surprising phrases or
difficult sentence structures. This lighting up lasts long
enough to shift the brain into a higher gear, encouraging
further reading. The research also found that reading the
more challenging version of poetry, in particular, increases
activity in the right hemisphere of the brain, helping the
readers to reflect on and reevaluate their own experiences
in light of what they have read. The academics said this
meant the classics were more useful than self-help books.

Original versions of classical texts are helpful to readers
because they contain demanding language that inspires
further reading and activates readers’ self-reflection.

#2015 9월 42번
Organisms must compete for resources not only with
members of their own species, but with members of
other species. When two species use the same resource
and the resource is scarce, the species must compete just
as if they were members of the same population. One
of the two species usually turns out to be better at the
competition. If two species eat exactly the same food, for
example, one of the two will be better at catching it.
Unless something interferes, the inferior competitor loses
out and the competitively superior species takes over.
When one species eliminates another by outcompeting it,
it is called competitive exclusion.
Sometimes a competitively superior species is prevented
from excluding poorer competitors. Periodic disturbances
such as severe storms, battering by drifting logs, or
underwater landslides can reduce the population of a
dominant competitor and give other species a chance.
Furthermore, which species is competitively superior
sometimes depends on the conditions. On rocky shores
in tropical Hong Kong, for example, foliose (leaf-like)
algae are the dominant seaweeds during the relatively
cool winter. In the summer heat, these forms die out
and are replaced by more resistant encrusting algae.
Seasonal variation thus prevents either group from
excluding the other, and there is a shifting balance
between the competing species.

#2014-B 9월

#2014-B 9월 31번
Wood is a material that is widely acknowledged to be
environmentally friendly. It has been welcome as an
alternative material for a long time in building houses
instead of cement or bricks. However, it is not always
easy to evaluate the relative merits of one particular
material such as wood over another. Many species of tree
are now endangered, including mahogany and teak, and
deforestation, particularly in tropical rainforests, has had a
severe impact both on local communities and on native
plants and wildlife. Where wood is harvested and then
transported halfway across the globe, the associated energy
costs are high, causing a negative impact on the
environment. What is more, where wood is treated with
chemicals to improve fire- and pest-resistance, its healthful
properties are compromised.

#2014-B 9월 32번
So often, we get caught up in the minutiae of our jobs
― tedious annoyances and struggles that may be temporary
roadblocks but feel more like concrete mountains. While
there’s plenty of research that shows that people who
work with the muscles above their neck create all kinds
of stresses for themselves, it’s the people who focus on
the why of their jobs (as opposed to the what and the
how) who can manage the day-to-day problems more
easily. That is, if you can define the purpose of your
career or feel passionate about the mission of your
company, you can much more easily handle the occasional
server maintenance that disrupts your in-box. The flip side
is that if you’re working in any area (or company) that
doesn’t align with your own value, all the little stuff
snowballs into a big ball of daily disasters.

#2014-B 9월 33번
People knowingly or unknowingly will take too much,
even though it is not for anyone’s collective or long-term
good. As Hardin put it, “Freedom in a commons brings
ruin to all.” Consider a traffic jam on a main road going
into any big city. Each person picks that particular road
for the logical reason that it’s the fastest route. In the
beginning, each additional car does not slow the traffic
down, as there is enough room on the road for the
additional drivers. At some point, however, each car
reduces the average speed, and eventually there are so
many drivers that the traffic slows to a crawl. All the
people seeking to minimize their own driving time add
up to a longer commute for everyone. Doing what’s
rational results in a negative outcome to the collective interest
of all drivers, including you. On a global scale, the same thing
can befall environmental issues such as overfished seas and
rivers, air pollution, and water scarcity.

#2014-B 9월 34번
Researchers asked college student volunteers to think
through a fantasy version of an experience (looking
attractive in a pair of high-heeled shoes, winning an essay
contest, or getting an A on a test) and then evaluated the
fantasy’s effect on the subjects and on how things
unfolded in reality. When participants envisioned the most
positive outcome, their energy levels, as measured by
blood pressure, dropped, and they reported having a worse
experience with the actual event than those who had
conjured more realistic or even negative visions. To assess
subjects’ real life experiences, the researchers compared
lists of goals that subjects had set for themselves against
what they had actually accomplished and also relied on
self-reports. “When we fantasize about it ― especially when
you fantasize something very positive ― it’s almost like
you are actually living it,” says one of the study’s
co-authors. That tricks the mind into thinking the goal has been
achieved, draining the incentive to “get energized to go and get
it,” she explains. Subjects may be better off imagining how to
surmount obstacles instead of ignoring them.

#2014-B 9월 35번
When confronted by a seemingly simple pointing task,
where their desires are put in conflict with outcomes,
chimpanzees find it impossible to exhibit subtle selfserving
cognitive strategies in the immediate presence of
a desired reward. However, such tasks are mastered
when an alternative symbol system is employed. In one
study, chimps were confronted by a simple choice; two
plates holding tasty food items were presented, each with
a different number of treats. If the chimp pointed to the
plate having more treats, it would immediately be given
to a fellow chimp in an adjacent cage, and the frustrated
subject would receive the smaller amount. After hundreds
and hundreds of trials, these chimps could not learn to
withhold pointing to the larger reward. However, these
same chimps had already been taught the symbolic concept
of simple numbers. When those numbers were placed on the
plates as a substitute for the actual rewards, the chimps
promptly learned to point to the smaller numbers first,
thereby obtaining the larger rewards for themselves.

#2014-B 9월 36번
After making a choice, the decision ultimately changes
our estimated pleasure, enhancing the expected pleasure
from the selected option and decreasing the expected
pleasure from the rejected option. If we were not inclined
to update the value of our options rapidly so that
they concur with our choices, we would likely second-guess
ourselves to the point of insanity. We would ask ourselves
again and again whether we should have chosen Greece
over Thailand, the toaster over the coffee maker, and Jenny
over Michele. Consistently second-guessing ourselves would
interfere with our daily functioning and promote a negative
effect. We would feel anxious and confused, regretful and
sad. Have we done the right thing? Should we change our
mind? These thoughts would result in a permanent halt.
We would find ourselves ― literally ― stuck, overcome by
indecision and unable to move forward. On the other
hand, reevaluating our alternatives after making a decision
increases our commitment to the action taken and keeps us
moving forward.

#2014-B 9월 37번
Traditionally we have assessed mathematics ability based
on the number of correct answers on a page full of
computational problems. Learning and memorizing facts,
therefore, was the key component to the mathematics
instructional program. Recently, however, many teachers
have started placing a greater emphasis on mathematical
understanding, problem solving, hands-on experiences, and
collaborative work. This change in the instructional
program can be attributed to well-informed teachers and the
work of the National Council of Teachers of Mathematics.
Now teachers should realize that their students will be
using mathematics in a world where calculators, computers,
and other forms of technology are readily available.
Therefore, the application of mathematics, rather than mere
fact acquisition, is what will be expected of them in the
workplace and in life, and consequently mathematics
instruction should mirror this real life application.

#2014-B 9월 40번
During the 1970s, researchers began to suggest that
human vulnerability to hazards, rather than the hazards
themselves, was central to understanding the importance
of hazards, particularly when considering that a city is a
geographical focus for large populations. Further, it was
reported that human and material losses from disasters
had increased during the 20th century. This happened at
a time when cities in the developing world were
growing at unprecedented rates, bringing together large
populations of low income urban residents, often on
hazardous spontaneous settlements which made them far
more vulnerable to natural and human-induced hazards.
It is precisely this issue of vulnerability on which a
number of social scientists focused, arguing that although
floods, landslides and earthquakes are natural processes,
the disasters that can be associated with them are not a
result of natural processes, but of human vulnerability.

With the dramatic growth of cities in developing
countries, environmental hazards could turn into disasters
for those who are unable to cope with their impacts.

#2014-B 9월 42번
If you don’t get the kind of information failure
provides, you’ll end up with unrealistic expectations for
yourself, explains a psychologist. You could wind up in
a position where failure, which has gathered under cover
of darkness, reveals itself all at once.
We should hope, then, for exposure to failure, early
and often. The sociologist Glen Elder proposed that
there is a sensitive period for growth ― late teens
through early 30s ― during which failures are most
beneficial. Such a pattern seems to promote the trait
sometimes called equanimity. We learn that trauma is
survivable, so we don’t plunge too deeply following
setbacks. Nor, conversely, do we soar too high on our
successes. Some businesses in Silicon Valley and on
Wall Street make a point of hiring ex-pro athletes to
their staffs. It’s not just that their high profile draws
business. It’s because athletes are good at recovering
from their failures. “We needed people who could
perform and not get emotionally attached to losses,” a
Chicago oil trader told the New York Times, explaining
why the firm likes athletes on the trading floor,
particularly in ugly economic times like these. The
image is of a rider easy in the saddle. Nothing can so
surprise her ― either for good or ill ― that she’ll be
knocked off.
One way to help keep life’s slings and arrows from
knocking you off course is to ensure your life is
multidimensional, says Stephen Berglas, a California
psychologist and personal coach. That way, a setback in
any one area won’t mean in your mind that you’re a
failure categorically. Call it spreading your risk across
your emotional portfolio ― or adding another leg to the
furniture for balance, says Berglas.

#2014-A 9월

#2014-A 9월 34번
Do you remember the childlike joy you felt the last
time you found a parking spot at the mall on a crowded
day? When you finished shopping, you may have left the
spot with a certain hesitation, particularly if someone else
was waiting for it. Studies have shown that people take
longer to leave a parking spot when another driver is
waiting, even though they predict they will not. It’s as if
the space suddenly becomes more valuable once another
person wants it. Strictly speaking, it is no longer valuable
to the person leaving it. After all, it seems that our
brains are so sensitive to loss that once we have
been given something, we are hesitant to give it up.

#2014-A 9월 35번
Wood is a material that is widely acknowledged to be
environmentally friendly. It has been welcome as an
alternative material for a long time in building houses
instead of cement or bricks. However, it is not always
easy to deny the cost advantage of one particular
material such as wood over another. Many species of tree
are now endangered, including mahogany and teak, and
deforestation, particularly in tropical rainforests, has had a
severe impact both on local communities and on native
plants and wildlife. Where wood is harvested and then
transported halfway across the globe, the associated energy
costs are high, causing a negative impact on the
environment. What is more, where wood is treated with
chemicals to improve fire- and pest-resistance, its healthful
properties are compromised.

#2014-A 9월 36번
Human farmers and their domesticated plants and
animals made a grand bargain, though the farmers did not
realize it at the time. Consider maize. Domestication made
it dependent on man. But its association with humans also
carried maize far beyond its origins as a little-known
Mexican grass, so that it is now one of the most widely
planted crops on earth. From mankind’s point of view,
meanwhile, the domestication of maize made available an
abundant new source of food. But its cultivation (like that
of other plants) prompted people to adopt a new lifestyle
based on farming. Is man taking advantage of maize for
his own purposes, or is maize taking advantage of man?
Domestication, it seems, is a two-way street.

#2014-A 9월 37번
Pride is a sense that I am better than others, I have the
ultimate beauty, talent, and answers, and I alone should rule
the world. Pride causes individuals to be out of touch with
the reality of who they truly are and of what really brings
happiness. Pride prevents individuals from experiencing
their true value or the true value of others. A sense of
self-worth, on the other hand, provides calmness and enjoyment
when dealing with all kinds of individuals. When individuals
have a true sense of self-worth, they do not need to compare
themselves with others, to tear others apart or feel superior.
Instead, there is an experience of oneness and
sharing. By recognizing where one’s true value lies, one
simultaneously recognizes the true value of others.

#2014-A 9월 42번
Effective communication is vital to achieving wellness
because our daily interactions with others are important
factors in our emotional health. People who have
developed a high degree of communication skills are
more likely to have the potential for deeper bonds in
their personal relationships than non-communicators.
Perhaps the greatest communication satisfaction comes
from our close relationships, which are the main source
of our emotional health. Close relationships develop when
two people can exchange emotional messages easily and
effectively. Whether we develop effective communication
skills that promote healthy interactions depends largely on
how we learn to communicate. For example, interaction
between parents and their children is often important in
determining whether a child is shy or unafraid of
interaction. Good parents listen to their children and
allow them to talk about their fears and unhappiness.
Children raised in households that foster
communication find it easier to talk to others about their
disappointments, fears, frustrations, and other emotions
later in life. Such individuals find that they ultimately
have better emotional health.

#2013 9월

#2013 9월 24번
When we behave irrationally, our behavior usually seems
reasonable to us. When challenged, the mind says (to itself),
“Why are these people giving me a hard time? I’m just doing
what makes sense. Any reasonable person would see that!”
In short, we naturally think that our thinking is fully justified.
As far as we can tell, we are only doing what is right and
proper and reasonable. Any fleeting thoughts suggesting that
we might be at fault typically are overcome by more
powerful self-justifying thoughts: “I don’t mean any harm.
I’m just! I’m fair! It’s the others who are wrong!” It is
important to recognize this nature of the human mind as its
natural state. In other words, humans don’t have to learn
self-justifying, self-serving, self-deceptive thinking and
behavior. These patterns are innate in every one of us.

#2013 9월 25번
At some point, these days, a parent realizes his or her
child is tending left. The parent panics. Will the child be
made fun of? Struggle with writing? Be left out? In the past,
the parent would have done everything possible to exorcise
the tendency. Today, more and more parents shrug their
shoulders, saying it’s okay, maybe even something special.
Or their attempts to discourage it are milder. This is not an
isolated reaction. It’s part of the larger trend toward
celebrating, rather than suppressing, individuality in kids.
From giving children extra time to develop into kindergarteners to
accommodating their vegetarian appetites, parents today are
taking their cues from children, rather than the other way
around. Left-handedness is just the tip of the iceberg ― in
today’s world, parenting is about letting your child develop
into his or her own person, not about trying to stamp him
or her into a mold of conformity.

#2013 9월 26번
It is a common misconception among many musicians and
non-musicians alike that notes are more important than rests.
This is not surprising as it is natural to associate music with
the sounds that create the melody, rather than with the quiet
spaces between the notes. Because rests are silent, people
often misinterpret these empty spaces as unimportant. But,
imagine what would happen if a song was made up of only
notes, and no rests. Aside from the fact that the “rests would
be history” (pun intended), there would be a wall of sound
with no reference point or discernible backbone to the music.
This is because the spaces between the sounds provide a
baseline and contrast for the piece, and give music structure
and texture. In fact, it is a common saying among experienced
musicians that a full measure of rest can hold more music
than a full measure of blistering notes.

#2013 9월 27번
Cost estimates follow from time estimates simply by
multiplying the hours required by the required labor rates.
Beware of coordination problems where multiple crafts are involved.
For example, one major company has a policy that requires the
following personnel in order to remove an electric motor: a
tinsmith to remove the cover, an electrician to disconnect
the electrical supply, a millwright to unbolt the mounts, and
one or more laborers to remove the motor from its mount.
That situation is fraught with inefficiency and high labor
costs, since all four trades must be scheduled together, with
at least three people watching while the fourth is at work.
The cost will be at least four times what it could be and is
often greater if one of the trades does not show up on time.

#2013 9월 28번
Guys lost on unfamiliar streets often avoid asking for
directions from locals. We try to tough it out with map and
compass. Admitting being lost feels like admitting stupidity.
This is a stereotype, but it has a large grain of truth. It’s
also a good metaphor for a big overlooked problem in the
human sciences. We’re trying to find our way around the dark
continent of human nature. We scientists are being paid to
be the bus-driving tour guides for the rest of humanity. They
expect us to know our way around the human mind, but we
don’t. So we try to fake it, without asking the locals for
directions. We try to find our way from first principles of
geography (‘theory’), and from maps of our own making
(‘empirical research’). The roadside is crowded with locals,
and their brains are crowded with local knowledge, but we
are too arrogant and embarrassed to ask the way. So we drive
around in circles, inventing and rejecting successive hypotheses
about where to find the scenic vistas that would entertain and
enlighten the tourists.

#2013 9월 29번
One day as he walked through the streets of London,
Thomas Hobbes, the seventeenth-century philosopher, came
upon an old, sickly man who was begging for money.
Hobbes, his heart touched, immediately gave the man a
generous offering. When asked by a friend if he would have
done the same had there been no religious dictum or
philosophical principle about helping the needy, Hobbes
replied that he would. His explanation: he felt some
pain himself when he saw the man’s misery, and so
just as giving money to the man would relieve some of the
man’s suffering, it “does also ease me.” This tale suggests
that we have a bit of self-interest in relieving the misery of
others. One school of modern economic theory, following
Hobbes, argues that people give to charities in part because
of the pleasure they get from imagining either the relief
of those they benefit or their own relief from alleviating their
sympathetic distress.

#2013 9월 30번
While there are aesthetic and ethical reasons for
preserving biodiversity, there are practical considerations as
well. We depend on many other species for food, clothing,
shelter, oxygen, soil fertility ― the list goes on and on. In
the United States, 25% of all prescriptions from pharmacies
contain substances derived from plants. For instance, two
substances effective against Hodgkin’s disease and certain
other forms of cancer come from the rosy periwinkle, a
flowering plant native to the island of Madagascar.
Madagascar alone harbors some 8,000 species of flowering
plants. Unfortunately, Madagascar has lost 80% of its
forests and about 50% of its native species. Madagascar’s
dilemma represents that of much of the developing world.
The island is home to over 10 million people, most of
whom are desperately poor and hardly in a position to be
concerned with environmental conservation. Yet
the people of Madagascar as well as others around the
globe could derive vital benefits from the biodiversity that
is being destroyed.

#2013 9월 45번
Many of us believe that amnesia, or sudden memory
loss, results in the inability to recall one’s name and
identity. This belief may reflect the way amnesia is
usually portrayed in movies, television, and literature. For
example, when we meet Matt Damon’s character in the
movie The Bourne Identity, we learn that he has no
memory for who he is, why he has the skills he does, or
where he is from. He spends much of the movie trying
to answer these questions. However, the inability to
remember your name and identity is exceedingly rare in
reality. Amnesia most often results from a brain injury
that leaves the victim unable to form new memories, but
with most memories of the past intact.

While media often depict amnesia as a failure to retrieve
past memories, especially one’s identity, most cases of
amnesia actually leave the sufferers unable to construct
new memories with most memories of the past undamaged.

#2013 9월 47번
Our romantic mistakes can always be undone these days,
which you would think is a good thing. But the very
reversibility of our romantic commitments has only
worsened our problem because that also undermines our
satisfaction with our choices. To see this, you only need to
look at a study of a group of college students in a
photography class. The students made a print of their two
best photographs. They were then told that they could choose
one of the photos but that the other would be kept on file
as an example of their work. Then, the teacher added a twist.
One group was told that their choice was final. Whatever
they chose, they could not change their minds later. The other
group was told that they could switch photographs if they
changed their minds. In a survey taken later, students who
were allowed to change their mind liked their photos less
than the other students.
Why this paradoxical result? According to one researcher,
the brain has a kind of built-in defense system that works
to make us satisfied with choices that cannot be undone.
Despite thinking that we would like the freedom to change
our minds, it appears that we are happier with our choices
if we think they can’t be changed, which means we would
be better off if we made romantic commitments more
permanent and more difficult to break, rather than less.

#2012 9월

#2012 9월 24번
Science is making the future, and nations are busy
making future scientists. The more science that emerges
from this investment, the greater the need for us to follow
the gist of the science with sufficient understanding. In
other words, if we the ordinary people are to keep pace
with science, we need more science writers, and more
science writing that is clear, wise and eloquent, and that
demands to be read. People often feel excluded from
science, convinced that it takes an advanced degree to
understand what scientists do. As a result, they defensively
shrug off the whole business as an exclusive realm of little
relevance to their lives. One of the surest cures for
scientific illiteracy is great scientific literature,
writing that does not merely translate technical terms into
plain English or explain complicated ideas simply.

#2012 9월 25번
Variety is the spice of life. If I assign fifty students a
five-page essay on the subject of why the Roman Empire
fell, most of them are likely to say it was a combination
of economic and social causes ultimately leading to a
weakening of the frontiers. This would be a fine answer,
but after reading forty-five papers all saying the same
thing, I’m ready for a change. If you can take a different
angle from the rest of the class in a paper, you’re more
likely to impress your professors. But here’s the tricky
part ― being different is risky, and it only works if you
back up your argument very well. If you choose to argue
that Rome fell solely because Christianity weakened the
fighting spirit of the Romans, you will need persuasive
reasoning and arguments against any potential objections.

#2012 9월 26번
Consumers of different age groups obviously have very
different needs and wants. Although people who belong to
the same age group differ in many other ways, they do tend
to share a set of values and common cultural experiences
that they carry throughout life. In some cases, marketers
initially develop a product to attract one age group and then
try to broaden its appeal later on. That is what the
high-octane energy drink Reddox does. The company
aggressively introduced it in bars, nightclubs, and gyms to
the product’s core audience of young people. Over time, it
became popular in other contexts, and the company began
to sponsor the PGA European Tour to expand its reach to
older golfers. It also hands out free cans to commuters, cab
drivers, and car rental agencies to promote the drink as a
way to stay alert on the road.

#2012 9월 27번
Difficulty in assessing information is aggravated by the
overabundance of information at our disposal. While this
is obvious enough in some realms ― for example,
consider how much information is potentially relevant for
estimating the value of Microsoft stock ― even when the
information set seems less cluttered, information overload,
a state of confusion and decision avoidance, can still
occur. In one experiment, shoppers in a supermarket
were presented with free samples of jams and jellies. In
the first treatment, a small selection was available for
tasting; in the second, a large selection was available.
While everyone likes the idea of abundant choice, and
indeed the table with the greater selection attracted larger
crowds, it was the table with fewer samples that led to
the most sales. The likely reason is that the large
selection led to information overload, the feeling that the
decision was too complicated for immediate action.

#2012 9월 28번
The essence of science is to uncover patterns and
regularities in nature by finding algorithmic compressions
of observations. But the raw data of observation rarely
exhibit explicit regularities. Instead we find that nature’s
order is hidden from us, it is written in code. To make
progress in science we need to crack the cosmic code, to
dig beneath the raw data and uncover the hidden order. I
often liken fundamental science to doing a crossword
puzzle. Experiment and observation provide us with
clues, but the clues are cryptic, and require some
considerable ingenuity to solve. With each new solution,
we glimpse a bit more of the overall pattern of nature. As with a
crossword, so with the physical universe, we find that the
solutions to independent clues link together in a consistent and
supportive way to form a coherent unity, so that the
more clues we solve, the easier we find it to fill in the
missing features.

#2012 9월 29번
Like an artist who pursues both enduring excellence and
shocking creativity, great companies foster a tension
between continuity and change. On the one hand, they
adhere to the principles that produced success in the first
place, yet on the other hand, they continually evolve,
modifying their approach with creative improvements and
intelligent adaptation. But the point here is not as simple as
“some companies failed because they did not change.”
Companies that change constantly but without any consistent
rationale will collapse just as surely as those that change
not at all. There is nothing inherently wrong with
adhering to specific practices and strategies. But you should
comprehend the underlying why behind those practices, and
thereby see when to keep them and when to change them.

#2012 9월 30번
Since most of you are working on a word processor, it
seems silly to spend too much time on spelling. Your
word-processing program will spell check items for you.
However, spelling is not a completely lost art. There
are words that are not in the spell checker’s dictionary.
Also, your spell checker will not help you if you
misspell a word and mistakenly turn it into another word.
For example, when you write ‘lightening’ instead of
‘lightning,’ the program will not recognize the error. So, get
in the habit of rereading your work and looking up words
that the spell checker does not pick up. You need to
develop the skill of knowing when words look wrong.
Never hand something in until you have checked it.

#2012 9월 45번
A bumper sticker reading “Don’t Believe Everything
You Think” is placed on the edge of the whiteboard in
Greene’s office. It represents the underlying message of
the book he is writing. An analogy carried throughout
the book compares the moral brain to a camera with
automatic settings for taking a picture of a mountain or
an indoor portrait or a close-up of a flower, and manual
settings for unusual conditions or when we want a
nonstandard artistic effect. Greene believes emotions and
intuitions are the auto settings for our morality while
reasoning is the manual mode.
We need our intuitions to make the millions of quick
judgments that fill our lives from day to day or else we
could not function. But they are not always trustworthy
moral indicators, since they were set to handle problems
deep in our evolutionary past and are often useless for
the newer complexities of the modern world. We need to
rely on our manual settings, the reasoning sections of our
brain, for more complex or novel situations, Greene says.

According to Greene’s view on the moral brain,
emotions and intuitions make our lives easier in making
everyday decisions, but we need to rely on reasoning
for more complex problems.

#2012 9월 50번
The McDonald’s restaurants that are located across the
United States ― and, increasingly, the world ― have a
significance that goes far beyond the convenience of quick
hamburgers, milk shakes, and salads. As sociologist George
Ritzer says, our everyday lives are being ‘McDonaldized.’
The McDonaldization of society does not refer just to
the robotlike assembly of food. This term refers to the
standardization of everyday life, a process that is transforming
our lives. Want to do some shopping? Shopping malls offer
one-stop shopping in controlled environments. Planning a
trip? Travel agencies offer ‘package’ tours. They will
transport middle-class Americans to ten European capitals
in fourteen days. All visitors experience the same hotels,
restaurants, and other scheduled sites.
Efficiency brings dependability. You can expect your
burger and fries to taste the same whether you buy them
in Los Angeles or Beijing. Although efficiency also lowers
prices, it does come at a cost. Predictability washes away
spontaneity, changing the quality of our lives. It produces
a sameness, a bland version of what used to be unique
experiences. In my own travels, for example, had I taken
packaged tours I never would have had the eye-opening
experiences that have added so much to my appreciation of
human diversity. For good or bad, our lives are being
McDonaldized, and the predictability of packaged settings
seems to be our social destiny. Our coming prepackaged
society will be efficient, of course. But it also means
that we will be trapped in the ‘iron cage’ of bureaucracy
― just as Weber warned would happen.

#2011 9월

#2011 9월 25번
Errors and failures typically corrupt all human designs.
Indeed, the failure of a single component of your car’s engine
could force you to call for a tow truck. Similarly, a tiny
wiring error in your computer’s circuits can mean throwing
the whole computer out. Natural systems are different,
though. Throughout Earth’s history, an estimated 3 million
to 100 million species have disappeared, which means that
this year somewhere between three and a hundred species
will vanish. However, such natural extinctions appear to
cause little harm. Over millions of years the ecosystem has
developed an amazing insensitivity to errors and failures,
surviving even such drastic events as the impact of the
Yucatan meteorite, which killed tens of thousands of species.

#2011 9월 26번
Unlike deviance in other settings, deviance in sports often
involves an unquestioned acceptance of and extreme
conformity to norms and expectations.
For example, most North Americans see playing football as
a positive activity. Young men are encouraged to ‘be all
they can be’ as football players and to live by slogans such
as “There is no ‘I’ in t-e-a-m.” They are encouraged to
increase their weight and strength, so that they can play
more effectively and contribute to the success of their
teams. When young men go too far in their acceptance of
expectations to become bigger and stronger, when they are
so committed to playing football and improving their skills
on the field that they use muscle-building drugs, they become
deviant. This type of ‘overdoing-it-deviance’ is dangerous,
but it is grounded in completely different social dynamics
from the dynamics that occur in the ‘antisocial deviance’
enacted by alienated young people who reject commonly
accepted rules and expectations.

#2011 9월 27번
Time pressure leads to frustration, and when we are frustrated
or experience other negative emotions, our thinking becomes
narrower and less creative. However, people are unaware of
this phenomenon and live under the illusion that when they
are experiencing time pressure, they are also more creative.
This explains why time pressure is pervasive and to some
extent accounts for the increase in rates of depression. We are
generally too busy trying to squeeze more and more activities
into less and less time. Consequently, we fail to enjoy potential
sources of happiness that may be all around us. To enjoy the
richness that life has to offer, we need to take our time.

#2011 9월 28번
With no attempt there can be no failure and with no
failure no humiliation. So our self-esteem in this world
depends entirely on what we back ourselves to be and do.
It is determined by the ratio of our actualities to our supposed
potentialities. Thus, success divided
by pretensions equals self-esteem.
This illustrates how every rise in our levels of expectation
entails a rise in the dangers of humiliation. What we
understand to be normal is critical in determining our chances
of happiness. It also hints at two ways for raising our
self-esteem. On the one hand, we may try to achieve more;
and on the other, we may reduce the number of things we
want to achieve. The advantages of the latter approach lie in
the following statement: To give up pretensions is as blessed
a relief as to get them gratified.

#2011 9월 29번
For many people ‘nature’ is defined as a negative: It exists
where people do not. Nature lies outside the urban and
agricultural realms, in regions of Earth where natural
processes are unhindered. Nature is where fallen logs rot and
acorns grow, wildfires turn woodlands into meadows, and
barrier islands shift with the currents ― all without human
interference. By extension, this definition suggests that nature
is best protected by keeping humans far away, so that it can
continue to run itself. But there is a serious problem with this
view. If nature is defined as a landscape uninfluenced by
humankind, then there is no nature on the planet at all.
Prehistoric peoples changed their surrounding ecosystems, whether
by installing orchards in the Amazon or by hunting many large
mammals to extinction in North America. And modern
humans are changing the global environment even more
profoundly, whether through planet-wide climate change, or
by the worldwide movement of synthetic chemicals through
the food chain.

#2011 9월 30번
The most obvious salient feature of moral agents is a
capacity for rational thought. This is an uncontested necessary
condition for any form of moral agency, since we all
accept that people who are incapable of reasoned thought
cannot be held morally responsible for their actions.
However, if we move beyond this uncontroversial salient
feature of moral agents, then the most salient feature of
actual flesh-and-blood (as opposed to ridiculously idealized)
individual moral agents is surely the fact that every moral
agent brings multiple perspectives to bear on every moral
problem situation. That is, there is no one-size-fits-all answer
to the question “What are the basic ways in which moral
agents wish to affect others?” Rather, moral agents wish to
affect ‘others’ in different ways depending upon who these
‘others’ are.

#2011 9월 33번
Many grocery stores give the shopper the option of paper
or plastic grocery bags. Many people instinctively say that
paper is less harmful to the environment ― after all, paper is
biodegradable and recyclable. In contrast, most plastic is
manufactured using oil by-products and natural gas. Plastic
is not always easily or economically recyclable, and once
manufactured, plastic may last virtually indefinitely. Yet in the
United States, paper products are the single largest component
of municipal waste. Even though paper products may
theoretically be biodegradable, in most landfills, they do
not biodegrade. Furthermore, paper production emits air
pollution, specifically 70 percent more pollution than the
production of plastic bags. And consider that making paper uses
trees that could be absorbing carbon dioxide. The paper bag
making process also results in three times more water pollutants
than making plastic bags.

#2011 9월 45번
The information processing model emphasizes rational
analysis for solving problems, with an emphasis on
techniques for quickly arriving at a solution. Culturally, this
orientation fits well with the kinds of mental attributes which
are normally valued by contemporary Western societies. For
example, Westerners tend to admire someone who is
independent and quick-thinking. But these characteristics are
not universally valued. Agricultural African societies, for
example, valued looking at the problem in the context of the
whole society, noting its impact on various features of life.
In most situations, speed in arriving at a solution was not a
vital issue. This is also found with the Cree and Ojibway in
Canada. These groups historically lived in wilderness areas
and faced many hardships; in these circumstances, they
would rarely get a second chance at solving problems.
Consequently, these Native people value taking time to
reflect on a problem and mentally walk through possible
solutions before any action is taken.

In modern Western societies, speed is highly
valued in problem-solving, whereas it is viewed
differently in some non-Western societies due to their
cultural backgrounds.

#2011 9월 47번
The other day an acquaintance of mine, a sociable and
charming man, told me he had found himself unexpectedly
‘alone’ in New York for an hour or two between appointments.
He went to the Whitney Museum and spent the ‘empty’
time looking at things by himself. For him it proved to be
a shock nearly as great as falling in love to discover that
he could enjoy himself so much alone.
What had he been afraid of? I asked myself. That,
suddenly alone, he would discover that he bored himself,
or that there was, quite simply, no self there to meet? But
having taken the first step into this new world, he is now
about to begin a new adventure; he is about to be launched
into his own inner space, space as immense, unexplored,
and sometimes frightening as outer space to the astronaut.
His every perception will come to him with a new freshness
and, for a time, seem startlingly original. For anyone
who can see things for himself with a naked eye becomes,
for a moment or two, something of a genius. With another
human being present vision becomes double vision, inevitably.
We are busy wondering, what does my companion see or
think of this, and what do I think of it? The original impact
gets lost.
“Music I heard with you was more than music.” Exactly.
And therefore music ‘itself’ can only be heard alone. Solitude
is the salt of personhood. It brings out the authentic flavor
of every experience.

#2010 9월

#2010 9월 24번
Furniture is among the oldest engineering structures
designed to carry a rather well-defined load under rather
well-defined circumstances. We are not surprised that
furniture used beyond its intended purpose is broken, and
we readily blame the child who abuses the furniture rather
than the designer of the furniture or the furniture itself
when it is abused. Thus a chair must support a person in a
sitting position, but it might not be expected to survive a fall
from a tall building. A child’s bed might be expected to
support a sleeping child, but it would not necessarily be
considered badly designed if it collapsed under the child’s
wild use of it as a trampoline. The arms and legs of chairs,
the heads and feet of beds, just like those of the people
whom they serve, cannot be expected to be strong
without limit.

#2010 9월 25번
A vendor in a city set up shop and sold doughnuts
and coffee to passersby. During the breakfast and lunch
hours, he always had long lines of customers waiting. He
noticed that, as he was a one-man show, the biggest
bottleneck preventing him from selling more doughnuts
and coffee was the disproportionate amount of time it
took to make change for his customers. Finally, he
simply put a small basket on the side of his stand filled
with dollar bills and coins. Most customers responded by
being completely honest, often leaving him larger-than-normal
tips. Also, he was able to move customers through at
twice the pace because he did not have to make change.
In addition, he found that his customers liked this idea
and kept coming back. By extending trust in this way,
he was able to double his sales.

#2010 9월 26번
Few things hold people back more than the fear of rejection.
They do not ask for what they need because the answer may
be no. They do not ask their boss for a raise or for more
time off. They are afraid to be the first to say, “I love you.”
They do not ask for help from people they do not know
well. In short, they do not let their wants and needs be
known because they are afraid of being turned away. But
the wonderful truth is this: If you can accept NO for an
answer, you can fearlessly ask for whatever you need. It is
also true that you will not receive if you do not ask. So
do not be afraid to ask! You may be surprised at the
number of people willing to help.

#2010 9월 27번
Take a moment to cast your mind back over the past
week or so, and think about something you regret. Was it
something you did or something you failed to do? It seems
that people regret their actions more than their failures to act.
As an example, consider Mary and Laura, who invest their money in
companies A and B. Mary invests in company A and
considers switching to company B but she decides not to.
Laura invests in company B and considers switching to
company A and she decides to do so. They both find out
that they would have been better off by $1,000 if they had
taken different actions. Who do you think feels more
regret? Most people judge that Laura will regret her action
more than Mary will regret her inaction.

#2010 9월 28번
The spread of prosperity, the single-family home,
the invention of television and computers have all made
it possible for us to live private lives unimaginable
to previous generations. We no longer live in close
quarters with our neighbors, we can move about without
crowding into buses or trains; we do not have to go to
theaters or share our tastes with our neighbors. However,
the same technologies that help separate us from the
crowds also make it possible to monitor and record our
behaviors. Although fewer people have intimate
knowledge of our lives, many people―mostly unknown
to us―know something about us. The very technology
that was supposed to free us from mass society has
turned out to be as much a fishbowl as an information
highway. In modern society, we have discovered that
being free often means also being naked.

#2010 9월 32번
American culture in general appears suspicious of leisure.
Some people believe this may be due to the Protestant
work ethic. Many Americans fill their free time with
intellectually or physically demanding hobbies or volunteer
work. Even on vacation, Americans stay in touch with the
workplace via their cellular phones and laptop computers.
On the other hand, Europeans hold leisure in high regard. A new
French law gave France the shortest work week in Europe.
Companies with more than twenty employees are required
to cut work hours from 39 to 35 per week. Besides creating
more leisure time for workers, this move is expected to help
ease unemployment. In Germany, however, longer work
weeks may soon be the standard. Its low birth rate has
resulted in fewer workers supporting more and more retired
Germans in the generous state welfare system.

#2010 9월 45번
The face of the water, in time, became a wonderful
book―a book that was a dead language to the
uneducated passenger, but which told its mind to the
pilot without reserve, delivering its most cherished
secrets as clearly as if it spoke them with a voice. The
passenger who could not read this book saw nothing
but all manner of pretty pictures in it, painted by the
sun and shaded by the clouds. To the pilot, however, it
was a highlighted passage. Indeed, it was more than
that; for it meant that a wreck or a rock was buried
there that could tear the life out of the strongest vessel
that ever floated. It is the faintest and simplest
expression the water ever makes, and the most
frightening to a pilot’s eye.

To the passenger, the face of the water reflects beauty,
whereas to the pilot it reveals danger.

#2010 9월 46번
As we explore together the virtual world that floats
on the edge of this material life, the many imaginative
territories you inhabit bring back another reality. I catch
images of my own childhood wanderings through
Narnia, the land of hobbits, and Mowgli’s jungle. All
these are deep pleasures which combine all my senses
and momentarily transport me into another dimension of
living.
If I were to bring it all together I would say that
among all the misery, fear, injustice, and pain, I hope
you will not forget moments when all this fades away
into periods of innocent joy. It is when we bring all
our powerful senses together, perhaps in a moment in
the garden of earthly delights that we triumph over
despair.
So the moment when you dance to Handel or when
you sit in a pool of wild flowers, or gravely take part
in your first tea ceremony, these are the moments you
will treasure. They are, with similar moments with
friends and loved ones, what makes being human
bearable.

#2009 9월

#2009 9월 23번
To watch a play is to step into a world that seems far
removed from electronic beeping and ringing. Of course,
this is assuming that theatergoers remember to turn off
their cell phones. At a theater in Goyang, however, stage
managers have been begging the audience to leave their
phones on. During the performance, everybody is expected
to take out their mobiles, call into a computer, and using
their keypads, direct the movements of puzzle pieces on
the screen behind the stage. At some point, an ordinary
housewife appears on the screen, connected from her
kitchen via the Internet, and interacts with actors on the
stage in real time. The 50-minute production combines
the latest digital technology with live actors, audiences,
and the stage.

#2009 9월 24번
When you choose an item among a number of options,
the attractive features of the rejected items will decrease the
satisfaction derived from the chosen item. This is a very
important reason why many options can be harmful to our well-being.
Because we do not put rejected items out of our minds,
we experience the disappointment of having our satisfaction
with decisions reduced by all the options we considered
but did not choose. In light of these negative effects of
opportunity cost, which is the cost of the opportunity you
lost by making one choice instead of another, we are
tempted to ignore opportunity costs altogether in making
decisions.

#2009 9월 25번
Excessive consumption of what Chinese Medicine
considers to be cold-energy foods and raw foods such as
salads, ice-creams, iced drinks, or fruit may weaken the
spleen. This idea runs counter to all modern ideas about
diet, according to which, by eating raw vegetables and fruit,
we can absorb all the vitamins and minerals contained in
them. This is true to a certain extent, and moderate
consumption of these foods can be beneficial. However,
from the Chinese point of view, the spleen likes dryness
and warmth in food and dislikes excess of liquids and cold.
An excessive consumption of the above foods will be very
difficult to digest and may weaken the spleen. Thus,
particularly those who have a tendency to spleen problems
should not consume raw and cold foods in excess.

#2009 9월 26번
We are self-centered interpreters of all incoming information.
At any given moment, we may note only one aspect of a
current flow of information, depending on our view of
ourselves, our attention, and our emotional state in a
specific situation. Later, we may note still other aspects of
a similar flow of information. Then, when an attempt to
recall the second moment is confused with the memory of
the original moment, our brain starts to create a tale to
take in different aspects of both the original situation and
the second moment. We suddenly confuse the two
episodes, as we begin to put the two sets of events into
some kind of memory mixture. Alas, accurate memories are an
ideal, not a reality of the human condition.

#2009 9월 28번
The lawyer had a unique place within American society.
In a country without a landed aristocracy, lawyers formed
a privileged but public-spirited class. In every town and
city in America, they were the leading citizens who
helped to build the museums and hospitals, formed civic
institutions, and moved in and out of government at all
levels. For example, James C. Carter was a distinguished
New York lawyer in the late 19th century. He helped to
found the Bar of the City of New York and played a key
role in reform movements in the city and the state,
including the Citizens Union, the City Club, and the Good
Government Clubs. In other words, his public life took up
a good part of his work life. And he was not unusual.
Lawyers like him could be found in New York and in
every town in America.

#2009 9월 45번
Anchoring settling to a certain price range influences
all kinds of purchases. Uri Simonsohn and George
Lowenstein, for example, found that people who move
from inexpensive areas to moderately priced cities do
not increase their spending to fit the new area. Rather,
these people spend an amount similar to what they
were used to in their previous area, even if this means
having to squeeze themselves and their families into
smaller or less comfortable homes. Likewise, people
moving from more expensive cities sink the same
amount of dollars into their new housing situations as
they did in the past. People who move from an
expensive area do not generally downsize their spending
much once they move to a moderately priced city.

People who move to a new region generally
remain anchored to the prices in their former
location.

#2009 9월 48번
When it comes to talking, I have observed two basic
personality types. The first I call the ‘Dead Sea.’ People
with this personality type have many experiences,
emotions, and thoughts throughout the day. They have a
large reservoir where they store that information, and
they are perfectly happy not to talk. On the other
extreme is the ‘Babbling Brook.’ For this personality,
whatever enters into the eye gate or the ear gate comes
out the mouth gate.
Many times a Dead Sea marries a Babbling Brook.
That happens because when they are dating, it is a very
attractive match. If you are a Dead Sea and you date a
Babbling Brook, you will have a wonderful evening.
You do not have to think, “How will I get the
conversation started tonight? How will I keep the
conversation flowing?” In fact, you do not have to
think at all. All you have to do is nod your head and
say, “Uh-huh,” and she will fill up the whole evening
and you will go home saying, “What a wonderful
person!”
On the other hand, if you are a Babbling Brook and you
date a Dead Sea, you will have an equally wonderful
evening because Dead Seas are the world’s best listeners.
You will talk continuously for three hours. He will listen
intently to you, and you will go home saying, “What
a wonderful person!” You attract each other.
But five years after marriage, the Babbling Brook
wakes up one morning and says, “We’ve been married
five years, and I don’t know you.” The Dead Sea is
saying, “I know you too well. I wish you would stop the
flow and give me a break.” The good news is that Dead
Seas can learn to talk and Babbling Brooks can learn
to listen. We are influenced by our personality but not
controlled by it.

#2009 9월 50번
Person A Most people access the Internet at public
libraries to get information. However, lawmakers are
threatening the democratic mission of libraries by forcing
them to use blocking programs. These programs prevent
access to many services on the Internet, including websites
dealing with art, literature, women’s health, religion, and
free speech. Public libraries should provide information to
all. What if you cannot afford a home computer and
your only choice is to use one at the library? If this
computer has blocking programs, then you are being
denied the access that people with home computers have.

Person B No one can deny that public library Internet
access is of great use, but there is a serious problem
with access to all Internet services at public libraries.
Some users take advantage of this privilege by sending
spam mail, using e-mail to abuse people, and hacking
into government and corporate systems. Furthermore, many
innocent children using the Internet without supervision
can easily become victims of website operators with
criminal intentions. The public library is not a private
home. The most effective way to safeguard Internet users
at a public library is through blocking programs.

#2008 9월

#2008 9월 24번
Often the best form of communication with friends is,
surprisingly, silence. Friendship is not only about
what we say, but even more importantly about what we
do not. True friendship occurs when ‘information’ is
conveyed by absences of words. The point is to convey as
much as possible indirectly, ‘between the lines.’ The
reason such ‘negative’ communication is important is that
it requires a greater closeness than positive communication.
The greater the distance between sender and receiver, the
more the need for directness. Only when two or more
people share an enormous amount can the much more
economical negative communication take place.

#2008 9월 25번
Team performance is not possible if the leader grabs all
the best chances, assignments and credit for himself or
herself. Indeed, the crucial point of the leader’s challenge is
to provide performance opportunities to the team members. When the
Dollus Bank team leader Trevor Canfield made room for a junior
investment banker to lead a prestigious account, he did just
that. So did Mike Fangos at Gopak, when he encouraged a
chemical engineer who “could not balance his checkbook at
home” to take responsibility for preparing the Zebra Team’s
$200 million budget. Stepping out of the way to give
opportunities to others, however, does not mean giving up
responsibility for guidance, monitoring, and control.

#2008 9월 26번
Michel de Montaigne, the sixteenth-century French
essayist, loved conversation. “To my taste,” he says, “the
most fruitful and natural exercise of our mind is
conversation. I find the practice of it the most delightful
activity in our lives.” According to Montaigne, “studying
books is a weak mental activity, while conversation
provides teaching and excercise all at once.” Montaigne
thinks of conversation as an intellectual sporting event that
will improve his mind. “If I am fighting with a strong
and solid opponent, he will attack me; his ideas send
mine soaring. Rivalry, competitiveness and glory will
drive me and raise me above my own level. Our mind is
strengthened by contact with dynamic and well-ordered
minds.”

#2008 9월 27번
Studies regarding our habits of eating out found that,
when we eat out, we tend to underestimate the number of
calories we consume by up to half. When we eat in a
relaxing, candle-lit restaurant, we tend to enjoy our food
longer even if we are full. Dining with friends also
contributes to consuming more calories. Researchers found
that women who dined with two or three friends ate 700
calories on average, double that of solo diners. Our
psychology is another factor in the consumption of calories.
A waiter who greeted customers with the question, “What
are we celebrating tonight?” got more orders
than waiters who didn’t. Therefore, if you treat dining as a
special occasion, you’re more likely to eat more.

#2008 9월 30번
Soaring eagles have the incredible ability to see a
mouse in the grass from a mile away. Similarly, cats
have the extraordinary ability to see in the dark. Through
natural s election over time, these animals have developed
visual systems uniquely adapted to their way of life. The
human visual system has also adapted to many things
well. Although our night vis ion is not as good as that
of a cat, our color vision is excellent. This is not a bad
tradeoff, s ince being able to enjoy a sunset’s beauty
seems worth an occasional fall in the dark.

#2008 9월 45번
I believe mystery plays a fundamental role in
experiencing the great things in life. If you can
determine the chemicals that exist in a food or wine,
does that help you understand why you like the taste?
Do you think that being able to list all the reasons you
love a person enables you to love that person more or
differently? If something is beautiful to you, can you
really explain why in a meaningful way? There are
many sensations and feelings that we can experience
but not fully define. Once we give up the belief that
definition of these emotions is necessary or possible,
we can actually experience them more completely
because we have removed the analytical filter we use
to find definitions.

The attempt to analyze things in definite ways
prevents us from appreciating them deeply and completely.

#2008 9월 50번
Mel, a chimpanzee in Gombe, Nigeria, was three years
old when his mother died. He had no elder brother or
sister to adopt him. To our amazement, he was adopted
by a twelve-year-old chimpanzee, Spindle, who was
certainly not related to Mel. As weeks passed, the two
became inseparable. Spindle took care of Mel while
traveling; he permitted the infant to ride on his back,
even allowed him to hang beneath, as a mother carries
her baby. Most remarkably, if Mel got too close to the big
males, Spindle would hurry to remove his small charge
from danger even though this meant he got into trouble
himself.
For a whole year, this relationship endured, and there
was no doubt that Spindle saved Mel’s life. Why did
Spindle act that way, burdening himself with the care of
a sickly youngster? Probably we shall never know,
but it is interesting to reflect that during the plague
that claimed Mel’s mother, Spindle’s mother also
died. Is it possible that Spindle’s loss of his mother
left an empty space in his life? And that the contact
with a dependent baby helped to fill that space? Or
did Spindle experience an emotion similar to that which
we call revenge? Perhaps the lonely chimpanzee
felt a mixture of both.

#2007 9월

#2007 9월 24번
The nineteenth century saw a change of attitude which
led to a separation in people’s minds of the scientific and
the artistic. From this period the roles of mathematicians
and architects were seen as distinct in a way that did
not happen in the seventeenth century. This is not to say
that the connections between mathematics and architecture
disappeared, just that the scientific and artistic aspects were
seen as complementary skills not to be found in the same
person. Of course there were still those who did excel in
both mathematics and architecture; it was only the
perceptions that changed.

#2007 9월 25번
I scheduled a meeting with a client for 8:00 one
morning. I called the day before to confirm the date and
time. When I arrived at the client’s office the morning of
the meeting, he looked puzzled. “What are you doing here?
Didn’t you get my message?” he asked. Here’s what
happened: My client worked late the evening before trying
to prepare for our meeting. Realizing he wouldn’t be ready,
he sent me an e-mail at 8:30 p.m., telling me that we
needed to reschedule. I have a life, and I usually don’t
read e-mails in the evening. If he had called, I would have
known not to show up. This is a classic case of someone
sending an e-mail without thinking of the best way to
deliver the message to the reader. He should have phoned me.

#2007 9월 26번
The word “addiction” is often used loosely in
conversation. People will refer to themselves as mystery
book addicts or cookie addicts. E. B. White writes of his
interest in gardening: “We are hooked and are making an
attempt to keep the habit.” Yet nobody really believes that
reading mystery books or ordering seeds by catalog is
serious enough to be compared with addictions to drugs or
alcohol. The word “addiction” is here used jokingly to
represent a strong desire for some pleasurable activities.

#2007 9월 27번
The price of an autograph depends on how rare it is.
For example, famous people like Angelina Jolie and Matt
Damon sign a lot of autographs. Therefore, their autographs
are common and are not worth much. On the other hand,
Madonna and Gwyneth Paltrow seldom sign anything. This
makes their autographs more valuable. Similarly, Queen
Elizabeth Ⅱ almost never signs autographs. Therefore,
something with her signature on it might sell for around
$3,500. It doesn’t matter if the person is dead. Elvis
Presley and Napoleon signed many things. Their signatures
are only worth $1,500.

#2007 9월 30번
The development of dialects mainly results from limited
communication between different parts of a community that
share one language. Under such circumstances, changes that
take place in the language of one part of the community do
not spread elsewhere. As a result, the speech varieties
become more distinct from one another. If contact
continues to be limited for long enough, sufficient changes
will accumulate to make the speech varieties mutually
unintelligible, which usually leads to the recognition of
separate languages. The different changes that took place in
spoken Latin in different parts of the Roman Empire,
for example, eventually gave rise to the modern Romance
languages, including French, Spanish, and Italian.

#2007 9월 45번
It is all too easy to assume that everything in life is
going to work out perfectly. Some people plan their
entire lives for years assuming that things will happen
exactly as they hope. For example, some college
students begin planning at the beginning of their
freshman year what classes they will be taking through
graduate school and then where they will end up
working. The problem is, once they fail one class or
have a bad experience that leads them to doubt their
major, all of these plans fall apart. In general, we
should plan the future based on what we expect to
happen. Unfortunately, things do not always work out
as we want, so we must be prepared for anything.

Unpredictability of life can force you to change your
future plans.

#2007 9월 50번
Person A We must switch to “daylight savings.” By
starting the day one hour earlier in the summer, people
gain an hour of daylight, which gives them a longer day
for either work or leisure. Saving energy is another
advantage of setting the clock forward. With more
sunlight late in the day, we can cut down on the use of
electricity to be spent on lighting and air-conditioning,
for example. Also, this new system helps the economy
because people would have more time for leisure
activities, shopping, and eating out in the evening. Most
of the world’s economic powers are on this system
already, so it would be more convenient for international
trade and communication. Just from these points alone,
you can see why we should switch to this system.

Person B We must stick to our current time system
because the side effects of switching the clock back and
forth one hour twice a year would be disastrous. It
would not only seriously harm people’s bio-rhythms and
thus cause health problems, but also it would slow down
work, and the nation would lose money from the
lowered production. Switching time back and forth
would be costly for businesses and airlines, and be
confusing for lots of people. We should remember that
the nation tried this system about 20 years ago, and that
it caused so much trouble that we came back to the
system we have now, which seems to work just fine.
What’s the point of changing the time system that works
into the one that is going to be confusing?

#2006 9월(스캔)

#2005 9월

#2005 9월 22번
Truly fresh fruits add enormously to the pleasure of eating
a healthy diet. The freshest ones are those you grow yourself
and pick just before you eat them. You don’t need a farm
or a big backyard to do this. My backyard is only about
40 feet by 20 feet. Yet in this space, not far from busy
Harvard Square, my wife and I have a peach tree, a pear
tree, and an apple tree that yield s everal pounds of fruit a
year. Our garden gives us something fresh and tasty for at
least four months of the year. By placing the trees near
the edge of the yard and growing grapes on the fence, we
can still have enjoyable outdoor living space.

#2005 9월 23번
Dieting usually results in failure. This is because
people want to lose weight too easily and too quickly.
There is no one easy method of losing weight, however.
At least four components are necessary for any successful
program of weight control: regular exercise, sensible
nutrition, behavior modification and, of course, diet. Any
one of these components will lead to a decrease in total
body weight, but in combination they will produce more
effective results. Together, they form a master plan for
long-term, permanent weight loss.

#2005 9월 24번
As parents we all have different ideas of what success
means for our children. I think the most important aspect
of success has to do with finding a real passion for
something in life. It means a responsibility to live up to
one’s potential. That has to be discovered; it can’t be
forced upon a youngster growing up. We cannot expect
children to be replicas of us. From the minute they are
born, they are already themselves. Children must be given
the tools and opportunities to go as far as they possibly
can do on their own.

#2005 9월 25번
While speed remains something new to mankind, it is
bound to be in fashion. But for my part, I like crawling.
When the roads were still empty of speeding machinery,
the day seemed twice as long, as one passed over the
miles so slowly. One did not see much of the world in
a day, but the eye could linger on what one saw. If the
inventors could have known what they were about to
destroy with their inventions, surely they would have
hesitated before yielding to their genius.
To pass through a landscape swiftly is
almost the same thing as not to have traveled at all.

#2005 9월 26번
Some fishes use their electroceptive s ense for detecting
prey and for moving toward or away from objects in the
environment. Nowhere is prey detection with this sense
better developed than in sharks. Spiny dogfish sharks, the
common laboratory specimen, locate prey by
electroception. A shark can detect and eat a flounder that
is hiding in the sand, and it will locate and eat electric
devices that are creating electric signals similar to those
emitted by the flounder. On the other hand, it cannot find a dead
flounder buried in the sand or a live flounder covered by a special
plastic sheet blocking electric signals.

#2005 9월 38번
Perhaps the outs tanding characteris tic of my
nine-year-old child is the fact that he is emerging
from a long, strong preoccupation with his mother.
Whereas at eight he could admit the pres ence of
Mother, now he often s eems to res ent her pres ence
and her demands. At eight he counted on his
mother. Or he was related s trongly and warmly to
his mother. This nine-year-old child isn’t willing to
ask others for help. In addition, he is eager to
achieve something for hims elf. He has become a
s elf-s tarter and, once started, wishes to continue in
his own way, at his own time, in his own direction.

My child at nine is more self-satisfied and solitary than at eight.

#2005 9월 41번
Dear Andy,
Thank you most s incerely for the high quality
workmanship recently performed on the installation
of our roof. From the very beginning, including the
pres entation and estimate, the work was done
with such professionalism. Every concern was well worked out,
even down to the last detail of cleaning up. We
found absolutely nothing left behind! A next door
neighbor was so impress ed that we have referred
him to you. Thank you again.
Sincerely,
J. Adams
James Adams

#2005 9월 42번
Those of us who watched the lunar voyage of
Apollo 11 were thrilled to s ee the first men walk on
the moon and return to the earth. Words such as
fantastic and incr edible were inadequate to describe
those eventful days. But to go there, those as tronauts
had to break out of the tremendous gravity pull of the
earth. More energy was spent in the first few minutes
of lift-off or in the firs t few miles of travel
than was used over the next s everal days to travel
half a million miles.
Habits, too, have tremendous gravity pull－ more than
most p eop le realize or wou ld admit. Break ing
deeply-rooted old habitual tendencies such as hesitance,
impatience, s elfishness, and criticalness that violate
basic principles of human effectiveness involves more
than a little will-power and a few minor changes in
our lives. Achieving lift-off takes a tremendous
effort, but once we break out of the gravity pull, our
freedom takes on a whole new world.

#2005 9월 46번
Among all the s ciences , mathematics probably has
the longes t unbroken history －rivaled only by
as tronomy. Both go back at leas t to the ancient
Babylonians, and discoveries made then remain
important today. And just as as tronomy builds on the
discoveries of the pas t, so does mathematics .
Astronomy is based on observations of the real world,
whereas mathematics is a shared social
construct of ideas. Interestingly, however, ideas are the
driving force of astronomy, and mathematics has
grown out of attempts to model the real world －to
count the passing days, to measure the sizes of fields,
and to calculate the taxes owed to the king.
In as tronomy, there have been revolutions. Old ideas
h ave been overthrow n, replaced by radically
different new ones. For example, before the
16th century people did not doubt that the earth was
fixed at the center of the univers e. But Copernicus
sugges ted that the earth moves around the sun. After
some objections his idea was accepted by astronomers
during the 17th century.
It is often said that mathematics cannot have
revolutions, because the nature of mathematical truth
does not change. But human attitudes do change
and one of the biggest revolutions in mathematics
was a major revis ion of our concept of mathematical
truth. In the next fifty years, several major revolutions
will be witnes sed in mathematics.

#2004 9월

#2004 9월 21번
Imagine you were asked to work overtime and you
didn’t want to do it. Then you were told you would get
paid twice as much money. You would probably become
more cooperative. This idea also works with children.
A few years ago, a child of mine wouldn’t brush her teeth
before going to bed. Nothing we did could make her
change her mind. Then, my parenting class teacher
recommended that I should give her rewards. So
I used this simple phrase, which worked wonders: “If you
go and brush your teeth now, we will have time to read
three stories instead of just one.” Whenever she heard it,
she would jump up and brush her teeth right away.

#2004 9월 22번
When something doesn’t meet our expectations, many
of us operate on the assumption, “When in doubt, it must
be someone els e’s fault.” You can s ee this assumption
in action almost everywhere you look ― the car isn’t
working properly, so the mechanic must have repaired it
incorrectly; your expenses exceed your income, so your
husband or wife must be spending too much money.
However, blaming others takes an enormous amount of
mental energy. It makes you feel powerless over your
own life, because your happiness depends on the behavior
of others, which you can’t control.

#2004 9월 23번
The pollution of sea, air, and land harms our quality of
life by affecting our health. More serious is the possibility of
the end of human life itself. We may become so developed
that we kill ourselves! Therefore, the most recent definition
of development emphasizes sustainable development: the
improvement of human quality of life within the limits of
a green, healthy earth. In other words, it is development
which aims to protect, not destroy, the earth’s resources. This
will make sure that our present lifestyle does not harm future
generations’ lifestyles. They will also be able to get fruits
from the earth.

#2004 9월 24번
Modern art includes creations that can never be collected,
owned, or exhibited in the traditional sense. Often preferring
concepts over materials, modern artists use materials in the
broadest sense. As a result, they have gone beyond the natural
environment. Their works use everything from neon lights and
computers to the artists’ own bodies, as artistic mediums. Artists
and art works can therefore become identical, as in the case
of Body Art. On the other hand, they can be distant from
each other. For example, an artis t might phone
workers in a museum, instructing them on how to make
a work that he has not seen or touched himself.

#2004 9월 32번
Almost everyone will tell you to write about the things you
know best. And you may know more than you realize. You are
the expert on at least one very interesting subject ― yourself!
Remember that just as you enjoy reading stories about others, your
readers will enjoy reading stories about your feelings and
about things that happened to you. As you think about writing
topics, don’t forget your hobbies and talents. As an expert, you
can give your readers the real facts. Maybe some of your readers
will be inspired to try a new hobby themselves.

#2004 9월 38번
In recent years, we’ve been dreaming very different
dreams. The stuff of these dreams is fantasy ― swords
and wizards, knights and ladies. The business of
fantasy has become a multibillion-dollar reality, and
science fiction is starting to feel old-fashioned. Our
fascination with science fiction reflected a deep faith
that technology would lead us to a cyber utopia, with
robot servants serving food. But in fact, a dark,
pessimistic attitude toward technology and the future is
attracting more and more people. And the evidence is
the world’s new concern with a nostalgic, magical
vision of the past: swords, not lasers; magic, not
electricity; villages, not cities; the past, not the future.

The concern with science fiction is being replaced by
a new interest in fantasy.

#2004 9월 46번
When I entered the ninth grade, I thought I would have
to work very hard, and my teachers would be very strict.
So when the history teacher told us what we were going
to study, I became confused and tired. I stumbled into
the English class, my head still spinning. The first thing
the English teacher did was to pass around a tea bag. She
said, “I was making my usual cup of tea this morning,
and I found this strange tea bag. It smells of tea, and it
looks the same as all the other tea bags in the box, but
there is nothing inside it. I’d like you to write something,
using this as a metaphor.”　We got into it right away and
came up with some really cool ideas. The teacher said
tea bags bring good luck, so she hung this one above her
desk. After we had all survived that first day, we built an
even better relationship with the teacher, and we learned
a lot. And whenever I felt particularly stressed, angry or
sad, I would go sit under the tea bag and talk to her. She
was definitely a friend as well as a teacher.
